THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS 



AS BASED ON 

I 

\ 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE 



BY THE SAME AUTHOR. 



SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. Translated l.y A. E. Kkoegek, 
With an Introduction by Prof. W. T. Harris. Large Post Svo. 10s. Od. 

[Philosophical Library. 

SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. Translated by A. E. Knor.GEii. With 
ail Introduction by Prof. W. T. Harris. Large Post 8vo. 12s. 0'^ 

[Philosophical Library. 

POPULAR WORKS: The Nature of the Scholar, the Vocation of 
the Scholar, the Vocation of Man, the Doctrine of Religion, Clharacteristics 
of the Present Age, Outlines of the Doctrini o* Knowledge. With a Memoir 
by W. Smith. Two Volumes. Large Post 8vo. 21«. 

[Philosophical Library. 



London : Keoan Paul, Trench, Trübner & Co., Ltd. 



The Science of Ethics 



AS BASED ON 



THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 



nv 



JOHANN GOTTLIEB FICHTK 



TIlANSLATED BY 

A. E. KROEGER. 

EDITED BY 

The Hon. Dr. AV. T. HARRIS, 

CUMM1S3I0NER OF EOUOATIO.M. 



LONDON: 
KEGAN PAUL, TRENCH, TRtJBNER <^ CO., Ltd., 

DRYDEN HOUSE, GERRARD STREET, W. 
1907 

( or 1 nr 







^.ßr^n'Tol 









^ 



^K^' 



B<J(f04- 



EDITOR'S PREFACE 



THE present work is a translation by Mr. A. E. 
Kroeger from the original edition of Z>as Sydem der 
Sittenlehre nach den Frincipien der Wissenschaßslehrc, 
von Johann Gottlieb Fichte (Jena und Leipzig, 1798), 
together with an appendix containing a chapter on 
Ascetism, or practical moral culture, translated from the 
third volume of Fichte's posthumous works, published in 
Bonn, 1835, the same being a lecture given by Fichte in 
1798 as an appendix to The Science of Morals, published 
in that year. This work, together with the Philosophy 
of Right, translated by Mr. Kroeger, and already pub- 
lished by Messrs. Kegan Paul, Trench, Trübner & Co., 
gives the entire system of ethics as it stood in Fichte's 
mind. TJie Science of Morals gives the subjective side to 
ethics, and the Science of Rights gives the objective side, 
or the institutions founded to realize morals and protect 
the individual against attacks upon his freedom. The 
family, civil society, and the State are institutions which 
make secure the moral freedom of man. 

Fichte's writings form the classics of introspection. 
They furnish the best discipline for training in the 
ability to seize the activities of the mind and become 
conscious of their method. Anyone who reflects for 
a few minutes is competent to bear testimony to the 
difficulty in seizing the methods of mind-activity. It is 
comparatively easy to think of objects belonging to 

A 2 



23754 



vi EDITOR'S PREFACE. 

nature ; but the metliod of thinking ehijcs one, and it 
is not easy to make an inventory of the facts of con- 
sciotisness. Kant made an epocli in the history of 
philosophy by his searching investigation into the 
subjective co-e(iicient of knowledge. lie discovered 
what belongs essentially to the constitution of percep- 
tion and thought, and by this discovery was able to 
make a large contribution to rational psychology. ]'.y 
rational psychology one understands the necessary trutlis 
which are founded on the nature of the mind- itself. 
Fichte was singularly gifted for the work of acquiring 
Kant's methods and perfecting them. Almost every 
writing that is to be found in his complete works is an 
example of the Kantian method of introspection. There 
is everywhere an attempt at a separation of the transient 
and variable in the mental operation from tlie formal 
and permanent activity. This formal and permanent 
activity depends upon the logical structure of the mind, 
and does not vary : it furnishes us witli the universal and 
necessary truths which lie at the basis of metaphysics, 
psychology, and ethics. 

There is no possible way of giving the results of 
introspection in the form of objective observation. 
Introspection is not a substitute for objective observa- 
tion, nor is the latter a substitute for the former. The 
two modes of thinking involve different fundamental 
categories. Objective observation thinks in the form 
of time and space and external causation. Introspec- 
tion thinks in the form of self-activity, and its oljjects 
take the shape of feelings, volitions, or ideas. While 
objective observation sees things and dead results, intro- 
spection thinks persons and living beings. It is evident 
enough that a knowledge of nature as it is is not 
completed without introspection, for this operation enters 
as a factor in knowing all living beings, such as plants, 



EDITOR'S PREFACE. vii 

or animals, and men. But this use of introspection is 
unconscious. The Kantian and Pichtian introspection 
is conscious and systematic, and those wlio liavc used 
it much, or who liave attained to a familiar acquaint- 
ance with it, love to speak of it as scientific in- a higher 
sense of that word. Looking upon mathematics as 
systematic and strictly scientific, they would claim for 
the philosophic introspection a precision and strictness 
which exceeds that of mathematics. 

To anyone who obtains a first and superficial view 
of the history of philosophy it seems absurd to think of 
introspection as affording anything approaching the 
character of scientific system. There seems to be endless 
difference of opinion. Every thinker, however, arrives 
at convictions of his own, although he combats the 
convictions of his fellows. Those who attain to any 
mastery of the critical system of Kant, with its higher 
order of introspection, reach a series of necessary truths 
belonging within the sphere of rational psychology. 
Any candid student of the History of Philosophy, who 
has given much time to understand the different systems, 
will testify that the agreements of these thinkers are 
numerous, and of such a character as to demonstrate the 
claims made for the scientific character of the higher 
introspection. In so far as the amateur follows the 
mathematical demonstrations of Newton or Leibnitz, 
he is forced into agreement; he sees the insight of 
the mathematical author he is studying. So it is in 
the higher introspection: sufficient care and attention 
will discover to the reader the philosophical necessity 
which the insight of a Kant or a Fichte had attained. 
'But just as there comes a point in the study of mathe- 
matics where the mind of the student stops before a 
realm of unexplored quantity, so there comes a place 
in philosophical introspection where the student stops, 



viii EDITOR'S PREFACE. 

being unable to take the next step, until further strength 
comes to him by further discipline. 

With philosophy, as with mathematics, it is true 
that the great positive results are attained in some 
form even in the elementary stages of thinking. God, 
freedom, and immortality, as olijects of philosophy, are 
reached in the ontology of Plato and Aristotle almost 
\vith the first speculative insight ; they are seen as 
the necessary presupposition of the world. The samo 
results, too, are seen very soon as the logical condition 
for the facts of introspection. One needs only to read 
the first hundred pages of Kant's Critiqiic of Pure 
Reason to see that his doctrine of time and space, which 
makes them to be subjective forms of the mind, at the 
same time establishes the transcendence of mind over 
nature ; for space and time are the necessary conditions 
for the existence of nature, and for all material existence, 
and all manifestations of life in plants and animals. 
But space and time themselves are forms in pure mind or 
pure reason. Hence pure reason furnishes the ground 
for time and space and for the realms of nature. 

Perhaps the greatest merit of the present work is 
Fichte's clear setting forth of the will in the first third 
of the book. Fichte sees clearly the autonomy and 
self-activity of the ego. He is able to describe this as a 
fact of consciousness. To him it is clear that the will can 
originate new determinations in the world. It is not a 
link in a chain of causality necessarily determined by 
what has gone before it. It can modify the chain of 
causality in which it finds itself, and initiate new forms 
of existence for which it alone is responsible. The idea 
of responsibility is the key to all questions relating to 
freedom. We are not responsible for that which we do 
not originate. Human beings are conscious that they 
are authors of deeds for which they are wholly respon- 



EDITOR'S PREFACE, ix 

sible. The institutions of civilization arc founded on 
this fact. Even those who arc ngnostics or sceptics in 
regard to the freedom of the will, do not go so far as to 
act on any other principle than that of freedom and 
responsibility on the part of their fellow-men. Tliey 
are partly of the conviction that their mental difTiculties 
are merely subjective. They are unable to square their 
intellectual conviction with their common-sense convic- 
tion, and they are almost willing to admit that tlie 
practical position is the correct one, and tlial the 
intellectual sceptism is due to weakness of insight. 

Kant shows in his Third Antimony that he admits 
equal validity to the two categories — first, that of external 
observation, and, second, that of higher introspection. 
It was only necessary for another thinker to show tliat 
the category of external observation has the. foundation 
of its validity in the category of higher introspection 
to refute the Third Antimony. A causality of deter- 
mination of succeeding events by prior events rests 
for its validity upon a higher causality of freedom. 
"Without a causality that originates in self-determination 
there could be no perseverance of causal influence, and 
consequently no chain of causality. Everything would 
belong to the side of effect, and nothing to the side of 
cause. This would be self-contradictory, for without a 
cause there could be no effect. 

Xant found that he was obliged to acknowledge this 
in his Critique of the Practical Reason, but he did not 
•see that the necessity belonged quite a« well to liis 
Critique of Pure Reason. To Fichte this became clear, 
' and hence the Wissenschaftslehre, especially in its 
later forms, and hence, too, these works on the 
science of rights and the science of morals. Eichte's 
insight into freedom, as the condition both of the intellect 
and of the will, is the foundation-stone of the subsequent 



X EDITOR'S PREFACE. 

2)hilosophies of Schelling and Ilogcl, in which the German 
movement initiated by Kant completes its union with 
those of Plato and Aristotle. Tiie psychology movement 
comes into harmony with the ontology movement, both 
reach the same highest principles, namely, tlie personality 
of God, human freedom and responsibility, individual 
immortality in an eternal church invisible. 

W. T. HARRIS. 
WAsniNOTON, D.C., December, 1896. 



CONTENTS 



TtiRCS in J. 0. Fichte, 
EOition, Werter Uaiid, 

1-12 



13-62 



€3-150 



157-205 



^06-253 



25i-365 



I^fTRODUCTION . • . . . l 

(Original pages 1-18.) 

Part I. 

Book I. Deduction of the Phisciple of Morality 17 
(Original pages 1-70.) 

Book II. Deduction of the Reality and Applica- 

BILITY OF THE PuiNCIi'LE OF MoUALITY 67 

(Original pages 71-202.) 

Part II. 

Systematic Aitlication ok the Mohal PiiiNcirLE ; 

on, MOIIALITY IN IT.S MORE Ke.STIUCTED JMeANINO. 

Book III. Concekxino the Formal Conditions of 

THE Morality of our Actions . . 107 
(Original pages 203-271.) 

Book IV. Concerning the Material Condition.s 

OF the Morality of our Actions . 217 
(Original pages 272-339.) 

Book V. Theory of Duties . . . . . 269 

(Original pages 340-494.) 

Appendix — On A.scetism . ... 373 

(Printed pages 469-550. 



N.B. — The work is translated from the edition of 1798. 



INTRODUCTION 

§'• 

How an objective can ever become a subjective, or how a 
being can ever become an object of representation : this 
curious change will never be explained by anyone who \/ 
does not find a point wherein the objective and subjective 
are r^ot distinguished at all, but are altogether one, Now, 
such a point is established by, and made the starting- 
point of, our system. This point is the Egohood, the 
Intelligence, Eeason, or whatever it may be named. 

This absolute identity of subject and object in the 
Ego can be shown up only through mediation, and cannot 
he found immediately as part of actual consciousness. ^ 
"With the realization of actual consciousness, even thou<^'h 
it be self-consciousness, we always have the diremption. 
Only in so far as I distinguish myself, the conscious, 
from myself, the object of this consciousness, am I at all 
conscious of myself. 2'he whole mechanism of cofiseious- 
ncss rests iipon the manifold views of this separation and 
reunion of the subjective and the objective. 



The subjective and objective are viewed as united, or 
ns harmonious, in the following manner : 

First, OS if the subjective resulted from the objective, 
as if the former conformed itself to the latter. This 
view is called Knowledge, Cognition. It is the business 
of theoretical philosophy to show how we come to assert 
such a harmony. 
B 



2 THE SCIENCE OE ETIflCS. 

Second, as if tlic oljjective resulted from the Rubjcctive, 
as if a being resulted from a conception (from tlie con- 
ception of a purpose). This view is that of a moral 
activity. It is the business of practical philosophy to 
show how we come to assert such a harmony. 

The first point, namely, how we come to assert tlie 
harmony of our representations with tilings, assumed to 
have independent existence, has been entertained in 
previous philosophy, but not the second point, namely, 
how we come to think some of our conceptions as repre- 
sentable, and in part actually represented in this very 
same independent nature. It has been considered quite 
a matter of course that we can influence nature. Every- 
one knows that we do it every moment : it is a part of 
consciousness ; so why trouble ourselves about it. 

§3. 

The doctrine of morals is practical philosophy. As it 
is the province of theoretical philosophy to represent the 
system of necessarily thinking that our representations 
conform to a being, so practical philosophy has to exhaust 
the system of necessarily thinking that a being conforms 
to results from our representations. Hence, it becomes 
our duty to enter upon this last-mentioned question, and 
to show, first, how we come at all to consider some of our 
representations as being the ground of a being ; and, 
second, whence we get particularly that system of those 
conceptions from which a being is absolutely to result. 

Tiie object of this Introduction is to gather into one 
short statement what the subsequent investigation is to 
elaborate in detail concernini; this matter. 



o 



§4- 

I find myself as active in the sensuous world. From 
this self-finding all consciousness proceeds, and without 
this consciousness of my activity there is no self- 



INTRODUCTION. 3 

consciousness, as witliout this self-consciousness there is 
no consciousness of anotlier, which I myself am Jiot. 
Whoever desires a proof of tliis assertion will find it in 
the second book of tliis worlc. At present we merely 
assert it as an immediate fact of consciousness fof the 
sake of connecting our argument to it ? 

AVhat manifoldness does tliis representation vof my 
activity contain, and how do I arrive at this manifold ? 

Even when we admit, for the present, that the repre- 
sentation of tlie matter, upon which my activity is 
directed, and whicli remains i)crmanent and unchanged 
by this activity ; and the representation of the qiialilies 
of this matter, wliich my activity changes; and the 
representation of this progressive change, which continues 
until that form is realised which I purposed to realise — 
even when we admit, I say, tliafrdl these representatiyns, 
which are involved in the representation of my activity, 
are given me externally — although I confess I do not 
understand what this may mean — even granted that it is 
empirical perception, or whatever other words may be used 
to express this not-thought, it nevertheless remains quite 
r.lear that there is something else besides m the repre- 
sentation of my activity which cannot be externally 
given, but must lie in me, which I cannot empirically 
perceive or learn, but which I must know immediately, 
namely, that / mgsclf am to be the last ground of the 1| 
change which is to occur. '' 

I am the ground of this change signifies: — that that 
whicli knoius of the change is that which effects it; the 
" subjec t of consciousness and the principle of causality are 
one. But that wliich I assert, at the origin of all 
knowing, of the subject itself of this knowing, or, in 
otlier words, that which I know because I know at all ; 
this I can have derived from no other knowing; I know 
it immediately ; I posit it absolutely. 

Hence, as soon as I know at all, I know that I am 
active. The mere form of knowing generally contains 



4 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

tlic consciousncRS of myself as an active principle, and, 
hence, posits myself as such. 

Now, it might well be tliat tlic same mere fonu of 
knowing does alone — if not immediately, at any rate 
through the just discovered immediate — contain all the 
other manifold which is involved in the representation- of 
my activity, as mentioned before. If this should turn 
out to be so, we should at once be relieved of the very 
vexatious assumption that this manifold is given to us 
from without, since we should be able to explain it in 
another and more natural manner. Such an explanation 
would show how we come to ascribe to ourselves a 
causality in an external sensuous world by deducing the 
necessity of such an assumption immediately from the 
pre-supposed consciousness. 

We will attempt to decide whether such a deduction is 
possible. Its plan is as follows : We have just now seen 
what the representation of our causality involves. The 
pre-supposition now is that the same is contained in, and 
necessarily posited together with, consciousness in general. 
Hence we proceed from the form of consciousness in 
general, and commence our deduction with it; and our 
investigation is closed if, in the course of our deduction, 
•we arrive again at the representation of our sensuous 
activity from which we started. 

§5- 

I posit myself as active, signifies according to the 
above: I distinguish within myself a knowing and an 
actual power, which, as such, does not know, but is; but, 
at the same time, I view both as absolutely one. How do 
I come to make the distinction ? How to determine the 
distinguished in precisely this manner ? Probably the 
second question will find its answer in the answer to the 
first question. 

I do not know without knowing somewhat; I do not 






INTRODUCTION. 5 

know of myself witlioiit becoming precisely throngli tins "/^ 
Tfnowledgc somewliat for myself; or, which is tlic same, 
without distinguishing witliin myself a subjective and 
an objective. If a consciousness is posited, tliis distinc- 
tion is posited ; and without it, consciousness is not \/ ^ c * 
possible at all. But this diremption posits immediately 
likewise the relation of the dirempter, of the subjective 
and objective. The latter, the objective, is to exist 
through itself independently of the subjective; whereas 
the former, the subjective, is to be dependent upon and 
receive its material determination through the latter. 
Being is to be through itself, whereas knowing is depen- -^ 
dent upon being; as such the relation must appear to 
us, if anything appears to us, or if we have consciousness 
at all. , 

The important insight thus obtained is the following : — 
Knowing and being are not separated outside and inde- 1 
pendent of consciousness, but are separated only in 
consciousness, because this separation is a condition of ' 
the possibility of all consciousness ; and it is only 
through this separation that both those separates arise. ~/ 
There is no being except through the mediation of 
consciousness, as there is likewise no knowing, as a 
mere subjective knowing having its being for its object, 
except through consciousness. Even if I try merely 
to say "I," am I already compelled to separate; but 
likewise also does this separation arise only through 
my saying thus, "I." The one, which is separated, and 
which is therefore at the basis of all consciousness, and 
in consequence whereof the subjective and objective in 
consciousness are immediately posited as one, is absolutely 
= X, and can, as such simple one, arise in no manner 
in consciousness. 

"We discover here an immediate agreement between 
the subjective and objective, I know of myself because 
I am, and I am because I know of myself. It is possible 
that all other agreements of both — whether the objective 




6 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

is to result from the siil)joctivc, as when the conception 
of a purpose is realized, or whether the sul)jcctive is to 
result from the ol)jective, as wlien tlie conception of 
cognition is applied — are but particular views of that 
one immediate harmony. If this could really 1)c proven, 
it would also prove that everything wliich may occur 
in consciousness is posited through the mere form of 
consciousness, since that immediate diremption and liar- 
mony is the form of consciousness itself, and since those 
other diremptions and harmonies exhaust the total 
content of all possible consciousness. How this may 
be, we shall doubtless see in the course of our investi- 
gation. 

§6. 

' I posit myself as active, as described above, signifies 
not : I ascribe to myself activity in general ; but I 
ascribe to myself a determined activity, i.e., this activity 
and no other. 

We have seen how the subjective, through its mere 
separation from the objective, becomes quite dependent 
and necessitated ; and the ground of this, its material 
determinateness, of its determinateness in regard to the 
xvhat thereof, does not lie in itself, but in the objective. 
The subjective appears as a mere cognizing of a some- 
thing which it perceives, but on no account as an active 
producing of the representation. Tlius it must, indeed, 
be, at the origin of all consciousness, where the separation 
of the subjective and objective is. complete. But in the 
progress of consciousness the subjective also appears, 
through the mediation of a synthesis, as free and deter- 
mining, for it appears as dbstractinrj ; in which case it 
may very well at least freely describe, though not 
perceive, activity in general. At present, however, we 
stand at the origin of all consciousness, and the repre- 
sentation which we have to investigate is therefore 
necessarily a perception; ^.e., in this representation the 



INTRODUCTION. 7 

sulijcctivG appears a.s altogolhor and completely deter- , .- 
mined throii'di an external other. "■~~" ' - ■ 

"^ Now what does this signify ? A determined activity. 
And how docs it become a determined activity ? »Solely 
through opposing to it a resistance, opposing it through 
ideal activity ; in other words, solely through thinking 
and imagining a resistance as opposed to it. Wherever 
and in so far as you perceive activity, you also perceive / 
necessarily resistance. JN"© appear ance of resistance , no y/ 
appearance of activity. 

Let not this be overlooked. That such a resistance 
does appear is purejy result of the laws of consciousness, 
and hence the resistance may properly be regarded as 
a result of those laws. The law itself, which gives rise 
to it for us, may 1x3 deduced from the necessary sepa- 
ration of a subjective from an objective, and from the 
absolutely posited relation of the former to the latter, 
as established previously. This is the ground why the 
consciousness of the resistance is a mediated, and not 
an immediate consciousness. It is mediated through 
this, that I must regard myself as merely a cognizing 
subject, and in this cognition utterly dependent upon y' 
the objectivity. 

Next, let the characteristics of this representation of 
a resistance be developed in their genesis. This resist- 
ance is represented as the opposite of activity ; hence, as 
something, which merely is, but does not act, as some- 
thing quiet and dead, which merely strives to remain in 
existence, and which, therefore, does certainly resist (with 
a measure of power to remain what it is) all influences 
of freedom upon it, but which can in no wise attack y 
freedom upon its own ground ; in short, mere objectivity. ■ 
Such objectivity is called with its familiar name, ?/^a^^cr. 

Again, all consciousness is conditioned by the con- 
sciousness of myself. This; again, is conditioned by the 
perception of my activity, and this again is conditioned 
by the positing of a resistance as such. Hence this 



8 THE SCIENCE OE ETHICS. 

rcsistonce, with the characteristic just ascribed to it, 
extends necessarily throuj^diout tlie whole sphere of my 
consciousness, and remains along with it. Nor can 
freedom ever be posited as having the slightest influence 
over this resistance, because if it had, itself and all con- 
sciousness and alj being would become annihilated. 

The representation of a matter, which cannot be in any 
manner changed through my causality, and which wo 
discovered above to be contained in the perception of our 
activity, has thus been deduced from the laws of con- 
sciousness. 

One of our chief questions has been answered, namely, 
how we come to assume a subjective, a conception which 
is to result from, and to be determined by, an objective, 
by a being. This assumption is, as we have shown, the 
necessary consequence of our separating in our conscious- 
ness a subjective from an objective, and yet, at the same 
time, regarding both as one ; and the determined relation, 
namely, that subjective is to be determined by the 
objective, and not vice versd, arises from the absolutely 
posited relation of the subjective as such to the objective 
as such. And thus the principle and the problem of all 
theoretical philosophy have been deduced. 

§7. 

I posit myself as active. "We have said enough con- 
cerning the subjective and objective in this positing, their 
diremption, their union, and their original relation to 
each other. But we have not yet investigated the predi- 
cate which is attached to the one and inseparable Ego. 
What does it signify to be active ? and what do I really 
posit when I ascribe activity to myself ? 

The schema of activity in general, as an agility, 
mobility, or whatever words you may choose to express 
it in, we presuppose in the reader, since it can be demon- 
strated to no one, who does not find it in himself. This 



INTRODUCTION. 9 

internal agility canngt in any way be ascribed to tlic 
objective as siicli, as wo have jnst seen, for tlie objective 
is and remains only what and us it is. Tliis agility, so 
far as the form of its activity is concerned, appertains 
only to the subjective, to the intelligence as such. I say 
so far as the form is concerned, for, we have sliowii 
above that the material or the content of the deter- 
minedness is to be in another relation determined 
through the objective. Eep resenting, in its form, is 
therefore contemplated as freest internal motion. Now 
I, tliG Olio iiiseparablo Ego, am to be active, and that, 
which acts upon the object, is doubtless this objective 
in me, the real power. Considering all this, my activity 
can also be posited as proceeding from the subjective and 
determining the objective ; in short, as a causality of the 
mere conception upon the objective, which conception 
cannot in so far be again determined through another 
objective, but is determined absolutely in and through 
itself. 

We have thus also replied to our second question — 
how do I come to assume that an objective results from 
a subjective, a being from a conception ? and in doing so 
have deduced the principle of all practical philosophy. 
For this assumption arises because I am absolutely 
bound to posit myself as active, and because, having 
distinguished within myself a subjective and an objective, 
I cannot posit this activity in any other manner than as 
a causality of the conception. Absolute activity is 
the one predicate, which immediately and absolutely 
belongs to me ; and causality, through the conception, is 
the only possible manifestation of this activity, made 
necessary by the laws of consciousness. In this latter 
form absolute activity is also called freedom. Freedom is \ 
the serisuous representation of self-activity, and arises 
through the opposition of ourselves as intelligence to tJie 
determinateness of the object, in so far as we relate the 
latter to ourselves. 



v-<<^' 



> 



,»- 



-V 



XO 



lo THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

I posit myself as free in so far as I explain a sensuous 
acting or a being through my conception, which conception 
is then called the conception of a purpose. Hence the 
fact which was assumed above, tliat I fnid myself active, 
is only possible on condition, that I presuppose a concep- 
tion originated through myself, wliich my causality is to 
accept as a guide, and to be as well formaliUr based upon 
us materialitcr determined by. We thus ol^tain a new 
characteristic to those already mentioned as involved in 
the representation of our activity, a characteristic wliich 
it was not necessary to point out before, and which we 
have here, at the same time, deduced. But it is to be 
well observed, that this previous originating of a concep- 
tion is only 2wsitcd, and pertains only to the sensuous 
view of our self-activity. 

The conception, from which an objective determination 

• is to result, and which we call the conception of a purpose, 

is not itself determined again by an objective, but is y^ 
absolutely determined through itself. For if it were 
otherwise I should not be absolutely active, nor im- 
mediately posited as absolutely active, but my activity 
would be dependent upon, and mediated through, an _.,. 
objective being, which is against our presupposition. It 

• is true, that in the course of connected consciousness the 
conception of a purpose appears as conditioned — not 
determined— through the cognition of" some objective 
bein» But this view cannot be entertained here, at 
the origin of all consciousness, where we take our 
starting-point from activity, and where this activity is 

absolute. 

The most important result of this consideration is as 
follows: — There is an absolute independence and self- 
determination of the mere conception by virtue of the 
causality, which the subjective has upon the objective ; 
precisely as we asserted an absolute and self -posited 
being of the material substance in consequence of the 
causality, which the objective has upon the subjective. 



INTRODUCTION, 1 1 

Both ends of llie whole world of reason have thus been 
connected by ns. 

(Wliosoever lias but properly seized this self-determin- 
ing of the conception, has thereby attained the most 
perfect insight into our whole system, and, as a conse- 
quence, an unshakeable conviction of its truth.) 

§ 8. 

From the conception there results an objective. How 
is this possible, nnd what can it Bigiiify ? Xothing, but 
that the conception itself should appear to me as some- 
thing objective. Now the conception of a purpose, 
regarded objectively, is called a willinrj, and tlic repre- 
sentation of a will is nothing but this necessary view 
of the conception of a purpose posited, if only for the 
sake of becoming conscious of our activity. The spiritual 
within me, viewed immediately as the principle of a 
causality, becomes to me a will. 

But it is / who am to have causality upon the sub- 
stance or matter, which we have described in its origin ; 
and it is impossible for me to think a causality upon that 
matter except through what is likewise matter itself. 
Hence in so far as I think, and must think, myself as ;, 
having causality upon this matter, I become matter for 
myself, and in so far as I thus regard myself, I call 
myself a material hody. I, regarded as principle of a 
causality in the world of matter, am an articulated body ; 
and the representation of my body itself is nothing else 
than the representation of myself as a cause in the world 
. of matter ; hence mediately as simply a certain view I V 
take of my absolute activity. 

Nevertheless, the will is to have causality — and im- 
mediate causality — upon my body, and only so far as 
this immediate causality of the will extends does the 
body, as tool, or the articulation extend. Hence the will 
is aJso separated and distinguished from the body, and 



12 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

appears, therefore, as not the same as the ]>ody. But 
tliis clircmption and distinction is notliing but another 
separation of the subjective and objective, or, still more 
definite, a familiar view of this original separation. Tlie 
will, in this relation, is the subjective, and the body the 
objective. 

§9. 

But what is my actual causality, what is the change 
which it is to produce in the sensuous world, and what 
is the sensuous world which is changeable through this 
causality ? 

If a subjective within me is to change into an objective, 
a conception of a purpose into a resolve of the will, and 
this again into a certain modification of my body,_I 
evidently represent myself to myself as having changed. 
But my final appurtenance, i.e., my substantial body, is 
to be connected with the whole material world, and 
hence, as it is regarded as having changed, the world is 
necessarily also so regarded. 

The thing, which my causality can change, or the 
qualitativcness of j^ature, is precisely the same as the 
unchangeable thing, or mere matter. Both are the same, 
only viewed from different sides, precisely as the causality 
which the conception exercises upon the objective ap- 
peared to us, when viewed from two sides, as will and as 
body. The changeable thing is Nature, when viewed' 
subjectively, and, as connected with me, the active intelli- \/^ 
gence ; the unchangeable thing is that same Xature, when •^ 
viewed altogether and merely objectively. 

All that was involved in the perception of our 
sensuous causality has now been deduced from the laws 
of consciousness, as was required, and we find as the last 
link of our conclusions the very same from which we 
started. Our investigation has therefore rcturned into 
itself, and is closed. 

Its result is, in short, as follows : — The only absolute, 



JNTRODUCTION. 13 

upon which all consciousness and all bcinf; is based, is 
pure activity. This activity appears by virtue of the 
laws of consciousness, and particularly of the funda- 
mental law of consciousness, that the active can only 
be considered as united suly'ect and object (as E;,fo). 
As a causality upon something outside of me, all wliich is 
contained in this appearance — from the end or purpose 
absolutely posited through myself to the raw matter of 
the world — are but mediating links of this appearance, 
and hence are themselves appearances. The only purely 
true is my self-determination. 



PART 1. 

THE SCIENCE OF MORALITY 



BOOK FIRST. 

DEDUCTION OF THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 

Preliminary. 

It is asserted that there manifests itself in the soul 
of man an impulsion to do certain things utterly 
independent of external purposes, merely for the sake 
of doing them ; and, on the other hand, to leave undone 
other things equally independent of external purposes, 
and merely for the sake of leaving them undone. The 
condition of man, in so far as such an impulsion is 
necessarily to manifest itself within him, as sure as 
he is a rational being, is called his moral nature. 

The power of cognition, which belongs to man, may 
relate in a twofold manner to this, his moral nature. 

Firstly. When that impulsion is discovered by him 
in his self observation as a fact — and it certainly is 
assumed that each rational being will thus discover it, 
if he but closely observes himself; man may simply 
accept it as such fact, may rest content to have 
discovered that it is thus, without inquiring in what 
manner and from what grounds it becomes thus. Per- 
haps he may even freely resolve, from inclination, to 
place unconditioned faith in the requirements of that 
impulsion, and actually to think, as his highest destina- 
tion, what that impulsion represents to him as such ; 
nay, perhaps even to act constantly in conformity with 
this faith. Thus there arises within him the common^ 
or ordinary, knowledge, as well of his moral nature in 
C tj 



V 



1 8 THE SCIENCE OE ET ///CS. 

genoral, as also — if he carefully attends to tlic dictates 
of his conscience in the particular phases of his life — 
of his particular duties; which common knowledge is 
possible from the standjwint of ordinary consciousness, and 
is suflicient for the generation of moral sentiments and 
a moral behaviour. 

Secondly. But man may also not rest content with 
the immediate perception ; he may desire to know the 
grounds of what he has thus discovered ; he may not 
be content with a partical, but desire a genelical know- 
ledge ; or he may desire to know not only that such an 
impulsion exists within him, but likewise how it arises 
within him. If he obtains this knowledge, it will be 
a speculative knowledge, and to attain it he must rise 
from the standpoint of ordinary consciousness to a 
higher standpoint. 

Now, how is this problem to be solved, or how are the 
grounds of the moral nature of man to be discovered ? 
The only matter which excludes all asking for a higher 
ground is this : that we are we, or, in other words, our 
Egoness, or Kationality, w^hich latter word, however, is 
not nearly as expressively correct as the former. Every- 
thing else, whether it be withm us, like the impulsion 
above mentioned, or for us, like the external world which 
we assume, is only thus within or for us because we are 
it, as can indeed be easily proven in general, whereas 
the particular insight into the manner in which some- 
thing connects within, or for us, that rationality, is 
precisely the speculative and scientific knowledge of the 
grounds of this something whereof we speak. The 
development of these grounds being deduced, as it is, 
from the highest and absolute principle of Egoness, and 
shown to be a necessary result thereof, is a deduction. It 
is therefore our present task to furnish a deduction of the 
moral nature or principle in man. 

Instead of enumerating at length the advantages of 
such a deduction, it is sufficient to remark tiiat only 



/ 



THE PRTNCtPI.E OF MORALITY. 19 

through it docs a science of morality arise. And science 
— no matter whereof — is end in itself. 

In relation to a scientific complete philosophy, the 
jircsent science of morality is connected with the 
fcience of knowledge through the present deduction. 
This deduction is derived from principles of the latter 
science, and shows how the particular science of morality 
proceeds from the general science of knowhxlge, and thus 
becomes a separate philosophical science. 

If, as is maintained, the morality of our nature follows 
from our rationality, in accordance with necessary laws, 
the mentioned impulsion is itself primary and immediate 
for perception ; that is to say, it will manifest itself 
without our interference, and we cannot change this, its 
mnnifestation, through our freedom in any ninnner what- 
.«oever. In generating through a deduction an insight into 
the grounds thereof, we do not in any manner receive 
the power to change anything in it, since only our 
cognition, and not our power, extends so far, and since 
the whole relation is necessarily our own unchangeable 
nature itself. 

Hence the deduction generates nothing else, and must 
not be expected to generate anything else than simply 
theoretical cognition. Just as we do not place things 
differently in time and space after we have obtained the 
insight into the grounds of our doing so at all, than we 
did previously, so also morality does not manifest itself / 
differently in man before and after its deduction. Nor is 
ihe science of morality a science of wisdom — as, indeed, 
were impossible, since wisdom is rather an art than a 
science — but morality is like all philosophy — a science of 
knowledge. In its peculiar characteristic, however, it is 
the theory of the consciousness of our moral nature in 
general, and of our determined duties in particular. 

So much concerning the significance and the object of 
our intended deduction. One more preliminary remark 
for its proper comprehension ; a remark made necessary 



/ 



20 THE SCIENCE OF ET/HCS. 

by the general ignorance regarding the nature of trans- 
cendental philosophy. 

The procedure of our deduction will be as follows : — 
"We shall make it our proljlem, to think ourselves under 
a certain specified characteristic, and to observe hov) we 
are compelled to think ourselves imder such condition. 
From our thus discovered nature we shall deduce the 
•moral impulsion before mentioned as necessary. Xow, at 
first, it would seem arbitrary that we think ourselves 
precisely under such a condition. But he who has an 
outlook over all philosopliy, and over the connection of 
the several philosophical sciences in a system, knows this 
condition to be necessary ; whereas anyone else may 
temporarily regard it as a mere assumption for the 
purpose of constructing, by its means, a science of 
morality. The attempt may succeed or not, and the 
correctness of the assumption will not have been proven 
until the required science has actually been established 
by its means. The objection, therefore, that the condition 
assumed is arbitrary would seem to be of little weight. 

A more important objection, and more instructive in 
its consequences, would be the following. Some one may 
say, "You are going to think yourself. Very well; but 
as a critical philosopher you ought to know, or it can at 
least be easily shown to you, that all your thinking 
proceeds according to certain inner laws of this thinking 
that hence all that you think is modified by tlie manner 
of thinking, and that everything is for you as it is, simply 
because you think it thus. This, doubtless, will also be 
the case in the present instance ; in thinking yourself you 
will become modified according to your thinking, and 
hence you cannot say : Thus am I in and for myself — 
since you never can know that unless you have some 
means of knowledge besides thinking — but you can 
merely say : Thtts must I necessarily think myself Xow, 
if you always remain conscious of this true signifi- 
cance of your result, and limit yourself to it, no objec- 



THE rRINCirr.E of morality. 21 

tioTi can be raised uf^aiiist your procedure, but you can 
Bce yourself how inueli it will be worth. You do not, 
however, seem to limit yourself to this, its significance. 
You pretend to deduce from it that moral impulsion 
which manifests itself in us all, hence to deduce some- 
thing actual from a mere thought, or to pass from the 
region of thinking into the utterly difierent region of 
actual being." 

To this we reply : This we pretend to do on no 
account. We remain altogether in the region of tliinking, 
and the ever-continuing misapprehension of transcen- 
dental philosophy consists precisely in this : that such 
a transition from the region of thinking to that of being 
is still considered possible, is still required, and that a 
being in itself is still considered to be thinkable. That 
impulsion within us, what else is it than a thinking 
which forces itself upon us — than a necessary conscious- 
ness ? Can we then ever proceed from a consciousness 
of mere consciousness to the object itself? Do we 
then know anything else concerning this requirement, 
than that we must necessarily think that there is such 
a requirement within us ? The result of our conclusions 
in the deduction is a thinking ; and that which is 
within us, independently of all conclusions as primary 
and immediate, is also a thinking. The only difference 
between this mediated and immediate thinking is this, 
that in regard to the latter we do not become conscious 
of its grounds, but find it to force itself upon us with 
immediate necessity, thereby receiving the predicate of 
reality or perceivability ; while the former lies within a 
series of grounds, whereof we become conscious. It is 
the very object of philosophy to discover that within our 
reason which remains unknown to us on the standpoint ' 
of ordinary consciousness. We cannot speak of a being 
in itself, for reason cannot go beyond itself. For the / 
intelligence there is no being ; and since there is a being ^ 
only for the intelligence, there is no being at all ; there ' 



VL'J_ 



22 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

is only a necessary consciousness. This necessity of 
consciousness forces itself immediately upon us on the 
standpoint of ordinary consciousness ; on the transcen- 
dental standpoint we investigate its grounds. The 
following deduction, as well as the whole system, of 
morality which is to be erected upon it, furnishes only 
a part of this necessary consciousness, and would l)e 
very incorrectly apprehended if taken to signify any- 
thing else. 



CHAPTER I. 

Problem. To think myself as self, that is to say, 
apart from all which is not myself. 

A. Solution. I find myself, as self, only as willing. 

Explanation. 

First. "What does this mean : I find mjjsdJJ 

The easiest manner to guide anyone to the correct 
thinking and understanding of the conception / is as 
follows : — Think, I would say to him, any object, for 
instance, this wall, this desk. You doubtless assume a 
thinking, which thinks in this thought, and this thinking 
you are yourself. You are immediately conscious of your 
thinking in this, your thinking. But the object which 
you think is not to be the thinking itself, is not to be 
identical with it, but is to be an opposite somewhat, of 
which oppositeness you are also immediately conscious 
in this your thinking. 

Now think again — not a wall, however, but yourself. 
As sure as you do this, you posit the thinking and the 
thought, not as opposites, as you did in the pre^'ious case, 
not as a twofold, but as one and the same ; and you are 
immediately conscious of it in this manner. You there- 
fore think the conception Ego or I, when the thinking 
and the thought are assumed in thinking as one and 
the same, and vice, versa, whatever arises in such a 
thinking is the conception of the ^170. 

Applying this to our case, I find myself would signify : 

"3 I 



?4 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

I ft.ssunic that which I find to he the s.'uue as that which , 
finds; the finding and tlic found are to he tlic same. \ 

^ Second. What does this mean : I /nrZ myself ? 

The found is here opposed to that which is produced 
through our free activity ; and more particularly the 
finding is here determined as that wiiich finds; i.e., in 
so far as I find I am conscious of no other activity 
than that of a mere taking iiold of something ; that which 
I take hold of being neither produced nor in any manner 
modified by my taking hold of it. It is to be, and to be 
precisely as it is, independently of my taking hold of it. It 
was without having been taken hold of, and would have 
remained as it was although I had not taken hold of it. 
My taking hold of it was altogether accidental for it, and 
did not change it in the least. Thus, at least, do I appear 
to myself in finding, and at present we are merely con- 
cerned in establishing the facts of consciousness, but not 
in showing how it may be in truth, i.e., from tlie highest 
standpoint of speculation. In short, somefcliing is fjivcn 
to the perceiving subject ; he is to be purely passive, and 
something is to force itself upon him, which, in our case 
he is to recognize as himself. 

Third. What does this signify : I find myself as 
willing, and can find myself only as 'williiig ? 

What willing means is presupposed as well known. 
This conception is capable of no real explanation, nor 
does it need any. Each one must become conscious in 
himself, through intellectual contemplation, as to what 
it signifies, and will doubtless be able to do so without 
any dil^culty. The fact which the above words suggest 
is as follows : — I become conscious of a willing. I add 
in thinking to this willing something which exists inde- 
pendently of my consciousness, and wliich I assert to 
be the willing subject in this will, or to be that which 
is to have this will, in which this will is to be. How 
we come to add such a substance in thinking, and what 
are the grounds of it, we do not discuss here. We 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 25 

merely nssert here that it does occur, and of this eacli 
one nnist convince himself by self-observation. I become 
consciovs of, or perceive, this will. But I also become 
conscious now of this consciousness, or of this perception, 
and relate it also to a substance ; and this conscious 
substance is for me the same which has the will. Hence 
I find the willing subject to be my self, or I find nujse/f 
willing. 

I find myself onhj as willing. I have not an imme- 
diate perception of substance. Substance is, indeed, no 
object of perception at all, but is merely that wliich is 
added through thinking to an object of perception. I 
can immediately perceive only something, which is to be 
a manifestation of the substance. Now there are only 
two manifestations which can be immediately ascribed to 
that substance: Thinking, in the widest significance of 
the word, and ivilling. The former is originally and 
immediately for itself not at all an object of a special ,y' 
new consciousness, but is consciousness itself. Only in 
so far as it is related and opposed to another objective 
does itself become objective in this opposition. Hence, 
as original objective manifestation of thai substance 
there remains only the latter, the (wUlir^ ; and this, V"^ 
indeed, remains always only objective, is never itself a 
thinking, but always only the thought manifestation of 
self-activity. In short, tlie manifestation which alone I 
originally ascribe to myself is the willing, and I become 
conscious of myself only on condition of becoming con- 
scious of myself as a willing. 

Proof. 

Having thus explained the above proposition, we now 
proceed to establish its proof. This proof is based : 

First. On the conception of the Ego. — The significance 
of this conception has just been established through 
its genesis. That each one does truly proceed in the 



26 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

described manner when endeavouring^ to think his self; 
and that, on the other hand, such a proccedinj^^ gives rise 
to no other thought than that of his self; this each one 
must find in himself, and it cannot be specially proved 
to him. 

Second. On the necessity of the original oppositcdness 
of an objective and a subjective in consciousness. — In all 
thinking there is a thought which is not tliat thinking 
itself, in all consciousness there is something of which 
we are conscious, and which is not that consciousness 
itself. The truth of this assertion each one also must 
find in the self-contemplation of his procedure, and it 
cannot be proven to him from conceptions. It is true 
that afterwards we become conscious of our thinking 
as such, i.e., as a doing, and thereupon make it an object 
of our thinking ; and the ease and natural tendency to 
do this is what constitutes philosophical genius, without 
which no one will grasp the significance of transcendental 
philosophy. But even this is only possible if we im- 
perceptibly subsume under that thinking as merely 
thought, for only on this condition do we really think 
a thinking. 

Third. On the tharacter of the original objective, that it 
is to be something existing independently of thinking, 
hence something actual and in and through itself exist- 
ing. This also each one must convince himself of 
through internal contemplation, for although this relation 
of the objective to the subjective is developed in a 
science of knowledge, it is by no means proven from 
its conception, nor can it be so proven, since th» latter 
only becomes possible through that self-contemplatiou. 

The proof may be stated thus : It is the character of 
the Ego, that the acting and that which is acted upon he 
one and the same. This is the case when the Ego is 
thought. Only in so far as the thought is the same as 
the thinking do I hold the thought to be my self. But 
in the present case we are to have nothing to do with 



y 



TUE PRINCTPLE OF MORALITY. 27 

thinking. It is true that, since the thinking and the 
thought are one, I am myself tlic thinking; but our* 
l)roscnt proposition asserts that the thought, the objective, 
is to he Ego simply hy itself and independently of thinking, 
and is to be recognized in this manner as Ego, for our 
proposition asserts that it is found as Ego. 

Hence, in the thouglit as such, i.e., in so far as it is to 
be merely the objective and never the subjective, there 
must be an identity of the acting and that which is 
acted upon ; which, since the thought is to be merely an 
object, is an actual acting upon itself (not a mere con- 
templating of itself like the ideal activity), or in otlier 
words, an actual self-determining of itself through itself. 
But such an acting we call willing, and willing we only 
think as such an acting. Hence the proposition, to find 
my self, is absolutely identical with the proposition, to 
find my self willing. Only in so far as I find myself 
willing do I find myself, and in so far as I find myself 
I necessarily find myself willing. 

Hem AUK. 

It is clear that the proposition here proved, " "When 
I find myself I necessarily find myself willing," in order 
to be productive of categorical results must be pre- 
ceded by another one, to wit : " I necessarily find myself, 
become necessarily conscious of myself." This self-con- 
sciousness is proved, not as fact, for as such it is imme- 
diate, but in its connection with all other consciousness, 
and as reciprocally determining it in a fundamental 
science of knowledge ; and hence our present proposition, 
together with all the results which may flow from it, 
will itself become a necessary result as well as a con- 
dition of self-consciousness. It may be said of this 
proposition, and these its future results, so certain as I 
am I, or as I am self-conscious, so certain does this or 
that necessarily exist in and for me. And thus it 



28 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

appciira how our present science of morality is based 
on the common ground of all philosophy. 

•^^ B. Solution Continued. But willing itself is think- 
^ ^jT^ able only under the presupposition of a something 
distinct from the Ego. 

*^ -^ ' Proof. 

^^^Ni^^,_(> It is true that in philosophical abstraction we may 

speak of a willing in general, which on that very account 
is undetermined ; but all truly perceivaUe willing, such as 
we speak of here, is necessarily a determined willing, in 
which something is willed. To will sometliing is to 
require that a determined object, winch in the willing of 
it is only thought as possible — for if it were thought as 
\ actual the act would not be a willing, but a perceiv- 
; ing — shall become actual object of a perception. This 
requirement, therefore, clearly refers us to the external. 
Hence, all willing involves the postulate of an external 
object, and the conception of willing involves something 
which is not our self. 

But more than this. The possibility of postulating in 
the willing an external object presupposes already within 
us the conception of an externality in general, and this 
conception is only possible through experience. But this 
experience likewise is a relation of our self to something 
outside of us. In other words, th.^t which I will is never 
anything else than a modification of an object which is 
to be actually existing outside of me. All my willing is 
therefore conditioned by the perception of an external 
object, and in willing I do not perceive myself as I am 
in and for myself, but merely as I may become in a 
certain relation to external things. 

C. Solution Concluded. Hence, in order to find my 
true essence, I must abstract from this foreign character- 
istic in willing. That which remains after this abstraction 
is my pure being. 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 29 

Explanation. 

This proposition is the imnicdi<atc result of the previous 
propositions. Hence, we have only to investigate what 
that is which remains after having undertaken the 
required abstraction. -Willing, as such, is a first; is 
absolutely grounded in itself, and in nothing external 
whatsoever. Let us make clear tliis conception, upon 
which all depends here, and whicli can only be negatively 
comprehended and explained — since a first signifies merely 
that which is derived from nothing else, 'and absolutely 
grounded in itself signifies merely not grounded in any- 
thing else. 

Whatsoever is dependent, conditioned, or grounded 
through another may be cognized, in so far as it is thus, 
•mediately, namely, from a cognition of that upon which 
it depends, or in which it is grounded. Thus, for 
instance, if a ball is set in motion, I can certainly have 
immediate perception of its movement, of the point from 
which it starts, the point where it rests, and the celerity 
with which it moves; but I could likewise obtain a 
knowledge of all this if I were merely made acquainted 
with the conditions under which the ball rests, and the 
force of the stroke with which it is set in motion, 
although I had no immediate perception of the motion 
whatever. Hence the motion of the ball is considered as 
something dependent, or conditioned — as not primary. 
An absolute first, and in itself grounded somewhat, must 
therefore be of such a character that it cannot be cognized 
mediately through another, but pnly immediately through 
itself. It is what it is because it is so. 

In so far, therefore, as the willing is absolute and 
primary, it cannot be explained in any manner from 
something outside of the Ego, but only from the Ego 
itself. This absoluteness it is, therefore, which remains 
when we abstract from all foreign elements. 



30 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS, 

]Iemakk. 

That willing, in the siginncance here attached to it, 
does afiicar as absolute is a fact of consciousness which 
each one will fnid in himself, and wliicli cannot he 
> externally proved to anyone who has not this immediate 
/ knowledge of it as a fact. Nevertheless, it is quite 
possible that this appearance of it as absolute may be 
further explained and deduced, whereby the appearing 
absoluteness will itself be further explained and cease 
to be absoluteness, the appearance thereof changing into 
mere semblance. In a similar manner it also appears to 
us, as an immediate fact of consciousness, that certain 
things exist independently of us in time and space, and 
yet transcendental philosophy further explains and 
deduces this appearance; although it docs not change 
that appearance into a mere semblance, for reasons not 
• here to be stated. It is true no one will be able to 
furnish such an explanation of willing. Xevertheless, if 
anyone should say that willing has an external— and to 
us incomprehensible— ground, there can be no theoretical 
rational ground objected against the assertion, although 
it likewise can also prefer no ground in its favour. The 
truth is that when we resolve to consider this appearance 
as no further explicable, or, rather, as absolutely in- 
explicable—that is to say, as truth, and as our only 
truth, according to which all other truth must be judged 
and accepted ; and upon this resolve our whole philosophy 
is erected. In that case, we make this resolve not from 
any theoretical insight, but in consequence of a practical 
interest. I loill be independent: hence I resolve to 
consider myself independent. Such a resolve is called 
Faith. Hence our philosophy starts from a faith, anil 
knows it. Dogmatism, which, logically carried out, 
makes the same assertion, starts also from a faith (in 
the thing in itself), but generally does not know it. In 
our philosophy each one makes himself the absolute 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 31 

starting-point, or basis, of his ])hilosop]iy : hence our 
system appears as witliont a basis to all those who are 
incapable of doing so. But we can also assure all these, 
in advance, that they will never find a basis elsewhere, 
unless they are satisfied with this. It is necessary that 
our philosophy should say this openly, so that it may no 
longer be called upon to demonstrate externally to men 
what each one must create within himself. 

How do we think this absoluteness in willing ? 

In order to assist the reader at the very beginning in 
obtaining some insight into this conception (which is 
probably, in the abstractness it has received here, the 
most difficult of all conceptions in philosophy, although 
it will doubtless receive the highest clearness in the 
progress of our present science, the whole object of 
. which is merely to further determine this conception), 
we make use of an 

Illustration, 

Let the reader imagine a steel spring, bent together. 
There is doubtless in the spring a tendency to repel the 
pressure, hence a tendency outwards. Such a spring is 
the picture of an »actual willing, as the slaU or condition 
of a rational being ; but of it I do not speak here. Let 
me now ask what is the first ground (not condition) of 
this tendency, as a real and determined manifestation 
of the spring? Doubtless an inner action of the spring 
upon itself, a self-determination. For no one surely will 
say that the outward force which presses the spring is 
the ground of the spring's reacting against it. This self- 
determining is the same as the mere act of willing in 
the rational being. Both together would produce in the 
spring, if it could contemplate itself, the consciousness 
of a will to repel the pressing force. But all these 
moments are possible only on condition that such an 
external pressure is actually exercised upon the spring. 



32 



THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 



\\\ the Ramc way tho rational being cannot detennine 
itself to an actual willing, unless it stands in reciprocal 
relation with something external (for as such the rational 
being appears to itself). 

But this is also to be abstracted from, and hence we 
do not speak here of this moment any more than of 
the first-mentioned one. Now if we abstract from the 
external pressure altogether, does there yet remain any- 
thing whereby we think the steel spring as sucJi, and 
what is this remainder ? Evidently that, by whicii I 
judge the steel spring to have a tendency to repel any 
outside pressure as soon as it occurs ; hence the own inner 
tendency thereof to determine itself to react, or the real 
essence of elasticity as the final and no further explicable 
ground of all the appearances of the spring, whenever 
the conditions of its manifestation are given. (The very 
essential distinction between this original tendency in 
the steel spring, and the same in the rational being, 
will appear in the following investigations.) 




In the same manner in which we removed ail foreign 
elements from the conception of elasticity in the steel 
spring, we now proceed to remove all foreign elements 
in the Ego comprehended through its willing, and thus 
to arrive at a comprehension of its pure absolute- 
ness. 

/So far as the form of this problem is concerned, it is a 
problem to think the Ego in the required abstraction as 
a permanent, and hence that, through which it is to be 
comprehended and characterized in this thinking, must 
be an essential and permanent. Its manifestations and 
appearances can change, because the conditions under 
which it manifests itself change; but that which mani- 
fests itself under all these conditions remains always 
the same. 

So far as the content of the problem is concerned, that 
which is to be thought is to be the ground of an absolute 



THE PRINCfPLE OF MORALITY. 33 

willing. (All willing is altsolutc.) Wh;it, then, is it? 
Kacli one must have truly thought, together with us, that 
which we required him to think ; must have undertaken, 
together with us,. the prescribed abstractions; and must 
now observe himself internally, and see what it is tliat 
remains, what it is that he still thinks, after having 
removed all those foreign elements. Only thus can the 
required knowledge be infused into him. A name cannot 
make it clear, for the whole conception has never Ijeen 
thought before, much less named. But to give it a name, 
we will call it, absolute iendmcij to the absolute] absolute 
undeterminability through anything not itself; tendency 
absolutely to determine itself without any external per- 
suasion. It is not only a mere 'power, or faculty, for a 
faculty is not actual, but is merely that which we think 
in advance of our actuality, in order to be able to receive 
it in a series of our tiiinking ; and that which we have 
to think here is to be something actual, is to be that 
which constitutes the essence of the Ego. And yet this 
conception of a faculty is also involved in it. When 
related to the actual manifestation, which is only possilile 
on condition of a given object, it is in this relation the 
faculty or power of such manifestation. Neither is it 
an impulse, as one might call the ground of the elasticity 
in the steel spring ; for an impulse operates necessarily 
when the conditions of its operating are given, and 
operates in a materifilly determined manner. But con- 
cerning the Ego, we know as yet nothing in relation 
to this point, and are not allowed to make hasty judg- 
ments in advance of the investigation. 

Eesult. 

The essential character of the Ego, through which it 
distinguishes itself from all that is outside of it, consists 
in its tendency to self-activity for the sake of self- 
activity ; and it is this tendency which is thought, when 



34 THE SCIENCE OE ETHICS. 

the Ego is thouglit in and for itself without relation to 
anything external. 

Kemark. 

It must be remembered that the Ego is here considered 
only a8 object, but not as Ego in (jeneral. In the latter 
case, our above result would be utterly false. 



CHAPTER II. 

We have just shown what the Ego is, in and for itself; 
or, to express it more carefully, how the Ego must 
necessarily be thought, if it is thought solely as object. 

But the Ego is something only in so far as it posits 
itself (contemplates and thinks itself) as such, and 
the Ego is nothing so far as it does not posit itself. 
This is a proposition taken from and proved in the 
science of knowledge, and which we need therefore only 
explain here in a few words. 

A thing, and the utter opposite of a, thing, the Ego, 
or a rational being, are distinguished by this, that the 
thing merely is, without knowing of its being in the 
least, whereas in the Ego, being and consciousness join 
together ; the being of the Ego not being without 
self - consciousness of the Ego, and vice versa, no self- 
consciousness of the Ego without a being of that whereof 
it becomes conscious. All being relates to a conscious- 1 
ness, and even the existence of a thing cannot be thought 
without adding in thinking an intelligence which knows 
of this existence. But in the case of the thing this 
knowing is not posited in the thing, which is, but in 
an external intelligence ; whereas the knowing of the 
being of the Ego is posited in the same substance, which 
is; and only in so far as this immediate connection of 
consciousness and being is posited can it be said the 
Ego is this or that. 

Applying this to the present case, it follows that the 
Ego must know of that which we have established as 
the essence of the Ego, as sure as that is its essence. 

35 



36 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

Hore there is necessarily a consciousness of the descriljcd 
absolute tendency. It may be of advantage, not merely 
to state this result generally, but to enter upon a par- 
ticular description of this consciousness. We now proceed 
to undertake this task. 

Problem. To become definitely conscious of the con- 
sciousness of our original being. 

EXI'LANATOKY. 

It is self-evident that we are conscious whereof we 
speak, whether we speak philosophically or otherwise. 
Thus in the preceding chapter we became conscious of 
something. The object of our consciousness was pro- 
duced through free self-determination of our thinking 
faculty by means of an arbitrary abstraction. 

But at present we assert that the same object exists 
for us originally, i.e., independent of all philosophising, 
and necessarily forces itself upon us as sure as we have 
any consciousness at all. If this is true, then an original 
consciousness thereof exists, though perhaps not precisely 
as of a single oliject, in the same abstraction in which we 
have just established it. Perhaps it may always occur in 
this original consciousness, in and together with another 
thought, as a determination of that thouglit. 

Now let us ask — Is, then, this original consciousness 
differently constituted from that which we have just now 
produced in us through philosophizing ? How were this 
possible, since the same is to be its object, and since the 
philosopher has surely no other subjective form of think- 
ing than the connnon and original form of thinking of 
universal reason ? 

Why, then, do we seek what we already possess ? We 
have it without knowing it; and at present we only 
j^ want to produce this knowing of it within us. The 

rational being is constituted in such a manner as rarely 
to observe its own thinking when thinking, but only the 



THE PRTNCirLE OF MORALITY. 37 

olijcct of its thinking; or as nsually to lose itself, the 
subject, in the object. Nevertheless, philosophy is, above 
aTl, anxious to know the subject as such in order to 
obtain a judi,'mcnt concerning its influence upon the; 
determination of the object. This can only be done if 
the mere reflection is made the ol)ject of a new reflection. 
To tiie non-philosopher it may seem curious and, per- 
haps, ridiculous to require anyone to become conscious of 
a consciousness \ but this would only prove his ignorance 
of philosophy and his inability to philosophize. 

Genetical Descuiption of the Consciousness of 
Our Original Being. 

The Ego has the absolute power of contemplation, for 
only through it is it Ego. This power can be no further 
deduced, and needs no further deduction. With the 
positing of an Ego this power is posited. 

^Again, the Ego can and must contemplate what it is. 
The peculiar determination of contemplation, here postu- 
lated, requires likewise no deduction or mediation througli 
external grounds. The Ego contemplates itself because it 
does, so far as regards the mere fact. 

Now let us proceed to determine this fact; in doing 
which we shall and must calculate in each reader upon 
his own self-active generation of that whereof we speak, 
and upon his close observation of that which will arise 
within him when he thus generates. 

A. The contemplating intelligence posits the above 
described tendency to absolute activity as itself, or as 
identical w^ith itself, the intelligence that absoluteness 
of real activity thus becomes the true essence of the 
intelligence, and is brought under the authority of the 
conception, whereby alone it first becomes true freedom: 
absoluteness of the absoluteness, absolute power to make 
itself absolute. Through the consciousness of its abso- 
luteness the Ego tears itself loose from itself, and posits 
itself as independent. 



38 THE SCIENCE OE ETHICS. 

Explanatory. 

Let me explain this expression : it tears itself loose 
from itself. All contemplation, as such, is to be directed 
upon something existing independently of it, and exist- 
ing precisely as it is contemplated. It is tlic same witli 
the contemplation whereof we s[»eak here. The Ego as 
absolute is to have had existence before it was seized in 
contemplation, and this absoluteness is to constitute its 
independent being, apart from all contemplation of it. 
Now, where the contemplated is something outside of the 
contemplating, the intelligence is altogether passive in 
its observation. Such is not to be the case in our 
instance. Here the contemplated is itself the contem- 
plating ; not immediately as such, it is true, but it is the 
same one essence, power, and substance as the contem- 
plating. Hence the intelligence is in this instance not 
merely a passive observer, but rather becomes for itself 
absolute real power of the conception. The Ego, as 
absolute power with consciousness, tears itself loose from 
the Ego, as the given absolute without power and con- 
sciousness. 

It is well to dwell somewhat longer upon this chiof 
thought, which may seem dihicult to many, but upon 
the direct comprehension whereof the possibility of 
understanding our whole system depends. 

Let the reader once more think of an elastic steel 
spring. It is true that the spring contains within itself 
the principle of a peculiar movement, which is not given to 
the spring externally, but which ratlier resists the direc- 
tion given it from without. Nevertheless you will doubt- 
less hesitate to ascribe that which you have hitherto very 
properly called freedom to the spring. Whence this 
hesitation ? If you should say, " Because the resistance 
follows from the nature of the spring, and from the 
circumstance of an external pressure upon it with in- 
evitable necessity," I am willing to remove this inevit- 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 39 

able necessity. I will permit you to assume that the 
steel spring, at some time, resists the pressure from an 
unknown reason, and at another time from an unknown 
reason cedes to tlic pressure. Are you now going to call 
such a steel spring free ? I do not believe it. The con- 
ception of freedom, instead of facilitating the connection 
of freedom with the spring, rather asks you to think 
something absolutely unthinkable, namely, blind chance ; 
and you will persist in saying that although you do not 
know througli what tlie spring is determined to resist, 
you are sure that the spring is thus determined, and does 
not determine itself to resist, and that the spring can, 
therefore, not be called free. 

Now, let me ask you, what do you think when you 
think " to be determined " in opposition to " self-deter- 
mined," and what is it you require for the possibility 
of the latter ? We will try to make this clear ; and 
since you found it impossible to do anything with the 
thought of a free thing as a thing dependent upon blind 
chance, nor found that thought to facilitate the con- 
nection of freedom with a thing, we shall commence witli 
it. You said, then, the steel spring is determined by its 
nature to resist external pressure. What does this mean ? 
In thus asking. What does it mean ? I do not propose that 
you shall acquire an external knowledge, or discover nev/ 
results by progressive conclusions from an acquired 
knowledge. That which I ask for, you think at this 
very moment, and you have always thought it, even 
before you resolved to philosophize ; and I merely ask 
that you shall make clear to yourself what you really 
think, or that you shall but understand what you say. 
The nature of the thing is its fixed being, without 
internal movement, quiet and dead ; and such a hxed 
being you posit necessarily when you posit a thing 
and a nature thereof, for such a positing is precisely 
the thinking of a thing. Now, together with this un- 
changeable permanency of the thing, you posit that under 



40 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

a certain condition a change will result in tlie tiling. 
For that which you liave posited w?, jb^ed 'mmX linckan/jcal/le 
is the nature of the thing, which docs not depend upon 
the thing, since the thing is itself its own nature, and its 
nature is the thing itself. When you think the one, you 
necessarily think the other also, and you will surely not 
say that the thing exists in advance of its own nature, 
and determines its own nature. But having once posited 
this nature of the thing, you proceed in your thinking 
from a being (of the nature of tlie thing) to another 
being (of the manifestation of this nature under certain 
conditions), and this progression of your thinking describes 
a steady series of being. Expressing the same subjectively, 
your contemplation is always tied down, is always merely 
passively observing, and there is not a moment in the 
series when it miglit become self-productive; and this 
condition of your thinking is precisely that which you 
call the thinking of necessity, and through which you 
deny all freedom to the object of such thinking. 

We have, therefore, discovered the ground why you 
find it absolutely impossible to think freedom in our 
present case, and in all similar cases. Expressing it 
objectively, all being which flows itself from a being is a 
necessary being, and not a product of freedom. Express- 
ing it subjectively, the conception of a necessary being 
arises in us through the connecting of one being with 
another being. 

From this you will now be able to conclude, through 
opposition, what it is you require in order to think free- 
dom, which you surely can think, and always have thought. 

You require a being which shall have, not no ground 
at all — for such you cannot think — but a ground in 
something which is not again a being. Now, besides 
being, we only have thinking. Hence, a being which 
you may be able to think as product of freedom nmst 
proceed from a thinking. Let us see whether this pre- 
supposition makes freedom comprehensible. 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 41 

Something which is not determined, but dciermines 
itself, is to be called force. Is tliis active determininc^ 
comprehensible when presupposed as occurrinff througli 
a tliinlcinrjl Undoubtedly, provided we are but able to 
think thinking itself, and do not again make a thing out 
of our conception. The reason why we could not derive 
freedom from a being was because the conception of a 
being involved that of a fixed permanency. But such 
permanent being does not hinder us when we derive 
freedom from thinking, since thinking is not posited as 
something permanent, remaining, etc., but as agility 
[Agilität = producing activity], and only as agility, of the 
intelligence. 

To be posited as free, something must be posited as 
determining itself. Such was your assertion. (It must 
not only be not determined through an external other, 
but also not through its own nature.) What does that 
Itself mean ? It doubtless involves the thought of a 
twofold. The free is to he, before it is determined ; it is 
to have an existence independent of its determinedness. 
A thing cannot be thought as determining itself precisely 
because it has not being in advance of its nature, or of 
the system of its determinedness. But the intelligence, 
with its conception of real being, is in advance of that 
real being, and the former contains the ground of the 
latter. The conception of a certain being precedes that 
being, and the latter is dependent upon the former. 

Our assertion is, therefore, that only the intelligent 
can be thought as free, and that the intelligence becomes 
free only through thus seizing itself as intelligence, for 
only thus does it subsume its being under something 
which is higher than all being, namely, the conception. 
Somebody might object that in our own argumentation 
(in the preceding chapter) the absoluteness is presupposed 
as a being; and that the reflection which is now to 
achieve such great wonders is evidently itself conditioned 
through that absoluteness, having it for its object, and 



42 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

is neitlicr reflection in general nor this particular reflec- 
tion, unless an object in general and this particular object 
are presupposed. To this objection we reply that it will 
appear hereafter how this absoluteness itself is required 
for, and results from, the possibility of an intelligence in 
general, and that hence the above proposition may also 
be reversed as follows: only that which is free can be 
thought as an intelligence; an intelligence is necessarily 
free. 

B. The Ego, in contemplating that tendency to absolute 
activity as itself, posits itself as free, i.e., as a power to 
have causality through the mere conception. 

Explanatory. 

Freedom is, according to Kant, the power to absolutely 
begin a condition or being. This is an excellent nominal 
explanation ; and yet it seems to have been of little value 
in effecting a better insight into freedom. For that ex- 
planation did not answer the higher question: how a 
condition or being could have an absolute beginning, or 
how such an absolute beginning could be thought; by 
which auswer a genetical conception of freedom would 
have been generated before our very eyes. Now this wc 
have just done. The absolutely beginning condition is 
not connected with nothingness— for the finite rational 
being necessarily thinks through mediation and connec- 
tion. But it begins with thinking itself— not with a 
being but with thinking. 

In Older to establish the conception in this manner, it 
is certainly necessary to walk, and to be able to walk, 
the path of the science of knowledge, to be able to 
abstract from all being, as such (or from the fact), and 
to start from that which is higher than all being, from 
contemplating and thinking, or from the acting of the 
intelligence in general. The same path, which alone 
leads to the right end in the theoretical philosophy in 



THE PRINCTPLE OF MORALITY. 43 

explaining l)eing, is the path whicli also alone makes 
practical philoso])hy jxKssible. Tiiis lilccwiso makes more 
clear our previous expression : " The Ego posits itself as 
independent." The first view of this proposition, namely, 
"The Ego gathers up all that it originally is — and 
originally it is nothing unless free — in the contemplation 
and conception of itself" we have already explained 
completely. But that proposition involves something 
more. For all that the Ego can be in aduality, when 
the conception becomes cognition, and when the intelli- 
gence is the mere passive observer of the external world, 
originally depends, after all, upon the conception. What- 
soever the Ego is to become, the Ego must first make 
itself to be through the conception, and whatsoever the 
Ego will be in the future it most surely will have made 
itself through the conception. Hence the Ego is its 
own ground in every respect, and absolutely 2^osits itself 
even in a practical significance. 

But the Ego only posits itself as a faculty or power. 
This must, and can, be strictly proven. For the 
tendency to have absolute activity conies under the 
authority of the intelligence, as we have seen. But 
the intelligence, as such, is — as each one must discover 
in contemplating himself as intelligence, and as cannot 
be demonstrated to anybody — al^solutely determining 
itself a mere pure activitij, in opposition to all inrmanent 
and 2^osited being, however finely conceived ; hence it is 
capable of no determination through its nature or essence, 
or through a tendency, impulse, or inclination in it. 
Hence also such an inclination, however finely conceived, 
is not possible in that power of activity which is under 
the control of the intelligence, in so far as it is under 
such control; which active power is therefore to be 
thought as a mere pure faculty, i.e., as merely a concep- 
tion, to which an actuality can, in thinking, be connected 
as to its ground, although there is not in it the least 
datum to show what sort of an actuality it will be. 



CHAPTER III. 

It must have appeared strange to tlie reader tliat, in the 
preceding chapter, we deduced from a reflection of a 
tendency a consciousness, which has no similarity to a 
tendency at all, and that we thus appeared to lose 
sight utterly of the real character of this tendency. 
According to the principle upon which our argument, in 
the preceding chapter, was based, tlie Ego is only that 
as which it posits itself. Now the Ego is to be originally 
a tendency. The Ego must, therefore, have this character 
for itself — must become conscious of this, its character. 
The question is, therefore, not at all whether such a 
consciousness does occur in the Ego, but simply hoiu 
this consciousness may be constituted in its form? We 
shall obtain the required insight best by causing this 
consciousness to form itself under our very eyes. Hence 
it is our 

Problem. To see in what manner the Ego becomes 
conscious of its tendency to absolute self -activity, as 
such tendency. 

Explanatory. 

In our previous chapter we proceeded by absolutely 
postulating a reflection upon the objective Ego under 
consideration ; undoubtedly justified in so doing, since 
the Ego is necessarily intelligence, and an intelligence un- 
conditionally contemplating itself. We, the philosophers, 
were mere spectators of a self-contemplation on the part 
of the original Ego, and that which we established was 

44 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 45 

not our own tliouglit but a thought of the Ego; tho 
object of our rellcction was itself a rcllection. 

In the present chni)tcr \vc likewise calculate — provided 
we can solve our problem at nil — upon arriving at such 
an original reflection of the Ego ; but we cannot well 
take our starting-point from it. For the mere postulate 
of a reflection results in nothing further than what we 
have already discovered, and found to be insufiicient, 
namely, the consciousness of a mere facidty, or power, 
but on no account of a tendency, or impulse. To state 
the distinction briefly, the reflection of our previous 
chapter was absolutely possil)le, but the one of the present 
chapter must first be grounded in its possibility, which 
grounding we now undertake through our philosophizing. 

• Solution. 

A. The posited tendency necessarily manifests itself 
as impulse in the whole Ego. 

Remarks. 

A particular proof of this assertion is not needed, 
resulting, as it does, from a mere analysis of what has 
been established in our first chapter. The tendency is 
posited as the essence of the Ego, and hence belongs, as 
such, to the Ego, and cannot be abstracted from, without 
cancelling the Ego. But as mere tendency it is impulse, 
i.e., real internal explanatory ground of an actual self- 
activity. Now an impulse which is posited as essential, 
permanent, and ineradicable, impels, and this is its 
manifestation : both expressions express precisely the 
same. 

Now, if we think the Ego, in which the impulse is, 
merely objectively, then the working of the impulse is 
comprehensible easily enough ; it will efiect a self-activity 
as soon as the external conditions are given ; precisely as 
was the case with the steel spring. The act will follow 



46 THE SCIENCE OE ET ///CS. 

from the im])nlse, like tlic effect from its cause. Nay, we 
may even add, in thought, the intelligence, but in such a 
manner as to have it dependent upon the ohjectivc quali- 
tativencss; and the impulse will be accompanied by a 
yearning, or the deed by a resolve, with the same 
necessity — if the conditions are but given — with which 
the deed resulted from the impulse. 

We may think the Ego thus merely oljjectively in 
relation to the impulse, and will be forced to think it 
thus hereafter; but at present this repeated separation 
in a conception which we have composed already would 
serve us nothing, and only tend to distract our attention. 
A systematical progression requires that we should 
further determine our last result as we found it, and 
hence we must not think the Ego here objectively, but, 
as we have established it in the preceding chapter, 
objectively and subjectively together. Tliis is the 
significance of the term, the whole Ego, which we made 
use of above. 

Perhaps it may be well to state this still clearer. The 
Egoness, then, consists in the absolute identity of the 
subjective and objective, in the absolute union of being 
with consciousness, and of consciousness with being. 
Neither the subjective nor the objective, but an identity, 
is the essence of the Ego ; and we mention the former 
twofold only to designate the empty spot of this identity. 
Kow, can anyone think this identity as himself ? Of 
course not; for in order to think himself he rmcst make 
that very distinction hctivccn the subjective and objective, 
which is not to be made in that conception of the 
identity. Without this distinction, indeed, no thinking 
whatsoever is possible. Hence we never think both 
(the subjective and the objective) together, but always 
one after the other, and through this very thinking of 
the one after the other, we always think the one as 
dependent upon the other. Hence it is very natural, to 
be sure, that one should ask, am I because / think myself, 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 47 

or ilo I think myself because I am? ]5ut such a because 
and such a therefore does not occur liere at all. You 
are neither of the two because you are the other; you 
are not twofold in any manner, but absolutely one ; and 
you are this unthinkable one absolutely because you 
are it. 

This conception, which is only to be described as the 
problem of a thinking, but which can never be thought 
itself, points out an empty place in our investigation, 
which we shall call X. The Ego cannot, for the reason 
stated, comprehend itself ; it is absolutely = X. 

Now this whole Ego, in so far as it is neither subject 
nor object, but subject-object, has, in itself, a tendency 
to absolute self-activity, which, if separated from the 
substance itself, and thought as ground of its activity, 
is an impulse which impels it. Should anyone still 
doubt our authority to relate this impulse to the whole 
Ego, we can easily remove that doubt now, by a separa- 
tion of the Ego, which is permissible here. Eor the Ego, 
in reflecting upon itself, according to the preceding 
chapter, posits that which is involved in its objectivity, 
as itself, even in so far as it is reflecting or subjective. 
Now the objective doubtless contains an impulse, and 
this impulse is changed through the reflection into an 
impulse upon the subjective ; and since the Ego consists, 
in the main, of both, it becomes an impulse directed upon 
the whole Ego. 

But how this impulse can manifest itself in the whole 
Ego cannot be determined here, particularly as even that 
upon which it is directed is absolutely incomprehensible. 
We can only say negatively that it cannot manifest itself 
with necessity and mechanical action, since the Ego, in its 
subjectivity, has placed its power of activity under the 
authority of its thinking, and since its thinking is not 
determinable through anything external, but only through 
itself. 



48 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

B. From this manifestation of the impulse tliere does 
not result a feeling. 

Eemauks. 

Feeling in general is the mere immediate relation of 
the objective, in the Ego, to the subjective in the same, 
of its being to its consciousness ; and the power of feeling 
is the true point of union of both, though only in so far 
— as appears from our above description — as the sub- 
jective is considered as dependent upon the ol^jective. 
(For in so far as the objective is considered as dependent 
upon the subjective, the point of union of both is the 
will?) 

This can be made clearer as follows: — The objective 
in the Ego is determined, moved, or changed without 
any action of its own, and precisely like the mere thing. 
But since the Ego is never merely objective, the subjective 
always being united with it in the same one and un- 
divided essence, there necessarily arises with the change 
of the objective a change of the subjective, and hence 
a consciousness of that change in the objective ; but this 
consciousness appears as if it were produced in the same 
mechanical manner as that in which the change is pro- 
duced. This is the peculiar characteristic of feeling. In 
representation, the representing subject is also, it is true, 
merely passive, i.e., when the representation is directed 
upon any actual external being ; but in feeling there is 
no consciousness on the part of the subject of any 
internal agility, whereas in representation this conscious- 
ness certainly arises in regard to tlie form of the 
representation. In representation, I certainly do not 
produce the represented, but I certainly produce the 
act of representing it ; whereas in feeling I produce 
neither the felt nor the act of feeling. It is impossible 
to determine these distinctions more closely through 
conception, and even the distinctions specified here have 
no meaning, unless made clear by each one to himself 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 49 

through contemplation of himself in these various con- 
ditions. Such descriptions as we have attempted here 
are nob to replace hut merely to guide self-contemplation. 

It is true that we shall soon meet a determinateness of 
the merely objective Ego through the impulse of absolute 
self-activity, and that we shall moreover deduce also 
feeling from this determinateness. But at present we 
are not speaking of any determinateness of the merely 
objective, but of the wlioU Ego = X. Can a feeling result 
from this determinateness? 

A feeling presupposes, according to our description, 
partly the dependence of the merely objective upon an 
impulse, and partly tlie dependence of the suljjective 
upon the objective. In the present case, the latter 
dependence has not been posited at all as possible, for 
both the subjective and oljjective are not to be con- 
sidered as distinct, but rather as absolutely one, and 
have been determined as thus absolutely one. What 
this one may be, and what may be its determinateness, 
is incomprehensible to us, as we have seen. But in order 
to comprehend at least something, we can only begin 
with one of the two parts into which we necessarily 
separate, or into which this one necessarily separates. 
Now since it is the Ego whereof we speak, in so far 
as its objective is to stand under the authority of the 
subjective, it will be most proper to begin with the 
subjective. 

The Ego as intelligence, therefore, is immediately 
determined through the impulse. A determination of 
the intelligence is a thought. Hence: 

C. From the manifestation of the impulse there results 
necessarily a thought. 

(it has been previously stated that the intelligence, as 
absolute agility, is not capable of any determination 
whatever; that it brings forth its thoughts, but that no 

E 



50 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

thouglits can be brought forth in it. Tlic j^rcscnt state- 
ment might seem to be a contradiction of that previous 
result, but it will be apparent hereafter that both state- 
ments may well go together.) 

I. We therefore proceed to determine this thought, 
and in doing so first investigate it in regard to its form. 

A determined thinking, such as we reflect upon at 
present, appears either as determined through a being 
— namely, when the thought is to be an actual object, 
in which case the thought results in our consciousness as 
it does simply because the thing is as it is — or as deter- 
mined through another thinking; in winch latter case 
we say it results from this other thinking, and we then 
attain an insight into a series of rational grounds. 

Neither case occurs in our present instance. Our 
thought is not dctcrmiiud through a being, because we 
do not think an objective determinatencss, not even that 
of the objective Ego, but of the whole Ego ; and it is not 
determined through a thinking, because in this thought 
the Ego thinks itself, and thinks itself in its fundamental 
essence, but not with derived predicates ; and because this 
thinking of the Ego, particularly in this respect, is not 
conditioned by any other thinking, but rather conditions 
itself all other thinking. 

Hence this thought is not conditioned and determined 
through anything outside of it, neither through a being 
nor through a thinking, but absolutely through itself 
alone. It is a first immediate thinking. Strange as such 
an assertion may appear at the first glance, it follows 
correctly from the established premises, and is most 
important as well for the particular philosophical science 
which we establish here, as for the whole transcendental 
philosophy. It must be carefully noted therefore. 

Through it, thinking is rendered absolute in regard to 
its form ; we obtain a series, which absolutely commences 
with a thought, which itself is grounded in nothing 
besides, and connected with nothing else. Eor the fact 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 51 

that wc have just now in our philosopliizing grounded 
tliis thought, moreover, in an im])ulse, has no influence 
upon common consciousness, which hegins with it, and 
is not a consciousness of the estahhshed grounds ; as, 
indeed, wc have proven. 

It is also to be remarked tliat this relation of the . 
subjective to the objective is truly the original relation 
in the Ego; and that the opposite relation, wherein the 
thouglit is posited as dependent upon the being, is 
grounded in this first relation, and must be derived from 
it. (To establish this deduction is the business of another 
branch of philosophy ; though we shall also have to recur 
to it hereafter.) 

But the described thought is also absolute in regard 
to its content, it is thought as it is thought simply 
because it is thus thought. This is of particular impor- 
tance for our present science, lest some should be induced, 
as has occurred frequently, to attempt a further explana- 
tion and deduction of the consciousness of our duties (for 
as such the described thought will soon show itself to 
be), which attempt is futile, involving an impossibility, 
and is also derogatory to the dignity and absoluteness 
of the moral law. In short, this thinking is the absolute 
principle of our being; through it we absolutely consti- 
tute, and in it consists, our being. For the essence of 
our being is not a material permanent, as that of 
lifeless things, but rather a consciousness, and moreover 
a determined consciousness. 

That we think this thinking we know immediately, for 
thinking is precisely this immediate consciousness of the 
determinateness of ourself as intelligence ; and in the 
present case of an intelligence, purely as such. An 
innnediate consciousness is called contemplation; and 
since the contemplation here is not directed upon an 
external being by means of feeling, but rather upon the 
intelligence immediately as such, it is called very properly 
intcUcclual contemplation. It is, indeed, the only one 



52 THE SCIENCE OE ETHICS. 

wliich originalb/ and actwdly occurs in every man 
without the freedom of philosophical abstraction. The 
intellectual contemplation, whicli the transcendental 
philosopher requires of all students, is the mere form of 
this actual intellectual contemplation, is the mere con- 
. templation of the inner absolute spontaneity of the same, 
with ntter abstraction from its determinateness. "Without 
this actual contemplation, the philosophical contemplation 
were not possilile; our thinking is originally determined 
originally and not abstract. • 

2. We now proceed to describe that thought in regard 
to its content. 

The whole Ego is determined through the impulse to 
have absolute self-activity, and it is this determinateness 
which is thought in our present thinking. Jjut tlie 
whole Ego cannot be comprehended, and hence, likewise, 
not immediately a determinateness of the whole Ego. 
It is only through reciprocal determination of the sub- 
jective and the objective that we can approximate the 
determinateness of the whole Ego, and we shall now 
attempt to do so. 

Let us first think the subjective determined through 
the objective. The essence of objectivity is an absolute 
unchangeable permanency. Applying this to the subjec- 
tive, we arrive at a permanent unchangeable, or, in other 
words, at a necessary thinking, a law of thinking. Xow, 
the determining impulse is an impulse to absolute self- 
activity. Hence, there results as content of the deduced 
thought: that the intelligence must give to itself an 
irrevocable law to realize absolute self-activity. 

Let us now think the objective determined through the 
subjective. The subjective is the positing of an absolute 
but completely undetermined power of freedom, as 
described in our previous chapter. This is to deter- 
mine, to produce, and condition the described objective. 
In other words, the thought just now established (that 
the intelligence must propound to itself a law to realize 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 53 

absolute self-activity), is possible only on condition that 
the Ego thinks itself as free. 

But each is reciprocally to determine the other. Tliat 
is to say, the described self-legislation of the Ego occurs 
only when the Ego thinks itself as free, but if the ]*]go 
thinks itself as free it occurs necessarily. Thus, then, 
the admitted diOiculty of conceiving a determinateness 
of the thinking is likewise removed ; for the described 
thought does not occur necessarily, since in that case 
thinking would cease to be thinking (tliere being no 
freedom), and the subjective would change into an objec- 
tive ; but it occurs necessarily only as thinking thinks 
with alisolute freedom that very freedom. Strictly speak- 
ing, therefore, this thought is not a particular thought, 
but merely the necessary 7nanner of thinking our freedom. 
(This is very important.) It is the same witli all other 
necessity of thinking. Such necessity -is not absolute 
necessity, which, indeed, is not possible, since all thinking 
starts from a free thinking of our self; but it is merely 
conditioned by our thinking anything at all. If we think 
anything, then we must nceessarily think in this or that 
manner ; such is altogetlier the character of necessity in 
thinking. 

It is still to be observed that this thought grounds 
itself upon an impulse, and hence must retain the 
character of an impulse, which character is that of a 
postulate. The content of the deduced thought may, 
therefore, be described, in short, as follows : We are 
forced to think, that we are to determine ourselves 
through conceptions with consciousness, and to determine 
ourselves thus according to the conception of absolute 
self-activity, and this thinking is the very consciousness 
of our original tendency to absolute self-activity which 
we were looking for. 



CHAPTER IV. 

Strictly speaking, our clcduction is now ended. Its real 
object was, as our readers know, to deduce the thought 
that we are to act in a certain manner from the system 
of reason in general, or to show that the supposition of 
a rational being involves necessarily also the supposition 
that such a being thinks this thought. Such a deduction 
is absolutely required for the science of a system of 
reason, which science is itself its own end. 

But such a deduction involves many other advantages 
besides. Apart from the fact that we comprehend 
nothing truly and well which we do not see arise 
from ite grounds, and that hence we can attain com- 
plete insight into the morality of our being only through 
such a deduction, it is likewise to be considered that the 
comprehensibility which this deduction tlirows upon the 
categorical imperative of Kant will remove from it the 
appe°arance of an occult quality which it has hitherto 
borne (though without the positive fault of Kant), and 
will thus be the surest means to annihilate the dark 
region which that part of Kant's system left open 
hitherto for various visionary theories to take refuge 
in. Hence, also, it is all the more important to dissi- 
pate completely, by manifold and freer views, the dark- 
ness which may still rest upon our own deduction, but 
■.which we could not thus dissipate well so long as we 
were confined by the chains of systematic de^'elopment. 
I. The chief point of our deduction may be also stated 
as follows: The rational being, considered as such, is 
absolutely and independently its own ground. It is 



54 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 55 

ori^dnally (i.e., without any activity on its part) abso- 
lutely nothing, and whatsoever it is to he it must first 
make itself by its own activity. 

This proposition is not i)roven, nor can it be proven. 
It is absolutely demanded that each rational being should 
thus find and accept itself. 

In this manner, therefore, does each reader tliink 
himself. Now tell me, what is it really that you do 
think when you think what I have required of you ? 
For I do not ask you to go beyond that conception, Init 
merely to make it clear to yourself by pure analysis. 

The rational beim? is itself to bring forth whatsoever 
it is actually to be. Hence you must ascribe to the 
rational being, in advance of all actual (objective) being 
thereof, some sort of an existence, as, indeed, we have 
shown already in the previous chapter. This sort of 
existing can be none other than an existence as intelli- 
gence in and with conceptions. In your present con- 
ception of a rational being you must, therefore, have 
thought it as an intelligence. You must, moreover, have 
ascribed to this intelligence the power of producing a 
being through its mere conception, since you presuppose 
it as intelligence for the very sake of discovering a 
ground of being. In one word : in your conception of a 
rational being you have thought precisely what we have 
deduced in our second cliapter under the name of freedom. 

But now tell me — for upm this consideration every- 
thing depends — how much have you gained in making 
your conception of a rational being conceivable to you ? 
When you thought the described characteristics, did you 
think self-determination as essence of the Ego ? By no 
means ; you merely tiiouglit an empty undetermined 
power of self-determining. This thought merely makes 
possible the thought of an independent self-determined 
being, but does not make it actual, as which you certainly 
thought it first. For a power, or faculty, is something 
to which you merely can connect an actual being as to 



56 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

its ground — if such actual beinc,^ were, for instance, 
externally given to you ; but you are not compelled to 
derive such actual hciwj from it as its ground,. The con- 
ception of a power, or faculty, involves not the least 
indication that an actuality, and vjhat sort of an actuality, 
will result from it. Perhaps that power of self-determin- 
ing might never be used, or miglit be used only at times, 
in which case you would receive either no self-determina- 
tion, or an interrupted self-determination, i.e., which 
would not be permanent, would not constitute the essence. 

It was not in this manner that you thought the self- 
determination of the rational being in the conception I 
have asked you to analyse. You did not posit that 
independence of the rational being as problematical, but 
as categorical, or as the essence of reason. What it sig- 
nifies to posit something as essential has been sufificiently 
explained, namely, to posit something as necessarily 
and inseparably involved in the conception ; as posited 
together with the positing of the conception. But if 
you thought self-determination as the necessary essence 
of reason, then you posited self-determination and freedom 
as necessity, which is a contradiction, and which you 
cannot, therefore, have possibly thought. In nevertheless 
thinking this permanent character of reason, you must, 
therefore, have thought it in such a manner as to make 
possible at the same time the thinking of freedom. Your 
determinateness was a determinateness of the free intelli- 
gence ; but such a determinateness is a necessary thinlciny 
(on the part of the intelligence) of self-determination, as 
the rule by which the intelligence must necessarily resolve 
freely to determine itself. 

Your conception of self-determination, therefore, in- 
volves both the power and the law to uninterruptedly 
exercise this power ; and you cannot think your concep- 
tion without thinking these both united. Thus it has 
appeared to you who freely resolved to philosophize, and 
thus it will appear — since you philosophize according to 



TUE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 57 

universal laws of reason — to every rational being, and 
more especially to that rational ])eing which wo have 
here posited as representative of reason in general, \uidc;r 
the name of the original ]*]go, and the system of thinking 
whereof we arc about to establish. If the Ego thinks 
itself self-determined — and it is from this presupposition 
that we start — then it necessarily thinks itself as free, 
and — which is of chief importance to us here — it thinks 
this its freedom under the law of self-determination. 
This is tlie significance of our deduction. 

But there are other ways of showing the necessity of 
our deduced thought. Let the rational being think itself 
free in the above merely formal significance of the wonl. 
But it is finite, and each object of its reflection is 
limited or determined for it through the mere reflection. 
Hence, also, its freedom becomes limited or determined 
for it. But what is a determinateness of freedom as 
sucli ? We have just seen it. 

Or, let me express it from the profoundest depth of 
the system of transcendental philosophy, and in tlie 
most decided and comprehensive manner. I am identity 
of subject and object = X. Now, since I can only think 
objects, and then separate a subject from them, I 
cannot think such an X. Hence, I think myself as 
subject and object. I unite both by reciprocally deter- 
mining each through the otlier according to the law of 
causality. ]\Iy objective, determined through my sub- 
jective, results in the conception of freedom as of a 
power of self-determination. My subjective, determined 
through my objective, results in the thought of the 
necessity to determine myself through my freedom only 
in accordance with the conception of self-determination, 
which thought, since it is the thought of my original 
determinateness, is an immediate first and absolute 
thought. Now, neither is to be thought alone; not my 
objective dependent upon ray subjective, nor my sub- 
jective dependent upon my objective, but both are to 



58 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

bo thought as absolutely one. I think it as one by 
reciprocally determining the one through the other in 
their stated determinateness, i.e., l)y thniking freedom 
as determining the law, and the law as determining the 
freedom. One is not thouglit witliout the other, and 
when the one is thought the other is also tliought. 
When you think yourself as free, you are forced to think 
your freedom as acting under a law ; and wlien you think 
this law you are forced to think yourself as free, since it 
presupposes your freedom, and announces itself to be a 
law for your freedom. 

Freedom does not follow from the law, nor does the 
law follow from freedom. Both are not two thoughts, 
each of which were thought apart from the other, but 
both are one and the same thought. It is a complete 
synthesis (according to the law of reciprocal determina- 
tion), as, indeed, was stated above. Kant, in various 
places, derives the conviction of our freedom from the 
consciousness of the moral law. This is to be understood 
as follows: The appearance of freedom is an immediate 
fact of consciousness, and is on no account derived from 
another thought. Nevertheless, someone might want to 
explain this appearance again, and thus to turn it into 
a mere seeming. Now, there is no theoretical, but only a 
practical, reason why we should not attempt any further 
explanation, which practical reason is the firm resolve to 
recognise practical reason as the superior, and the moral 
law as the true and final destination of our being; and 
not to turn this moral law again into a mere show, as is 
certainly possible to a free imagination. Now, by not 
going beyond this appearance of freedom in us, that 
appearance becomes reality for us. For the proposition, 
I am free— freedom is the only true being, and the ground 
of all other being— is a very different proposition from 
the one, I a'pjpcar to myself as being free. It is, there- 
fore, the faith in the objective validity of this appearance 
which is to be deduced from the consciousness of the 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 59 

moral law. I am truly free is tlic first article of faith 
which opens us a path and transition into the world of 
reason, and prepares a firm basis for it. This faitli is, at 
the same time, tlie point of nnion of both worlds, and 
from it our system, which is to embrace both worlds, 
takes its starting-point. ])oing cannot be deduc(!d from 
being, since tlie former would thereby be changed into a 
seeming, and I mvM not hold it for a seeming. Hence, on 
the contrary, all being is to be derived from doing. The 
reality wliich being gains thereby docs not detract fronr 
our true destination, but is rather a gain for it. The 
Ego is not to be deduced from the Non Ego, and Life not 
from death ; but the Non Ego on the contrary, is to l^e 
deduced from the Ego, and, hence, it is from the Ego that 
all philosophy must proceed. 

2. The deduced thought has been called a law. It has 
also been called by Kant a categorical imperative ; and 
the manner in which we think in this thought has been 
called a shaU-ing;, in opposition to being; and common 
sense has found itself surprisingly well expressed in 
these designations. We shall show how these same views 
proceed from our deduction. 

It has been shown that we can think freedom as 
standing under no law, but containing in itself alone the 
ground of its determinedness; and we must think freedom 
thus if we want to think it correctly, since its essence 
consists in thinking, and since thinking is absolutely un- ' 
determinable through anything other than itself. Hence, 
we can think freedom — it being determinable in all 
possible manners — under a fixed rule, the conception of 
which rule only the free intelligence can produce in 
itself, and determine itself according to that rule. Thus 
the free intelligence .might, for instance, propose to itself 
very different rules or maxims — as, for instance, of 
egotism, laziness, oppression of others, etc. — and might 
follow these maxims uninterruptedly and without excep- 
tion, although with full freedom. 



6o THE SCIENCE OE ETHICS. 

In this manner tho inlelliqeiice would llunk a certain 
actinn; as agreeing witli its rule, and anotlier acting as 
Cf>nllictiiig with it. True, the real acting always remains 
dependent upon absolute freedom, since the acting of tlie 
intelligence is not actually determined, is not mechanic- 
ally necessary, Ijut merely determinerl in the necessary 
conception thereof. How, then, is this necessity in the 
mere conception to be designated, since it is no actual 
necessity? It seems to me that it cannot be better 
designated than thus: a certain acting is -proper ; is as it 
omjU to be, or shovkl l^e ; whereas the opposite acting is 
improper, and should not be. 

Now, the conception of such a rule is, as we have 
shown above, an absolutely first unconditioned conception, 
having no external ground whatever, but having its 
ground in itself. Hence, such an acting is not to occur 
from this or that reason, not because something else is 
willed or ought to be, but it is simply to occur because 
it ought to occur. It shall [or on(iht to] be absolutely 
because it shall be. Hence this shalling, this " ought " or 
" should," is an absolute and categorical shalling ; and 
that rule is a rule valid without exception, since its 
validity is subjected to no possible condition. 

So far as this absolute shalling is, moreover, thought as 
involving an imperative command, suppressing all other 
inclination adverse to it, we cannot yet exi:)lain it, since 
we relate it altogether to absolute freedom at present, 
which freedom does not involve the thought of any 
inclination. 

3. The deduced thought has also been very properly 
called autonomy, or self-legislation. It may be called so 
in a threefold significance. 

Firstly, because, when we presuppose the thought of 
the law in general, and consider the Ego merely as free 
intelligence, the law becomes a law in (jciural for the 
Ego only, by the Ego reflecting upon and arbitrarily 
submitting itself to that law, or by actively making 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 6i 

tlmt law the irrevocable princi[i]c of all its actions; and 
becomes a law in a imrticidar case only by tlic Yj'^<:> 
discovering, through its free judgment, what the law 
may require in that case. Thus the whole mioral exist- 
ence of the intelligent being is nothing but an uninter- 
rupted self-legislating or self-determining of the same, 
and when this self-legislation ceases there immorality 
begins. 

Secondly, because, so far as the content of the law is 
concerned, nothing is demanded but absolute indepen- 
dence, absolute -self-determination. Hence the material 
determination of the will through the law is taken from 
out of ourselves ; and all lidcronomy — all borrowing of 
grounds of determination from something external — is 
absolutely in violation of the law. 

Thirdly, because the whole conception of our necessary 
subjection to a law arises solely through an absolutely free 
reflection of the Ego upon itself in its true essence, i.e., 
as self-determining. The deduced thought does not force 
itself upon us immediately, which would be absolutely 
incomprehensible, and would cancel the conception of an 
intelligence ; but it is rather the condition, the necessary 
manner of thinking freely. Hence the Ego places itself in 
this whole relation of a lawfulness, and reason remains in 
every respect its own law. 

At the present place, it seems to me that it also 
appears very clearly how reason can be 2J'^'ci.ctical, and 
how this practical reason is by no means the curious and 
incomprehensible thing as which it has sometimes been 
viewed, and is, indeed, not at all a second reason, but 
rather the very same reason which we all recognize as 
theoretical reason. 

For reason is not a thing which is and exists, but rather 
a doing — pure, simple doing. Reason contemplates itself ; 
this reason can and does do simply because it is reason,, 
but reason cannot contemplate itself otherwise than as 
what it is; hence, as a doing. Now reason is ßnite, and 



62 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

whatsoever reason represents becomes for reason, in so 
representing it, determined and finite ; liencc also its 
doing becomes a determined doing tlirough tliis very 
self - contemplation and the law of determinedness 
which it involves. But the determinedness of a pure 
doing does not result in a being, but in an ought, in 
a shalling. Thus reason determines itself its activity; 
and to determine an activity is an equivalent term witli 
to he practical. 

In a certain sense of the word, it has always been 
conceded that reason is practical, namely, in so far as 
reason is means for realizing some external purpose, 
either proposed by our free arbitrariness, or by some 
requirement of our nature. But in this sense of the 
word, reason is merely technical jji-actical. But we assert 
here, that reason absolutely out of itself and through 
itself proposes a purpose to itself; and in so far, reason 
is absolutely practical. The practical dignity of reason is 
its own absoluteness, its determinability solely through 
itself and through nothing outside of itself. Whosoever 
does not recognize this absoluteness — and each one can 
only find it in himself through contemplation — will 
always regard reason as merely a faculty of argumen- 
tation, which cannot put itself in motion until objects 
are given to it from without ; and will always find it 
incomprehensible how reason can be absolutely practical, 
since he cannot cease to believe that the conditions of 
the executability of a law must be recognized before 
the law can be accepted. 

EE^fA^KS. 

A. Tlie views which present themselves from this 
standpoint in regard to a whole system of philosopliy 
are of a manifold character, and I cannot refrain from 
mentioning at least one. " 

Pweason determines through itself its own acting; 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 63 

tjccausc it is ficlf-contcniplating or finite. This proposi- 
tion has a double significance, since the acting of reason 
may be regarded in a twofold manner. In a science of 
morality it is chiefly related to the so-called acting 
which is accompanied by the consciousness of freedom, 
and which is, therefore, recognized as acting even on the 
standpoint of common consciousness; in other words, to 
willing and working. 

But this proposition holds, likewise, good in regard to 
that acting which is discovered to be an acting only from 
the transcendental point of view, namely, the acting in 
thinking. 

Now, reason does not necessarily observe the law 
which it proposes to itself as a moral being, because 
that law addresses itself to its freedom; but it does 
necessarily observe that which it proposes to itself as 
a thinking being, because the intelligence, in contem- 
plating that law, is active but not freely active. 

Hence the whole system of reason — as well in regard 
to that which shall be, and that which is postulated as 
being in consequence of. this shall, as also in regard to 
that which is found as immediately being — is predeter- 
mined as necessary through Reason itself. 

Now, Reason ought certainly to be able to dissolve 
that which it has composed according to its own laws 
by those same laws ; and hence reason necessarily can 
completely know itself. In other words: an analysis of 
the whole procedure of reason, or a complete system of 
reason, is possible. 

Thus in our theory all parts join together, and the 
necessary presupposition is possible only on condition of 
the results arrived at. Either all philosophy must be 
abandoned, or the absolute autonomy of reason must be 
admitted. Only on this presupposition is the conception 
of a philosophy rational. All doubts, or all denials of 
the possibility of a system of reason, are grounded on the 
presupposition of an Jieteronomy^ or on the presupposition 



64 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

that reason can be determined by sojnctliing outside of 
itself. But such a presupposition is absolutely irrational, 
is a contradiction of reason. 

B. The principle of morality is the necessary thouglit 
of the intelligence that it ought to determine its freedom^ 
without exception in accordance with the conception of 
self-determination. 

It is a thourjht, and not a feeling or a contemplation, 
although this thought grounds itself upon the intellectual 
conten^plation of the absolute activity of the intelligence. 
It is a pure thought, with which not the least particle of 
feeling or sensuous contemplation can be mixed up, smce 
it is the immediate conception which the pure intelligence 
has of itself as such. It is a necessary thought, since 
it is the form in which the freedom of tlie intelligence 
is thought. It is t\\Q first and absolute thought, for since 
it is the thought of the thinking itself, it does not ground 
itself upon any other thought as its sequence or as con- 
ditioned by that other thought. 

The content of this thought is, that the free bemg 
shall act in a certain manner, for the shalling is the 
expression of a determinedness of freedom. The content 
of this thought is, moreover, that the free being shall 
determine its freedom by a law, and that this law shall 
be none other than the conception of absolute self-deter- 
mination (absolute undeterminability through anything 
external); and, finally, that this law shall be valid 
without any exception, because it involves the origmal 
determinedness of the free being. 

C. In our argument we proceeded from the presupposi- 
tion that the essence of the Ego consists in its self-deter- 
mination ; or, rather, since this self-determination can be 
thought as actual only under certain conditions not yet 
established, in its tendency to self-determination. We 



THE PRINCIPLE OP MORALITY. 65 

have investigated liow, under this presupposition, the 
Ego must think itself. Hence, we started from an 
objective being of the Ego. But is the Ego in itself 
objective, or without relation to a consciousness ? Was 
not the Ego whereof we commenced speaking in our 
tirst chapter related to a consciousness ? We dou])tless 
related it to our own pliilosophizing consciousness. But 
now let us relate it to the consciousness of the original 
Ego, for only thus do we get a correct view from the 
transcendental standpoint of our deduction; for our 
deduction is not dogmatic, but transcendentally idealistic. 
We do not claim to evolve a tliinking from a being in 
itself, for the Ego is only for and in the knowledge of 
the Ego. Our claim, on the contrary, is to establish an 
original system of thinking itself, an original connecting 
of the assertions of reason with each other. 

The rational being posits itself as absolutely self- 
determining because it is self-determining, and it is 
self-determining because it posits itself as such ; it is in 
this relation subject- object = X. Now, in so positing 
itself, it posits itself partly as free, in the above signifi- 
cance of this word, whilst partly it subordinates its 
freedom to the law of self-determination. These two 
conceptions are involved in the conception of tlie self- 
determination of the Ego, or the conception of self-deter- 
mination involves these conceptions: both are one and 
the same. 

D. Certain objections and misunderstandings may 
render necessary, moreover, the following: — 

We do not assert that on the standpoint of common 
consciousness we become conscious of the connection of 
the deduced thought with its grounds. For it is well 
known that the insight into the grounds of facts of 
consciousness belongs to philosophy, and is possible 
only from the transcendental point of view. Nor do 
wc assert that this thought occurs amongst the facts 



66 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

of common consciousness in the generality and ab- 
straction wherein we have represented it ; or, in 
other words, that we can become immediately con- 
scious of such a hiw for our freedom in general. It is 
only through philosophical abstraction that we arrive at 
this generality, and this abstraction is undertaken in 
order to be able to establish the problem definitely. In 
common consciousness there occurs only a determined 
and never an abstract thinking as fact, for all abstraction 
presupposes a free acting of the intelligence. AVe only 
assert, therefore, this : AVhen we think determined actual 
acts as free, we feel constrained to think, at the same 
time, that they ought to be done in a certain manner. 
Some men may never be in a position to experience the 
truth of this our assertion in the thinking of their own 
acts, because they are actuated, perhaps, by passions and 
desires, and never become clearly conscious of their own 
freedom; but everyone will certainly discover the truth 
of this assertion in judging those acts of other persons 
which he considers to be free acts. Hence, if anyone 
denies the principle of morality, so far as his own person 
is concerned, as a fact of his consciousness, he can do so, 
and it cannot be proven to him, since a universal morality 
cannot exist as immediate fact of consciousness by its 
very conception. But if he denies the application of this 
moral law to separate free acts, it will be easy enough to 
show him, at least in his judgment of the acts of others, 
that he always does make use of that application. 2so 
one, for instance, gets angry at the flame wdiich consumes 
his house, but he does at the man who set the house on 
fire. Were he not a fool to get angry at the man, unless 
he presupposes that the man could have acted and ought 
to have acted otherwise ? 



BOOK SECOND. 

DEDUCTION OF THE REALITY AND 
APPLICABILITY OF THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 

Preliminaey. 

I. AVhat does the reality or applicability of a principle, 
or of a conception, signify ? And what reality does attach 
in particular to our present conception of morality ? 

A conception has reality and applicability signifies : 
our world — i.e., the world of our consciousness — is deter- 
mined by it in a certain respect. It belongs to those 
conceptions through which we think objects, and there 
are certain characteristics in it for us, because we thinlc 
them through this conception. To hunt up the reality of 
a conception, signifies, therefore : to investigate how and 
in what manner objects are determined by it. I will 
make tliis clearer by some examples. 

The conception of causality has reality, for through it 
there arises in the manifold objects of my world a certain 
connection, by virtue of which I must proceed from the 
one to the other, and can conclude from the effect as to 
the cause, and from a known cause as to the effect : the 
thinking of the one always, as it were, accompanying 
the thinking of the other. The conception of Law has 
reality. For in the infinite sphere of freedom (t.e., of 
Icing free as objective, for only on this condition do I 
occupy the standpoint of law) I necessarily think my 
sphere as limited, and hence think freedom, or free beings, 
outside of me, with whom I come in contact through 

67 



68 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

that conception 1 tirst arn\u 

community of free beings. ^^^^ 

i>nf in the detcrmmation of our \voil(i uir u.„ 

„e have here ch.cfly at h««'. > om the ^^^^.^1^^ 

its cause, I can not only have *e desne but 

power, to treat n.en as > they ^a no .g,ts. ^^^^ ^^^^ 

"f;'- itCt con pel physical acknowledgment; the 
rights does '^'" .<=°™1"^' P/„_„ elTect has its cause 
theoretical conviction that every 

does so. nrlncinle or conception, of 

^\r"Tlrc:^:^pt: ntas^wtdnced asi deter- 

r-Ajr^iniior.^^^^^^^^ 

this concepfon^ Bu th. d ^^^^^ ^^^^ ^^_^^^^^^.^^ ^^ 

The conception of morality, as its cie 
aoes not rel- to ^^^^^^^^^ ^^ ^ ^ o. reason, 

is to be. it proceeas puic j ,.,,^,,;^po nothin^ but, 

without any ^^ ^•St^^r::^^- 
self-determumt,on. It PaJ« ' ^^j„„ ^^^„„„h objects 

but rather contradic to aU clet ^^ .^^ ^^^^^^,^ ^^^ 

^ i:::!t=tha?r;rthin£oMtr^^^^^^^ 

il-:tÄ— i/rr.ethi..lt.can 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 69 

only be an idea; a mere tliourrjit in us, of which we do 
not at all pretend that something in the external world 
corresponds to it. The first question would, tlicrefore, 
seem to be : what, then, is this idea ? or, since ideas 
cannot be taken hold of, what is the manner in which 
to describe them ? In popular laiiguage : " You tell us 
that we shall do something ; what is it that we shall do ? " 

2. That which we think in virtue of the conception of 
morality, or the object determined by that conception, is 
the idea of what we shall do. But we can do nothing: 
nnless we have an object of our activity in the sensuous 
world. Whence this object, and through what is it 
determined ? 

I shall [ought to] do something signifies: I shall produce 
it externally, or, since it proposes to me an infinite end, 
as it never is, but always merely shall he, I shall in all 
my external actions work so as constantly to draw nearer 
to that end. 

But I must always have an object of my activity, since 
I am finite, and hence I cannot produce wliat I am to 
produce out of nothing. 

The sensuous world nmst, therefore, contain something 
which is to be the object of my activity in my endeavour 
to approach the realization of that infinite and unattain- 
able idea. What, then, is this sphere of the sensuous 
world, to which the requirements of the moral law in me 
relate themselves ? How am I to arrive at a know- 
ledge, and particularly at a systematic knowledge, of 
this sphere ? Moreover, how am I to know how this 
law requires me to act in regard to each special object 
in this sphere ? 

It is immediately clear that that upon which I am to 
act must be of such a nature that I can act upon it, or 
that I must have the physical power to mould it. Let 
us explain this. 



70 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

The froo rational being acts as an intelligence, i.e., 
according to a conception of the effect to be jjroduced, 
which concei)tion exists in advance of the production of 
the effect. Hence the ol)ject of its activity must at least 
be of such a nature that it can be thought by the intelli- 
gence, and can be so thouglit as either Ijcsing or not l)eing 
(i.e., as accidental in regard to its l^eing), the intelligence 
then choosing between the being or not being thereof, by 
producing its conception of the end to be achieved. 

Here we have immediately a limited sphere of the 
general sphere of sensuousness, wherein to look for that 
which is physically possible to our power of causality. 
For there is a large sphere in our world which appears 
to ns as necessary, and which we can never think, and 
hence also not will — since our willing is conditioned by 
our laws of thinking, and is always preceded by a con- 
ception — except as necessary. Another sphere of our 
world, however, appears to us as accidental. 

For instance: I cannot will to posit any thing out of 
space, since I cannot think it out of space ; on the other 
hand, I can very well think a thing in another 2')loxe in 
space than that which it occupies ; hence I also can will 
to change its place. 

A thorough and complete philosophy has to show up the 
ground why some things thus appear to us as accidental ; 
and by doing this, at the same time to fix the sphere and 
the limits of this accidental. At present we have not 
even proposed these questions to ourselves, much less 
answered them. 

In making this investigation we may, perhaps, be 
guided by the remark that the characteristic of acci- 
dentalness is usually a proof that we think something 
as product of our freedom ; or, at least, that we think 
all the products of our freedom as accidental (a propo- 
sition established and proved in the general science of 
knowledge). Thus, for instance, representation, when 
related to the being of the represented object, is held 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 71 

to bo accidental. The being of the object, we judge, 
might well be, allhongh tiiere were no representation of 
it; and this judgment we make because wc find the 
representation to ])e, in its form, a product of tlie 
absolute freedom of thiidcing, but in its content a pro- 
duct of the necessity of thinking. 

Perhaps it may result, from an analogy, that all that 
is accidental in the world of appearances is to be in a 
certain sense deduced from the conception of freedom, 
and to be regarded as the product of freedom. Let us 
assume this proposition to be confirmed ; what can it 
signify ? Certainly not that these objects are posited 
through the ideal activity of the intelligence in its 
function as productive power of imagination; for this, 
in a science of morality, is presupposed as well known 
from the fundamental science of knowledge, and does not 
apply merely to the objects of our world which are 
thought as accidental, but also to those which are 
thought as necessary. Nor can it signify that they are 
posited as products of our actual practical causality in 
the sensuous world, for this contradicts the presuppo- 
sition that they are regarded as things actually existing 
independently of us. Hence the assumed proposition 
would have to signify, perhaps, about this, that our 
freedom itself is a theoretical determining principle of our 
world. 

Let us explain this. Our world is absolutely nothing 
but the Non Ego, is posited solely to explain the limited- 
ness of the Ego, and hence receives all its determinations 
only through opposition to the Ego. Now the Ego is to 
have the exclusive predicate of freedom. If the assumed 
proposition should be confirmed, therefore, this same 
predicate of the Ego, freedom, would be a determining 
principle of the opposite to the Ego, the external world ; 
and thus the conception of being free would furnish a 
theoretical law of thinking which rules with necessity 
over the ideal activity of the intelligence. 



THE SCIENCE OE ETHICS. 

Examples of this fioit of a dctcr,mnalio,i <.t an object 
wc have already mot in our seionce of r.ghte. Locau.se 
wc are free, we then posilcd the objeet. «our world as 
modifiahle, assun,ed other rational '^^^^'^^ 
and ascribed to ourselves hod.es uioveuble tluough ou. 
mere will, etc., etc. But in the present mstance our 
Lvestigation will have to go still further back, and 
establish the proofs of these assertions sUll more ex- 
baustively, since we have now arrived at the %eiy 
ultimate and primary of all reason. 

If the assumption that a part of our external word 
is determined through freedom as theoretical principle 
should be confirmed, and if it should appear that his 
part constitutes the sphere of the objects of our rf«(« 
Ln the law of freedom will but have continued |« a 
cractical law addressed to consciousness, what it has itseit 
commenced as theoretical principle without conscious- 
ness of the intelligence. It will have determined fo 
itself, and through itself, the sphere wherein ' ™1«^. >' 
cannot utter anything now in its present quality which 
it has not already uttered in its previous quahty. ih s 
law of freedom has first determined somewhat m general, 
and has foüM this somewhat as constituted m this or 
that manner; and now it also preserves this somewhat 
in that same qualitativeness thereof by means of our 
practical freedom which that law controls. Hence the 
content of this law in its practical function might also 
be h«B expressed-, act in conformity w-ith thy cognition 
of the orignal determinations (of the final ends of the 
external tilings. For instance, theoretically the con- 
cention of my freedom involves the proposition ; Al men 
are free The same conception, regarded practically, 
results in the command: You shall treat every man as a 
free bein". Again, the theoretical proposition says : Jly 
body is instrument of my activity in the sensuous wor . 
The same proposition, regarded as practical command 
says- Treat your body only as a means of reall^lns your 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 73 

freedom and self-determination, but never treat it as an 
end in itself, or as object of an enjoyment. 

Now if all these assnm])tion3 should l^e confirmed, the 
principle of morality would receive quite anotlicr sij^nifi- 
cance yet than the one previously estaljlislicd ; and the 
question which we proposed above : whence do we get 
the objects for the proposed activity, and how are we to 
arrive at a knowledge of them ? would ]je completely 
answered. The principle of morality would show itself 
to be both a theoretical principle, which as such furnishes 
itself its own content (the determined content of the law), 
and a practical principle, which as such furnishes itself its 
own form, that of a command. The moral principle would 
thus return into itself, and stand in reciprocal relation 
with itself, and we should thus receive a complete and 
satisfactory system from one point. Something outside 
of us has this or that final end, because we are to treat 
it thus ; and we are to treat it thus because it has this 
final end. We should thus have arrived at the desired 
idea of that which we ought to do, and at the same time 
at the sulstrate, in which we are to approach the realiza- 
tion of this idea. 

3. What does the conception of a physical power to mould 
objects signify, and how does this conception arise in us ? 

Let us first ask : Of what are we really conscious 
when we believe to be conscious of our causality in the 
sensuous world ? What can this immediate conscious- 
ness involve, and what can it not involve ? 

We are immediately conscious of our conception of an 
end, or of our real willing ; of an absolute self-determin- 
ing, through which our whole soul is gathered together, as 
it were, into one point. We, moreover, become immedi- 
ately conscious of the reality and of an actual sensation of 
the object (which previously we only thought in the con- 
ception of the end) as a given object in the sensuous world. 

(Somebody might interrupt us here and say, we are 
also conscious of our labours in the production which 



74 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

occurs between the resolve of the will and its realization 
in the sensuous world. But I n-.ply, that it is not a 
particular consciousness, but simply the already pointed 
out and gradually realized consciousness of our satisfac- 
tion. This consciousness begins with the forming of the 
resolve, and successively continues as the willing is suc- 
cessively continued, until the whole conception of the end 
is comjiktdy realized. Hence this consciousness is only the 
synthetic uniting of the two estal^lishcd kinds of con- 
sciousness, the willing and the willed, as an activity.) 

But we are on no account conscious of iht conntdion 
between our willing and the sensation of the reality of 
what we willed. According to our assertion, our will is 
to be the cause of this reality. How may this be ? Or, 
transcendentally spoken: how may we come to assume 
this conscious harmony between a conception of an end 
and an actual object outside of us, the ground of which 
harmony is to lie in the former and not in the latter ? 

Let me clear up this question through opposition. The 
conception of cognition is to be a reconstruction of an 
external somewhat, but the conception of an end, or 
purpose, is to be a preconstruction for an external some- 
what. And as in the case of the former conception of 
cognition there arises very properly a question con- 
cerning the ground (not of the harmony in itself, for this 
would be nonsense, since unity and harmony between 
opposites exists only in so far as an intelligence thinks 
it, but) of the assuming of such a harmony between the 
conception (as secondary) and the thing (as jyrimarg) ; so 
in the case of the latter conception of a purpose we ask 
for the ground of assuming a harmony between the thing, 
as secondary, and the conception, as primary. 

In the case of the conception of cognition that question 
was answered in this manner: both the thing and the 
CONCEPTION ARE ONE AND THE SAME, ONLY VIEWED IN 
DIFFERENT WAYS; THE CONCEPTION, PROVIDED IT IS A 
NECESSARY CONCEPTION OF REASON, IS ITSELF THE THING J 



THE PRINCIPLE OE MORALITY. 75 

AND THE THINO IS NOTHING BUT THE NECESSARY COX- 
CEPTION OF ITSELF. 

How, if we were to receive the same answer in the 
case of the conception of a purpose, namely, that that 

WHICH WE RELIEVE TO HAVE PRODUCED IN THE EXTERNAL 
WORLD, IS NOTHING BUT OUR CONCEPTION OF A PURPOSE 
ITSELF, REGARDED IN A CERTAIN MANNER? with this dis- 
tinction, that the liarmony in this case occurs only under 
a certain condition, characterized in this manner: Of 
whatsoever stands under this condition we say, "This 
we can do " ; but of whatsoever does not stand under it 
we say, "This we can not do." 

That which I willed is, when it becomes real, an oljject 
of a sensation. Hence a determined feeling must occur, 
in virtue whereof it is posited, since all reality occurs for 
me only on this condition. My willing, therefore, must, 
in the present case, be accompanied by a feeling relating 
itself to that which I willed ; and by this result we gain 
at least so much that the sphere of our investigation is 
solely in the Ego, and that we have to speak only of 
what occurs in ourselves, but not of what occurs outside 
of us. 

Feeling is always the expression of our limitedness. 
But in our special case there is a transition from a 
feeling related to the object as it is independently of 
us, to another feeling related to the same object as it is 
to be modified through our activity. Hence, since the 
latter is to be a product of our freedom, there occurs a 
transition from a limited to a less limited condition. 

We are now able to express our problem more definitely 
thus : How is an actual extension of our limits connected 
with self-determination through freedom {or willing) ; or 
transcendentally expressed: Row do we come to assume 
such an extension ? 

Every assumption of a new reality outside of me is a 
further determination of my world, a change of my world 
in my consciousness. Now, my world is determined 



76 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

tlironjj;h oppo.sition to myself, and my original world, 
•i.e., as I find it indcjicndently cxistin;:;; through oppo- 
sition to myself, fis I find myself necessarily existing. 
Hence a change in (a changed manner of viewing) my 
world must have a change in (a changed manner of 
viewing) myself as its basis. 

If I were, therefore, able to change something in 
myself through my will, this would necessarily also 
change my will ; and if the possibility of the former were 
demonstrated, the possil)ility of the latter were explained 
at the same time. My world is changed, signifies : / am 
changed ; my world is determined differently, signifies : / 
am determined differently. 

The prolilem, at present, is to be put into this shape : 
"What does this signify: / change myself? If we only 
answer this question, then the other question. How I can 
change the world, is answered at the same time. 

Whenever I but will, I determine myself, concentrate 
my whole essence away from everything indefinite and 
merely determinable into one solitary determined point, 
as we have just stated. At present: / change myself; 
but not all willing results in the occurrence of the willed. 
Hence the Ego which is to be changed by every act of 
the will, and that Ego through the change whereof our 
view of the world changes likewise, must be different, 
and from a determination of the former a determination 
of the latter must not result necessarily. Now, which 
E^o is the former Ego ? This we know from our second 
chapter, namely, that Ego which through absolutely 
reflecting itself has torn itself loose from itself, and 
posited itself as independent ; or in other words, the Ego 
which is solely dependent upon its conception. 

Now, is there still another Ego ? According to what 
we have said undoubtedly, namely, the Ego ß-om which 
the former Ego (wherein the intelligence has precedence) 
has torn itself loose in order to posit itself as independent; 
or, in other words, the objective tending and impelling Ego. 



THE PRINCirLE OF MORALITY. 77 

Let lis assume this inipclliii<; to be directed upon a 
certain determined determination of the will, as it doubt- 
less is, since it can only be thought as a determined 
im|)elling, Now let us posit a free determination of tlie 
will which docs not harmonize, or is not rcquiied liy this 
impulsion or tendency; and to posit this is certainly 
allowable, since the freedom of the will stands aljsolutcly 
under no condition except that of thinkaljility, and has 
expressly torn itself loose from the inlluencc of the 
impulse. In this case the Ego would remain, so to 
speak, divided ; the impulse or tendency would not 
harmonize with the will, and I would be conscious 
merely of my willing, of my mere empty willing. A part 
of the Ego would be changed, namely, the condition of 
its will; but not the whole Ego, since the tendency 
would remain in the same condition, i.e., unsatisfied, not 
having acquired the will which did occur, but rather an 
utterly different one. If we posit, on the contrary, the 
will determination to be in harmony with the impulse, 
then that separation no longer occurs ; the whole united 
Ego is changed, and our world also is now to be deter- 
mined by this change. 

In order to unite all the views thus obtained, let us 
glance back at what we have said above. It is very 
possible, as we have assumed, that our world itself be 
determined in a certain respect, in accordance with the 
just mentioned original tendency of the Ego, or with 
freedom itself as a theoretical principle. But that in 
accordance with which another (the world) is to be 
determined must be itself determined. Hence in this 
connection we have freedom as objective, and therefore 
the original and essential tendency of all reason. Through 
this freedom as theoretical principle our world would, 
therefore, be determined, and through this principle more 
specially our world would receive the character of acci- 
dentalness, and hence of the possibiHty to change it 
through free resolves. 



78 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

The result of all we have problematically cstaLUshcd 
would, therefore, be tliis: the ground of tlie connection 
of the appearances with our willing is the connection of 
our willing with nature. We can do that to which our 
nature impels us, and we can not do that to which our 
nature does not impel us, but which we resolve to do by 
unrestrained freedom of imagination. 

It is to be remarked that the possibility of fulfilling 
• the moral law is here determined througli the moral law 
itself (automatically), and not through an external prin- 
ciple (not hcteronomically). 

To remove all misapprehension, we add that this 
impelling of our nature which determines our physical 
faculties need not be the moral law itself. For we also 
have the physical power to execute immoral acts. Here, 
therefore, it will probably be necessary to draw a new 
line of distinction. We may say, however, so much, that 
the commands of the moral law must fall within the lines 
of our physical power; and by saying this we have at 
once removed the objection that it is impossible to satisfy 
the requirements of the moral law. 

The object of these preliminary remarks was to sec 
what our present deduction has to accomplish. This 
object we have attained. It is clear that our deduction 
must establish the proof of the following :— 

A. The rational being which, according to the previous 
book, is to posit itself as absolutely free and independent, 
cannot do this without at the same time determining its 
world theoretically in a certain manner. That thinking 
of its self, and this thinking of its world, occur through 
the same act, and are absolutely one and the same think- 
ing ; both are integral parts of one and the same synthesis. 
Freedom is a theoretical principle. 

B. Freedom, which our first book also showed to be 
a practical law, relates itself to those world-determina- 
tions, and requires their maintenance and completion. 



8o THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

It likewise appears from this consideration that, 
although we enter in the present book upon a difierent 
sphere, we do not do so by a leap, but in a gradual 
progression of systematic argument, and tliat our present 
book takes up the thread precisely where the first Ijook 
left it. In that book the assertion was, that, as sure as 
we become conscious of ourselves, we ascribe to ourselves 
an absolute power of freedom. At present we ask : How 
is this possible ? and thus connect the conditions about to 
be ascertained with the consciousness of freedom, and by 
its means with immediate self-consciousness, which latter 
connecting does in reality constitute the essence of a 
philosophical deduction. 

It is true, as will soon appear, that the proofs aljout to 
be established in this book require the same inner con- 
templation of the activity whereby we originate the 
conceptions here investigated, which was required in the 
first book. Hence we might certainly have shaped the 
l^ropositions of this book just as well into the form of 
problems; and our present first proposition, for instance, 
into the problem : To definitely think our power of 
freedom, etc. But apart from the intention to show 
the freedom of our method, and to protect our system- 
against too monotonous an arrangement, we likewise had 
in view to state with precision the point upon which 
attention is to be directed in determining that thought, 
since there are various conditions and determinations 
of it. 

Explanatory. 

Doubtless everyone who hears the words of the above 
first proposition will understand them to signify: It is 
simply impossible that anyone can think his power of 
freedom without at the same time imagining an objective 
somewhat upon which he acts with this freedom ; 
although it be no determined object, but merely the 
form of objectivity in general. Thus, indeed, the words 



CHAPTER I. 

DEDUCTION OF AN OBJECT OF OUR ACTIVITY IN GENERAL. 

First Proposition. — The rational hcing cannot ascribe a 
poiuer of activity to itself without at the same time thinking 
an external someiuhat upon which thai activity is directed. 

Preliminary PiEMARK. 

All the propositions advanced in our first book arc 
merely formal, and have no material significance. "VVc 
see that we shall, but do neither comprehend u-Jiat we 
shall, nor wherein to represent what we sliall. This 
arises, indeed, from the same circumstance which gives 
rise to all formal philosophizing; we have established 
■abstract but not concrete thought; we have described a 
reflection, as such, in general, without, however, deter- 
mining it, or establishing the conditions of its possibility. 
This was not a fault, since systematic progression com- 
pelled such a procedure, and since we were well aware 
all the time that the mere establishing of these formal 
propositions would not finish our labours, but rather 
compel u.« to proceed further. 

This remark points out definitely our present task. 
We have now to establish the condition of the possibility 
of the reflection, undertaken in our first book. It will 
appear that the first condition we shall need is again 
dependent upon another condition, and that again upon 
another, etc., and that we shall thus arrive at a series of 
conditions, which we propose to gather under the form of 
a series of 'propositions. 

19 



THE rRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 8l 

arc to be understood, and in this respect tlicy need no 
explanation. But in another respect sonic explanations 
arc certainly necessary as well in regard to the form of 
our assertion, or the condition under which it is to be 
valid, as also in regard to the content of the same. 

So far as the former is concerned, someone might say : 
You have just now in the first book required us to think 
the mere power of freedom without any object, and if we 
were not able to do so all your teachings have been lost 
on us. I reply : The abstract thinking in philosophy, the 
possibility whereof is itself conditioned through a pre- 
vious experience (for our life begins with life and not 
with philosophy), is quite a diflerent thing from the 
original and determined thinking on the standpoint of 
experience. The conception of freedom, as entertained 
by us in the first book, arose for us through abstraction 
or through analysis ; but we should not have been at all 
able thus to originate it, unless we had previously had 
possession of it as given or found. Now at present we 
are speaking of this very condition of the primary and 
not of the pliilosophizing Ego ; and our meaning is, you 
cannot find yourself as free without finding at the same 
time in the same consciousness an object upon which 
your freedom is to be directed. 

So far as the latter is concerned, it is to be obser\'ed 
that we assert an absolute synthesis of thinking, of a 
power and of an ol^ject, hence a reciprocal conditioned- 
ness of one thinking through another. Xot, as if the one 
were in time prior to the other, for both are the thought 
of the same moment ; nay, there is, even if we look 
merely to the fact that both are thought, no dependence 
of the one upon the other to be assumed, consciousness 
being rather irresistibly impelled from the one to the 
other. But if we look to how both are thought, then 
wo meet this distinction, that the thinking of freedom is 
an immediate thinking, in virtue of an intellectual con- 
templation, -whereas the thinking of the object is a 
a 



82 THE SCIENCE OF ETJHCS. 

mediated thinkinj^. We do not see the fonner throucih 
the latter, but we do see the latter through the former. 
Freedom is our vehicle for the cognition of oljjects, l)ut 
the cognition of ol)ject8 is not the vehicle for the cogni- 
tion of our freedom. 

Finally, two things have been asserted. Firstly, that 
an object, which is to be external to the intelligence, is 
thought ; and, secondly, that free activity is related to it, 
and related in such a manner that the object is deter- 
mined through the activity and not, vice versa, the 
activity through the object. Our proof will, therefore, 
have to establish two things : 1st, the necessity of oppo- 
sition; and, 2nd, the necessity of relation and of this 
cUtcrmincd relation. 

Peoof. 

A. The rational being cannot ascribe to itself a power 
of freedom without thinking at the same time many 
actual and determined acts as possible through its 
freedom. 

The latter part of the proposition advances nothing 
further than the first part ; both are identical. I ascribe 
freedom to myself, signifies : I think a number of different 
acts as equally possible through my activity. An insight 
into the truth of this proposition requires nothing further 
than to analyze our conception of a power of freedom. 
• A power, or faculty, is absolutely nothing but a product 
'of mere thinking, made in order to connect with it — since 
finite reason can only think discursively and mediately — 
an actuality, not posited originally, but originating in 
time. To think anything else under that conception is 
not to understand one's self. In our present case we are, 
however, not to draw a conclusion from the actuality as 
to the power of activity, as may be well done in . other 
cases ; but thinking is rather to begin with the power 
as the first and immediate. Yet even under this con- 
dition the power cannot be thought without at the same 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 83 

time thinking tlie actuality, since both conceptions are 
synthetically united, and since without the tliinkin;^ of 
the latter we can neither think a faculty nor anytliing 
else. I say expressly : actuality must be iliowild (not 
immediately perceived); must be thought, not (if I may 
so express myself) as real, but simply as possible, through 
a mere ideal function of the imagination. Actuality is 
perceptibility, sensibility. This perceptibility is posited 
as necessary, not in its essence, but merely in its form. 
"We ascribe to the Ego the power to produce sensibility, 
but only tiie power and ' not the actual deed. Tlie 
question, how reason may originally come to this mere 
form, will be explained hereafter. At present it sufHces 
to know that we can think this form, and by its means a 
mere faculty or power. 

Now in the present case we are to think a free power 
of activity, and not a determined power, the manner of 
manifestation whereof would be involved in its own 
nature, as is the case in olijects. How does a rational 
being proceed in order to think such a free power ? We 
can only describe this procedure, leaving it to each reader 
to convince himself of the correctness of this our descrip- 
tion by his own inner contemplation. 

The Ego posits itself (but only idealiter, i.e., it only 
represents itself as such, without actually being such or 
ßnding itself as ■ such in point of fact), as choosing 
voluntarily amongst opposite determinations of actuality. 
For instance, this objects A, which we find already 
determined independently of us, might also be deter- 
mined otherwise, for instance = X; or also still otherwise, 
for instance = -X; or still otherwise ad infinitum. Now, 
whether the Ego chooses either of these determinations, or 
none of them, leaving A as it is, depends solely upon the 
freedom of its thinking. But whichever I choose will 
surely arise for my perception . in the sensuous world, 
provided I determine myself through the will to pro- 
duce, it. Only in so far as I thus posit myself, do 



84 THE SCIENCE OP ETHICS, 

I posit iiiysclf as free, i.e., do I tliiiik actuality as 
dependent upon actual power, wliich is controlled Ijy my 
mere thinking; as each one must acknowledge, who but 
clearly thinks this thought. 

I^t it be observed that in this thinking we do not 
think a determined somewhat -X, which is to be pro- 
duced, but merely the general form of determinedncss, 
i.e., the mere power of the Ego, to select this or that 
from the range of the accidental, and make it its end. 

B. The rational being cannot think an act as actual 
without assuming an external somewhat, upon which the 
act is directed. 

Let us once more attentively observe the just described 
manner of thinking freedom. We said : I think myself 
in this conception as choosing. Let us now direct our 
attention altogether to this Ego represented as choosing. 
It doubtless thinks, and only thinks; hence in choosing 
we only ascribe ideal activity to it. But it also surely 
thinks something, floats over something, which holds it 
enchained ; or, as we usually say to express this relation : 
There is an objective, for only by means of such a relation 
is the Ego subjective and ideal. 

This' objective is not the Ego itself, and cannot be held 
as belonging to the Ego ; neither to the Ego as intelligence, 
as such, since to this Ego it is expressly opposited, nor to 
the Ego as the willing and realiter active Ego, since this 
Ego is not yet in action, the Ego at present merely deter- 
mining its choice and not its actual will. This objection 
is not the Ego, and yet it also is not nothing, but is some- 
what. It is an object of representation in general, leaving 
imdecided its reality or perceivability. In other words, 
it is a Xon Ego, a somewhat which exists outside of me 
independently of my activity. 

This objective somewhat is necessarily posited as con- 
tinuing to exist, and as unchangeable in all these modifi- 
cations, which are ascribed to the Ego through the 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 85 

conception of freedom. Por tlie conception of freedom 
is based upon tliis, that I ascril)e to myself the power to 
realize X or-^\ hence that I unite these, opiHjsilc ddcr- 
'iiiinatioiis, as oppositcs, in one and the same ihinJcinr/. 
But this is not possible, unless in this tliinking of the 
opposites we also think the same as that which is per- 
manent in the opposed thinking, and to wliich the 
identity of consciousness may connect. 

Now this identical somewhat is nothing but that 
through which thinking itself in its form becomes 
possible, i.e., the relation to ohjcctivity in general^ and 
hence precisely the Non Ego shown up. This Non Ego 
is thought as unchanged in all possible determinations 
through freedom, for only on this condition can freedom 
itself be thought. Hence there exists outside of us an 
originally given {i.e., through thinking itself in its form 
posited) infinitely modifiable substance, which substance 
is that upon which activity is directed. 

Finally: This substance is related to actual activity, 
and actual activity is related to it; and this substance 
is in truth nothing but the means to think that activity. 
It, in fact, limits actual causality to mere forming, or 
modifying, and excludes it from creating or annihilating 
matter. Hence we ascribe reality also to this substance, 
just as we ascribe it to everything which limits actual 
causality. Here, then, exists a real object of our activity 
outside of us, and we have proven what we had to prove. 



. . CHAPTER II. 

DEDUCTION OF AN OBJECT OF OUR ACTIVITY IN GENEKAL 

{Conlinucd), 

Second Proposition. — Neither can the rational Innj 
ascribe to itself a jtowcr of freedom without finding in itself 
an actual exercise of this pmver, or an actual free willing. 

Preliminary. 

Our deduction still stands at the same point where it 
commenced. It has been proven that we ascribe to our- 
selves a power of freedom. The question at present is: 
How is this ascribing of it to ourselves possible ? Its 
one external condition, namely, that an object of free 
activity must be posited, has just now been shown up 
We have now to establish an internal condition of it, 
namely, that of our own state, wherein, alone it is 
possible. 

An explanation this second proposition does not 
require. Its words are clear ; and should they never- 
theless involve any ambiguity, that will doubtless be 
sufficiently removed in the proof itself. That the con- 
nection asserted in this and in all future propositions 
signifies a synthetical connection in one and the same 
thinking (the above proposition signifying, therefore, for 
instance, that the power of freedom cannot be thouglit 
and is never thought unless there arises in one and the 
same state of mind of liim who thinks it an actual 
exercise of that power) — this is presupposed as well 

86 



THE PRTNCIPLE OF MORALITY. 87 

known from all wc have said before, and will hereafter 
always be presupposed by us as well known. 



Proof. 

The conception of a power of freedom is, as we know, 
the conception or the purely ideal representation of a 
free willing. At present we assert that this purely ideal 
representation is nob possible without the reality and 
perception of a willing. Hence we assert the necessary 
connection of a mere representation and a willing. Now, 
since we cannot well understand tlieir connection without 
clearly knowing their distinction, we must above all 
explain the characteristic distinction between represen- 
tation and willing ; and next proceed, since actual willing 
is also to appear in consciousness, to state the distinction 
between the mere ideal representation from the percep- 
tion of a willing. Only when we shall have done this 
will it be possil)le for us to prove that the former is not 
possible without the latter. 

As subjectivity in general is related to objectivity, so 
mere representation as such is related to willing. Origin- 
ally I find myself as subject and object at the same time, 
and what the one signifies can only be comprehended 
through opposing and relating it to the other. Neither 
is determined througli itself, but that which is common 
to both and absolutely determined in itself is self-activity, 
and in so far as both are distinct, they are determinable 
only mediately, the subjective being that which relates 
itself to the objective, and the objective being that to 
which the subjective is attached, etc., etc. Now I am 
absolutely self-active, and therein does my essence con- 
sist: my free activity, immediately as such, if objective, 
is ray willing; and the same free activity of mine, if 
subjective, is my thinking (taking the latter word in its 
widest significance as embracing all the manifestations 
of the intelligence as such). Hence willing can only be 



88 THE SCIENCE OF ET/ //CS. 

described tlirough opposition to tliinkin^f, and thinkiiic,^ 
only through opposition to willing. A genetic dcscrij^- 
tion of willing, therefore, as arising from thinking, can 
be thus given : 

We think willing as preceded by free, active compre- 
hension of its end, or as preceded by an absolute creation 
of this end through thinking. In this production of the 
conception of the end, the state of the Ego is purely 
ideal and subjective. The Ego represents: represents 
with absolute self-activity, for the conception of the end 
is purely product of the representation, and represents in 
relation to a future willing, for otherwise the conception 
would not be the conception of an end, but does only 
represent, and does not will. 

Meanwhile the Ego actually wills — wills that end ; a 
state, which each one easily distinguishes in ordinary 
consciousness from the mere representation of what he 
might will. Now what is there contained in this willing ? 
Absolute self-activity as in thinking, but with another 
character attached to it. "Which, then, is this character? 
Evidently the relation to a knowing. My willing is not 
itself to be a knowing, but / am to knovj viy loillinfj. 
Hence the distinctive character is the character of mere 
objectivity. That, which was previously subjective, now 
becomes objective, and becomes objective because a new 
subjective is added to it, or leaps, as it were, out of the 
absolute fulness of self-activity. 

It is well to observe the change in the sequence of 
the links. Originally the Ego is neither subjective nor 
objective, but both. This identity of both we cannot 
think, however; hence we only think both in succession, 
and through this thinking make the one dependent upon 
the other. Thus in cognition, an objective (the thing) is 
changed into a subjective, a representation, for the con- 
ception of cognition is regarded as the reconstruction of 
an existence. On the other hand, the conception of an 
end is to be the prototype of an existence. The subjec- 



THE rniNCIPLE OF MORALITY. '89 

•tive must, therefore, change into an objective, and thin 
change must commence in the Ego, the only ininiediaU; 
object of our consciousness. So much in regard to the 
distinction between representation and willing. 

The mere representation of a willing is the same repre- 
sentation that we have just now. produced in ourselves, 
i.e., the representation of an absolute (through absolute 
self-activity eflected) transition of the subjective into the 
.objective, for this is the general form of all free willing. 

How, now, is this merely ideal representation of a 
willing to be distinguished from the perception of an 
actual willing? In the former the ideal activity itself 
produces that form of willing through freedom ; and I am 
conscious of the act of this producing. But in tlie latter 
the ideal activity does not posit itself as producing this 
form, finding, on the contrary, the willing as given in 
actuality and itself in its representation thereof tied to 
this its given form. 

One more remark. The perception of the actual, i.e., 
of the actually existing object, usually proceeds from a 
feeling, and it is only in virtue of this feeling that pro- 
ductive imagination posits something. But it is different 
in the case of the perception of an actual willing. I 
cannot say that I feel my willing, although there are • 
philosophers who, in a careless use of language, do say 
so ; for I only feel the limitation of my activity, but my 
willing is that very activity itself. What sort of con- 
sciousness is, then, this consciousness of a willing ? 
Evidently an immediate contemplation of my own 
activity, but as an object of the subjective, and not 
as the subjective itself, which latter is, therefore, not 
contemplated as self-active. In short, this consciousness 
is intellectual contemplation. 

And now we can easily furnish the proof of our second 
proposition. : ' 

The subjective is originally not without an objective, 
for only thus is the subjective a subjective, as the 



9Ö THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

conception of the Ego hIiows. Consciousness necessarily 
begins with the connection of both. ]3iit in tlie mere 
representation of a willing we only have a subjective, 
whereas its objective, or more definitely, the mere form 
of the objective, is first produced through that very 
subjective itself. This is certainly possible, if the intelli- 
gence reproduces one of its determined states, and hence 
if the actual state (existence) of the intelligence is 
already presup^wsed in philosophical abstraction; but 
originally it is not possil)le. The production must have 
already been accomplished, if a reproduction is to be 
possible. Hence the original representation of our power 
of freedom is necessarily accompanied by an actual 
willing. 

Strictly speaking, our proof is now finished; but it is 
well to remend^er, lest we should lose what we have 
gained in our previous investigations, that, vice, versa, the 
perception of a willing is not possible without the ideal 
representation of a power of freedom, or, which signifies 
the same, of the form of willing ; and that, therefore, we 
assert most decidedly the synthetical union of both the 
thoughts just now distinguished. This can easily be 
shown thus : I am to become conscious of a willing ; but 
this is a willing solely in so far as it is posited as free; 
and it is posited as free solely in so far as its determined- 
ness is derived from a freely-produced conception of an 
end. The form of all willing must be ascribed to this 
particular willing ; for only thus am I the willing, and is 
the subject of willing identical with the subject of the 
perception of this willing. 

Let no one be confused by this, that the production of 
the conception of an end must then be posited in a 
moment previous to the moment of willing, which, as 
we have shown, is not possible, since I have neither being 
nor comprehension in advance of the perception of a 
willing. This production of the conception is not prior 
in regard to time, but rather it and the willing occur in 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 91 

aliRolutcly tlio same moment. Wc only think the deter- 
minedncss of the willing dependent upon the conception. 
There is no priority of time here, but merely a logical 
l)riority — a priority of thinking. 

To state tersely all we have now explained. Originally 
I contemplate my activity as object, and in so far neces- 
wirily as determined, i.e., as not all the activity I know 
full well I might ascribe to myself, but as merely a 
limited quantum of that activity. This contemplated 
activity is that which in all human languages is tersely 
called willing, and which, is well known to all men, and 
from which, as the philosopher has to show, all conscious- 
ness starts, being made possible solely through it. But it 
is a willing, and my willing, and an immediately perceiv- 
able willing solely in so far as the contemplated deter- 
minedness of the activity is to have no external ground, 
but is to be solely grounded in my self. But if it is thus 
grounded, then it is necessarily grounded as we have 
shown in my thinking ; since besides willing we have 
nothing but thinking, and since all objective can well be 
deduced from a thinking; and it is in this manner that 
the determinedness of my willing is necessarily thought, 
as soon as a willing, as such, is persevered in. 



CHArXER III. 

DEDUCTION OF THE ACTUAL CAUSALITY OF THE RATIONAL 

BEING. 

Third Proposition. — The rational Icivg cannot find in 
itself an application of its freedom, or a willinrj, witJiout at 
the same time ascribing to itself an actual external caiisality. 

Prelimixauy. 

Our deduction advances a step. I cannot ascribe to 
myself a power of freedom without finding myself as 
willing. Such was our first assertion. But now we add 
moreover : I cannot do this, cannot find myself as actually 
willing without finding also something else in me. Or to 
state it in other words: AVhatsoever may be possible in 
the course of consciousness by means of previous ex- 
perience and . free abstraction, consciousness originally 
clearly commences no more with the representation of 
a mere impotent willing than with the representation of 
our power to will. So far as we see as yet, consciousness 
begins with a perception of our actual caxLsality in the 
sensuous woiid. This causality we deduce from our 
willing, and the determinedness of this our willing from 
'a freely created conception of an end. 

Thus it appears that the conception of freedom is 
mediately conditioned by the now to be deduced per- 
ception of an actual causality, and since that conception 
conditions self-consciousness, self-consciousness must also 

9» 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 93 

be coiKliiioncd by ibo latter. Hence all we bavc hiUicrto 
deduced, and may yet deduce, is one and tlic Hanic syii- 
tbetical consciousnesa, tbo Bcparate parts wliereof can 
certainly 1)e separated in pliilosopliical aljstraction, l>ut 
are on no account separated in original consciousness. It 
is enough to have stated this once for all. 



Proof. 

I find myself willing only in so far as my activity is to 
be put in motion through a determined conception. My 
activity in willing is necessarily a determined activity, 
as has been sufficiently estaldished. But in the mere 
activity, as such, as pure activity, nothing is distinguisli- 
able or determinable. Activity is the simplest contem- 
plation — mere inner agility, and nothing else. 

Activity is not to be detennined through itself, and yet 
must be determined if consciousness is to be possible, 
• signifies: Activity is to be determined through and l)y 
means of its oj)positc ; hence through the mode of its 
limitedness, and only under this condition is a mani- 
fold of activity, or are many and particular acts 
possible. 

But the manner of my limitedness I cannot absolutely 
and intellectually contemplate through myself, but only 
feel in sensuous experiences. But if an activity is to be 
limited, and if its limitedness is to be felt, this limited- 
ness must have existence (of course, for me, and not in 
itself). Now everything that is sensuously to be con- 
templated is necessarily a quantum, at present only a 
quantum filling up a time moment. But that which fills 
up a time moment is itself an infinitely divisible mani- 
fold, and hence the perceivable limitedness must be itself 
a manifold. At present the Ego is to be posited as active. 
It must, therefore, be posited as removing and breaking 
through a manifold of limitation and resistance in a suc- 
cession (for even in the single moment there is succession, 



5^ THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

Since otherwise no duration of time would arise from the 
mere joining' together of single moments). In othei 
words : The E<jo must he posited as haviwj causality xn an 
external sensuous world. 

Remarks. 

I As part of the result of our investigation, we must 
also rememher that the intellectual contemplation, irom • 
which we started, is not possihle without a -senuous con- 
templation, and the latter not without a feehng. I 
would he. therefore, an utter misapprehension and 
reversion of our system to charge ns with the opix)site 
assertion But neither is the latter possible without the 
former. I cannot be. for myself, without being a some- 
what, and this I am only in the sensuous world ; bu 
neither can I be for myself without being an Ego, and this 
I am only in the world of intelligence, which opens to my 
eves by means of intellectual contemplation. The point . 
of union of both worlds lies in this : that I am, only 
throuMi absolute self-activity, regulated by a conception. 
for myself, what I am already in the sensuous world Our 
existence in the world of intelligence is the inoral law: 
our existence in the sensuous world is the actual deed , 
and the point of miion of both is the freedom as an 
absolute power, to determine the latter world through 

the founcK^^ is to be posited as actual only in opposition 
to a non-E-o. But a non-Ego exists for the Ego only on 
condition that the Ego acts, and in this its acting teels 
a resistance which must be surmounted, however, since 
otherwise the E-o would not act. It is only through the 
n^eanrof a resistance that the activity of the Ego becomes 
perceptible and of a duration in time, since, otherwise, 
ft would be beyond all time, which we cannot even 

think. , XT ^^ 

3. Hence, no causality directed upon a, non-E-o, no 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 95 

Ego, Tiiis causality is not accidental, Ijnt necessarily 
belonging; to the K^^o, like everything else in the ]<2go. 

Would that i)eople were to cease combining to reason 
out of a number of accidentally joined forces, and were to 
accustom themselves to look upon it as a completed wiiolo, 
as an organised reason^ so to speak. Either the Ego is 
everything that it is, and as it appears on the standpoint 
of ordinary consciousness independently of all philosophi- 
cal abstraction, or it is nothing, and is indeed not at all. 
Consciousness begins with sensuous perception, whicli 
is throughout determined, l)ut on no account does it Ijcgin 
with abstract thinking. ]>y trying to begin consciousness 
with abstraction (as philosophy, indeed, does begin), and by 
mistaking that which was to be explained, viz., actual 
consciousness, for the explanation itself, viz, philosophy, 
the latter science has been turned into a tissue of 
absurdities. 

4. Only through such a statement of the matter as we 
have just given, is the absoluteness of the Ego, as its 
essential character, retained. Our consciousness starts 
from the immediate consciousness of our activity; and 
only by means of it do we find ourself passive. The non- 
Ego does not affect the Ego as has been generally supposed, 
but vice versa. It is not the non-Ego which penetrates 
into the Ego, but the Ego which proceeds out of itself 
into the non-Ego. Thus we have to express this relation 
through sensuous contemplation, whereas, .transcendentally, 
it should be expressed : We find ourselves originally 
limited not through our limitations drawing in upon us — 
for in that case the cancelling of our reality would also 
cancel our consciousness of it — but through our extending 
and in extending our limits. 

Again, in order to go out of itself, the Ego must bo 
posited as overcoming the resistance. Here, again, the 
primacy of reason, in so far as reason is practical, is 
asserted. Everything starts from activity and from the 
activity of the Ego. The Ego is the first principle of all 



96 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

movement, of all life, of all deeds and events. If tlie 
non-Ejio influences us, it does not do so within our 
sphere, but within its own sphere. It afTects us through 
resisting us, and it would not resist unless wo first 
directed our activity upon it. It does not attack us, 
but we attack it. 



CHAriEPt IV. 

DETERMINATION OF THE CAUSALITY OF THE RATIONAL 
BEING THROUGH ITS INTERNAL CHARACTER. 

Fourth Proposition. — The rational being mnnot ascribe 
caiLSality to itself without determining the same in a certain 
manner through its own conception. 

Preliminary, 

Our proposition is unclear and ambiguous. The 
causality of the rational being in the sensuous world 
may well be supposed, and will shortly show itself, to 
stand under various restrictions and conditions; and on 
the first glance it is hard to say which of these is meant 
by the certain manner of determinedness mentioned in 
our proposition. But we have in our method itself the 
surest means against all confusion. It must be the 
determinedness which conditions immediately the per- 
ception of our causality, which is meant, and what sort 
of a determinedness this is will appear from a deduction. 
The conditions which ac^ain determine this determined- 
ness we shall show afterwards. 

But in order to know from the beginning, whereof we 
really speak, and to give a thread for the direction of 
our attention, let us first try to guess from common 
consciousness what this determinedness may be. (It is 
scarcely necessary to mention that this guess is not to 
prove anything, but merely to prepare the proof.) 

It has already been stated that we cannot will or effect 

H 97 



98 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

something in violation of the necessary laws of thinking, 
since wo cannot even think it, and that we cannot like- 
wise create or annihilate matter, l)ut merely .separate and 
connect it, the ground whereof is also stated in its proper 
place. But even in this separating and connecting of 
matter or sul)stance we are hound to ol)ey a certain 
order. In most cases we cannot innnediately realize our 
end through our will, l»ut must make nse of various 
means, existing previously and independently of us, as 
the only proper means to effect our purpose. Let our 
end be = X. Instead of directly realizing X, we are, 
perhaps, compelled to realize A first as the only means 
to get to B, and B as the only means to get to C, etc., 
until we arrive, through a series of mediating ends, 
mutually conditioning each other, at our final end X. 

In fact, we can do all that we can will to do, and the 
only difference is that we cannot always do it imme- 
diately and at once, but in a certain order of proceeding. 
(It is said, for instance, that man cannot tiy. "Why 
should man not be able to do it? Of course, man 
cannot fly immediately as he can walk innnediately; 
but through the means of a balloon he can certainly rise 
into the air, and move about with a certain degree of 
freedom and purpose. Moreover, shall we, because our 
age cannot do what it has not yet discovered the means 
to do, assert that man cannot do it ? I will not suppose 
that an age like ours considers itself mankind !) 

The assertion of common consciousness 'is, therefore, 
that in the execution of our ends we are tied to a certain 
order of means. What does this assertion signify, when 
looked upon from a transcendental point of view, merely 
looking to the imminent changes and appearances in the 
Ego, and utterly abstracting from external things ? 

According to previous explanations, a feeling always 
accompanies perception, and to say : I perceive changes 
outside of me, signifies the same as : the condition of my 
feelings changes. I will to have external causality, 



THE rRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 99 

si<^nifics : I will that a determined feeling; within me 
should be replaced Ijy a determined otiier feeliii;,^ which 
I require in my conception of the end to he attained. I 
have become cause, signifies: this required feeling has 
actually entered me. Hence to say: I attain my end 
through a series of means, signifies : between the feeling, 
from which I proceeded to willing, and the feeling 
required by that willing, a series of other feeliiigs enters. 
And to say that this relation is a necessary one, signifies : 
a determined required feeling follows a determined other 
feeling, only on the condition that a determined series of 
other feelings (determined in their kind, number, and 
sequence) enters' between them. 

But each feeling is expressive of my limitation, and to 
say, I have causality, signifies always : I expand my limits. 
Hence the assertion of common consciousness, trans- 
ccndentally expressed, signifies: that this expanding of 
our limits can only proceed in a certain manner of pro- 
gression, our causality being limited, in the attainment 
of its end, to the use of certain means. It is this deter- 
mination and limitation of our causality, whereof we have 
to treat at present, as our deduction will clearly show. 

This part of the deduction is a progress in our series 
of conditions. I cannot posit myself as free without 
ascribing to myself an actual causality. Such was our 
last proven proposition. But under what conditions can 
we again ascribe causality to ourselves ? This is the 
problem of our present investigation. 

Proof. 

A. My causality is perceived as a manifold in a con- 
tinuous series. 

The perception of my causality, as has already been 
remarked, necessarily, as perception, occupies a time 
moment. But through the union of many moments, there 
arises a duration or filling up of time, and hence, each 
separate moment must also fill up a time, since, by the 



loo 



THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 



union ot many ot tlic same Uin.l, nolhin- can ar.sc, wind, 
is not in tl,o n>any a, separate». What then, does tin. 
si(,nnfy; eaeh moment füh up a tin,e ? Snup ly, tha 
this mon.ent a manifold mußt be .l.slmK.usl.e. , and Hut 
this distinction might he continued i.din.lely ; hut, on no 
account, that this distinction is actually nrndc, smce, on 
r contrary, it becon,es „ n.on,ent only th-^ ' - 
distinguishing, not separating ,t '''^ ' "''''''^'■v j ° ^ J^T 
the mmnent is posited as filU.,g «p tune, s.gn.ncs, the. fo c^ 
the same as: the possibility in general of n.aking the 
distinction just described is posited. ,„,,iit,. 

That which occurs in the perception of our oausalit) 
is the synthesis of our activity with a ^■.^-^;»;;;;^- ?f^ 
our activity, as wo have seen, is not a manifold, but rather 
rbsolute pire identity, and is itself to be cb-ctenzed 
only through relation to the resistance. Hence, the 
manifold which is to be distinguished, must be a manifold 

ot the resistance. f„j „v 

This manifold is necessarily a manifold sepaiatel ex- 
ternally, or a discrete manifold, for only on tins condition 
does it fill up a time; it is thought as a series. How 
then, is it in regard to the se,uence of tins man.Md 
in a series; docs this sequence depend upon the fiee- 
dom of the intelligence as such, or is it regarded as 
detemined independently of the /"t-^Hf ™'=- , J"^ 
. instonce assuming this manifold to be « & c, would it 
b" Tp^oper mat'ter, for the freedom of thinking, o 
chan'.e it for h c a ov ior c ah, etc., or was it necessary to 
putfii that particular sequence, h following a, and c tol- 
owin- 6-and i only possible on the condition o a havrng 
bell deposited, etc.? It is clear that the latter i the 
case tor he perceived causality of the Ego is someth g 
actll- but in the representation of the actual, the 
, Sence is altogether necessitated, and never üee so 
far as the context of the representation is concerned. 

Meed, looking at the matter in general, my causality 
Jessarily bapp'ens in time, since it cannot be m/. 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. .loi 

causality unless it is thought, and since all my thinking 
occurs in time. But time is a {Ictermined .series of 
successive moments, wherein each moment is conditioned 
by another one which it docs not condition, and conditions 
another one, by which it again is not conditioned. Tlie 
thinking of our causality, however, is the perception of an 
actual ; and in perception nothing depends upon the 
thinking as such. Hence my causality is represented as 
a series, the manifold whereof is the manifold of a resis- 
tance, the sequence of which is not determined through 
my thinking, but independently of it. 

B. The sequence of this manifold is determined inde- 
pendently of me ; and hence, is itself a limitation of my 
causality. 

We have just seen that the sequence of the manifold 
in my causality is not determined through my thinking ; 
but neither is it determined or produced through my 
activity, as is, indeed, immediately clear. 

The resistance is not my acting, but the opposite of my 
acting. I do not produce it, and, hence, I do not produce 
the least of what Ijelongs to it. That which I produce 
is my activity, and in it there is neither manifold n(jr 
sequence of time, but pure unity. I desire the end, and 
nothing but the end ; and the means I only desire because 
the end cannot be attained except through them. This 
whole relation itself is, therefore, a limitation of my 
activity. 

PiEMARKS. 

Let us explain more clearly the result of our present 
investigation. 

I. The idea of the deduced series is as follows : There 
must first be a point of beginning, wherein the Ego pro- 
ceeds out from its original limitedness, and has for the 
first time, and immediately, causality, which point of 
beginning, if it shoiüd be impossible, from some reason or 
another, to trace our analysis back so far, might also 



I02 THE SCIENCE OE ETHICS. 

appear as a plurality of points of beginning.* In so far 
as these points arc to he points of beginning, tlie Ego is in 
them cause imnicfliately through its will ; and there are 
no mediating links necessary in order to attain this 
causality. Such first points there must be, if the Ego 
is ever to become cause. These poiiits, thought together, 
we call, as will appear soon, our articulated body ; and 
this body is nothing but these points represented and 
realised through contemplation. Let us call this system, 
of the first moments of our causality the system A, 

With each of these pohits many other points connect, 
wherein the Ego can become cause in a manifold manner 
through means of the first series. I say : With each one 
many connect; for if from each one only one manner 
of acting were possible, that acting would not be free, 
and it would indeed be not a second act, but merely a 
construction of the first. Let us call this system the 
system B. 

With each moment of this system B are again connected 
inany points of a third system C, and thus — to put it in 
the shape of an illustration, an infinite circular space is 
described around a fixed central point, in which space 
each point can be thought as connecting with an infinite 
number of others. 

Through this necessary view of our causality the world 
generally, and the world as a manifold, arises for us. 
All the qualities of matter — excepting those, of course, 
which originate from the forms of contemplation — are 
nothing but their relation to us, and more especially their 
relation to our causality, since no other relation exists for 
us ; or to express this thought transcendentally : they are 
the relations of our determined fiuity to our desired 
infinity. 

The object X is in space ihiLs far removed from me, 
signifies idealiter: in proceeding from myself to the object 
in space, I must first seize and posit these and .these 

* Translator's Note. Or as a plurality of first men. 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 103 

ol)jocts in order to posit it ; and viewed rcalilcr, it signifies : 
I must first penetrate this and that amount of opposing 
.space in order to be al>lc to consider the space X, as 
identical with the space wherein I am myself. 

The object Y is hard, signifies: In a certain scries of 
my activity I feel between two determined links of it a 
determined resistance. The olyect is softening, signifies : 
I feel the resistance diminished in the same place of the 
same series. It is thus in regard to all the predicates of 
things in the sensuous world. 

2. The real active and feeling Ego describes in acting 
a continuous line, wherein there is no disruption or any- 
thing of the kind ; a line, wherein you proceed imper- 
ceptibly to the opposite, witliout a change appearing to 
occur in the next adjoining point, Init only at some points' 
distance. The reflecting Ego seizes any number of fact.s 
of this continuous line as separate moments. Thus there 
arises for the reflecting Ego a series, consisting of points, 
not immediately connected, (Eeflection proceeds by leaps, 
as it were, whereas sensation is steady or continuous.) It 
is true, both the extreme end-points of the successive 
moments (if such things could be in an infinitely divis- 
ible line, although we may well think them) imper- 
ceptibly join each other, and in so far that which is 
contained in both the separated moments is the same. 
But the reflection only seizes that wherein they are 
opposed, and thus they are distinct moments, and give 
rise to a changing consciousness ; the identity of con- 
sciousness being again made possible through their 
likewise remaining always the same. 

3. This restriction of our causality to the use of certain 
determined means, in order to attain a determined object, 
must be explained from the point of view of common 
consciousness, through a determined qualitativeness of 
the things, or through determined laws of nature. This 
explanation, however, cannot suffice on the standpoint of 
transcendental philosophy, or on that standpoint which 



I04 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

sqiaratcs all tlic iion-]<>;!;o from tlic Ego, and Uiinks iLc 
Ego in its purity. From tliis staiulpoiiil it appears 
utterly absurd to assume a iiou-Ego as a thing in itself 
with abstraction from all reason. 

How, tlien, is that limitation to be explained in tliis 
connection, not in regard to its form, (i.e. not why siuli 
a limitation in general is to be posited, for this is pre- 
cisely the question we have answered in our deduction) ; 
but in regarcl to its content, i.e., why tliis limitation 
should be thought precisely in the particular manner in 
which it' is thought. In other words, wliy should pre- 
cisely these and no other means lead to the attaiiniienL 
of this or that determined end ? Xow, since we are here 
not to assume things in themselves, nor natural laws as 
the laws of an external nature, this limitation can only 
be conceived as of this character: The Ego limits itself, 
not arbitrarily, however, and with freedom, since in tliat 
case we could not say, the Ego is limited ; but in virtue 
of an immanent law of its own being, though a natural 
law of its own (finite) nature. This deterndned rational 
being is arranged in a manner that it must limit itself 
precisely thus; and this arrangement cannot be ex- 
plained any further precisely because it is to constitute 
the original limitation of that rational being, beyond 
which it cannot proceed with its activity, and hence 
likewise not with its cognition. To demand such an 
explanation would be to contradict one's self. There 
are, however, other limitations of the rational being, 
whereof the grounds can be shown up. 

Now, if these separate limitations, which as such occur 
only in time, are gathered together and thought as an 
original arrangement, prior to all time and hcyond oil time, 
then we think absolute limits to the primary impulse 
itself. It is an impulse which can only be directed upon 
this, only upon a causality determined in such or such 
a series, and upon no other causality whatever ; and it is 
such an impulse absolutely. Our whole internal, as well 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 105 

as external, world, in so far as the former is aclnal world, 
is thus prc-cstahlishcd for us tlirougliout all eternity. I 
say, in so far as the internal world is actual, i.e., an 
ohjective something in us. For the merely suhjectivc, 
the self-determination, is not pre-established, and hence 
we act with freedom. 



CHAPTER V. 

DEDUCTION OF A DETERMINEDNESS OF OBJECTS 
INDEPENDENTLY OF US. 

Fifth Proposition. — The rational Icivg cannot ascribe 
a causality to itself without p'csupposing a certain causality 
of the object. 

Preliminary. 

It has been shown ah-eady (Chapter I.) that the 
thinking of our freedom is conditioned by the tliinking 
of an object. But this objectivity was in that chapter 
deduced only as mere raw matter. Common experience, 
however, teaches that we never find an oliject which is 
only matter, and which is not already formed in a certain 
respect. It appears, therefore, that the consciousness of our 
causality is conditioned not merely by the general posit- 
ing of an object, but also by the positing of a determined 
form of the objects. But is this common experience, to 
which we have referred, necessary and universal, and, if 
so, according to what laws of reason is it thus necessary 
and universal ? The solution of this question miglit have 
some influence upon the system. 

The general proposition, that all matter is necessarily 
perceived in a determined form, might be proven easily 
enough. But we do not care for this alone, but more 
particularly for an insight into the determined form, 
which we must assign to the objects of our causality in 
advance of our causality ; and to show up this may 
require a much profounder investigation. Even the 

xo6 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 107 

words of the proposition cstaMished cannot yet be ex- 
plained by us, therefore, and we must wait for a complete 
unravelling of their meaning until we have finished our 
investigation. 

Proof. 

Thesis. — The rational being has no cognition except as 
■ a consequence of a limitation of its activity. 

This proposition has been aljundantly proven by all we 
have previously said, and it is simply the result of our 
previous investigations. I find myself only as free, and 
I find myself as free only in the actual perception of a 
determined self-activity. I find the object only as limiting, 
and yet as overcome by my self-activity. Without con- 
sciousness of a self-activity there is indeed no conscious- 
ness at all, but this self-activity can itself not be the 
object of a consciousness unless it is limited. 

Antithesis. — But the rational being as such has no 
self-activity, except as a consequence of a cognition, at 
least a cognition of something in that being itself. 

That something is product of my self-activity, I do not 
and cannot perceive, but absolutely posit; and I do posit 
it thus absolutely in positing the form of freedom in 
general. But this foim of freedom consists in this, tliat 
the material determinedness of the will is grounded upon 
a conception of an end, which conception is freely pro- 
duced by the intelligence. Now, apart from the fact that 
the possibility of such fi conception of an end seems 
itself to be conditioned by the cognition of an external 
object, and of a form thereof existing independently of 
us, apart from this fact of mere common consciousness, 
of which we do not know yet whether it will be con- 
firmed, it is at least certain that we presuppose the 
cognition of such a conception of an end for the possi- 
bility of a perception of my willing. But only in so far 
as I perceive myself as free, willing is a causality, my 
causality. 



io8 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

Tlio condition, as we sec, is not possible without tlie 
conditioned, and the conditioned not possible without the 
condition, which doubtless is a defective circle of ex- 
planation and a proof that we have not yet exjdained 
the consciousness of our freedom, which we were to 
explain. 

(It were perhaps an easy matter to solve this difllculty 
by the presumption that the first moment of all con- 
sciousness—for only the first moment presents the difll- 
culty, since in the progress of consciousness the choice 
through freedom and a cognition of the end-conception 
in advance of the will-resolve, l)y means of previous 
experience, can easily be conceived— consists in an abso- 
lute synthesis of the production of the end-conception 
and of the perception of a willing of this end. That 
conception would thus be, not produced, but merehj 
thought, as produced immediately together in and witii 
the willing, for the sake of finding the willing itself to 
be free. The only question would be this: Whence, 
then, since no choice is to precede the willing, does the 
determinedness of the end or of the willing (which is 
here all the same) come from, and how can it be 
explained by the philosopher ? (For we have seen that 
the Ego itself explains it through the thought of a pre- 
viously produced end-conception.) And this is, indeed, 
the true solution of the difficulty, which, once obtained, 
will also solve the last-mentioned rpiestion. But rules of 
a systematic procedure, as well as other discoveries, which 
we apprehend, force us to seek a more thorough basis, and 
the present remarks are only intended to point out the 
direction of our investigation. 

Synthesis. — According to the well-known rules of our 
synthetical method, the above antithesis is to be solved 
through a synthesis of the conditioned and the condition, 
both being posited as one and the same. The activity is, 
therefore, to be itself the desired cognition, and the 
cognition itself the desired activity; and all conscious- 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. loc, 

ncss must start from soiiictlHug, which alisohitoly unites 
in itself both precHcatcs. Let this union be thouglit, and 
the contradiction is actually solved. 

But this is the very dilliculty. It is so hard to under- 
stand this thought, to thiidv anything clearly when thinking 
it. According to the rules of synthetical elaboration, our 
task would, therefore, now bo to immediately analyse the 
established synthetical conception until we should have 
succeeded in understanding it: the most diificult way 
of it, particularly as our cstal)lished synthesis is one of the 
most abstract occurring in the whole science of philosophy. 

There is an easier method; and, since we are at present 
concerned more about the results themselves than al)Out 
getting a knowledge of the original synthetical procedure 
of reason (which, moreover, has been amply exemplified 
in other instances, more specially in my Science of Ilighis), 
we shall pursue this easier method. For we know already, 
from previous investigations in regard to that primary 
point, from which all consciousness proceeds, so much 
that we can very properly proceed in our investigations 
from these known characteristics, and ascertain whether 
they will also solve our present ditticulty, and whether 
they also involve the synthesis just now established. 
This method is the same as the other reversed. 

The Pkoof by another Method. 



If we think the Ego originally objective — as it is found 
in advance of all other consciousness — its determinedness 
cannot be otherwise described than by means of a tendency 
or impulse, as we have sufficiently established at the very 
beginning. The ol)jective state of an Ego is by no means 
a being or permanency (for in that case it would be its 
opposite, a thing) ; but is, on the contrary, absolute 
activity, and nothing but activity. Now, activity, taken 
objectively, is Impulse. 



no THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

I have said: if we tliiiik tlic Ego originally ol)jcctivc, 
for, after the s^ll)jcctive in the E^^o has l)ecn scpai-atcd and 
thought (according to our previous de.scri])tion in Chapter 
IT., Book 1) as absolute power of freedom, the olijcctive 
in the Ego, in this relation to the subjective or to freedom, 
is a moral law for freedom. 

But the Ego is not merely objective, for in that case 
it would be a thing and not an Ego. Hence, its original 
determinedness is not only the determincdness of a being, 
but also of a thinking: taking the latter word in its 
widest significance as embracing all utterances of the 
intelligence. But such a mere determincdness of the in- 
telligence, without any self-activity or freedom on the part 
of the intelligence, is called a feeling (as we have shown in 
Chapter III. of Book 1). 

A thing merely is something or another, and that 
finishes the determinedness of the thing. But the Ego 
never is merely something or another ; it must also know 
of that which it is. The being of the Ego necessarily and 
immediately relates to its consciousness. This mere 
determination of the being and the Egoness is called 
feeling; and, hence, if the Ego is oiiginally posited as 
being an impulse, i.e., if the original objective determined- 
ness of the Ego is characterised as impulse, then it is 
also necessarily posited as knowing of this its being, or 
of this impulse ; and since this immediate knowing in the 
Ego, as its subjective determinedness, is called feeling, 
it is necessarily posited as having a feeling of this impulse. 
And in this manner we arrive at a necessary and 
immediate consciousness, to which we can attach the 
series of all other consciousness. In other words, all 
other consciousness : reflection, contemplation, -compre- 
hension, etc., presupposes an application of freedom, 
which again presupposes many other things. But feeling 
does not presuppose anything. I fed only so far as I am. 
This feeling of the impulse is called yearning: an un- 
determined sensation of a need. 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. iii 

Now, this original feeling of the impulse is precisely the 
synthetical link, wliich we (lescril)e(l above. The impulse 
is an activity, which in the Ego necessarily l)eco]iies 
cognition (feeling), and tliis cognition is not (like otlier 
cognition) an image of the activity of the impulse, but, 
rather, is that very activity itself in its immediate repre- 
sentation. If the activity is posited, the cognition thereof 
is also immediately posited, and if this cognition is posited 
in its form as feeling, the activity itself is also posited. 

In other cognitions the oltjective is always still held to 
e.xist, in a certain rcs[)ect, independent of its cognition or 
representation, whether it be so held a tiling in itself, 
or as law of reason; for only by holding it thus does 
it become an objective, and distinct from tlie subjective. 
In feeling, both are absolutely united ; a feeling (noun) is 
clearly nothing without feeling (inf. verb), and is tliat 
feeling itself, is always merely a subjective. 
: This original feeling solves the above difficulty 
thoroughly. We could not assume an activity without 
cognition, since all activity was found to presuppose 
a freely-produced conception of an end. Again, we could 
not assume any cognition without presupposing an activity, 
since all cognition was deduced from the perception of our 
limitedness in acting. But at present we have something, 
which is immediately knowaijle, namely, our original 
impulse. The first act is a satisfaction of that impulse, 
and in relation to it, that impulse appeal's as a freely- 
produced conception of an end ; and this is very correct, 
since the Ego is to be regarded as the absolute ground 
of its impulse. 

In feeling I am utterly, and in every respect, en- 
chained. I have not even that freedom which occurs in 
every representation, namely, that I can abstract from 
the object of it. It is not I, who posit myself when I feel, 
but both objectively — as impelled; and subjectively — as 
feeling this impulsion— am I posited. ' • 



112 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

Now, if only the cousciou.sly free and active is posited 
as Ego, as is always "done on the standpoint of connnon 
consciousness, tlien the object and sul)ject of tJic impulse 
does not belong, in so far, to the Ego, but is rather opposed 
to it; and it is only my thinking and acting which 
constitutes my Ego. 

The ground of distinction of these my predicates in the 
described relation is as follows : I, in so far as I am free, 
am not the ground of my impulse and of the feeling 
exerted by the impulse. It is not a matter of my freedom 
how I feel or do not feel, whereas it is utterly a matter 
of my freedom how I think or act. The former is not 
product of freedom, and freedom has not the least control 
over it ; the latter, however, is merely and purely product 
of freedom, and is not at all without freedom. Tlie im- 
pulse and feeling, moreover, are to have no causality upon 
freedom. In spite of the impulse, I can determine 
myself contrary to it; or, if I do determine myself in 
accordance with it, it is still not the hnpulse which deter- 
mines me, but I myself who determine myself. 

The ground of relation of these predicates is as follows : 
Although a part of that which pertains to my Ego is to be 
possible only through freedom, and another part of the 
same Ego is to be independent of freedom and freedom 
independent of it, yet the Ego, to which both parts 
pertain, is only one and the same, and is posited as one 
and the same. I, who feel, and I who think ; I, who am 
impelled, and I, who freely resolve, am the same I. 

Now, although my first act, as has just been shown, 
can be none other than a satisfying of the impulse, and 
although the end-conception for that act is given through 
the impulse, that act is nevertheless as having such an 
end-conception determined otherwise than as mere im- 
pulse. Eor as mere impulse the act would be viewed as 
necessarily constituted in this or that manner, whereas 
with the characteristic of being directed upon an end it 
is viewed as an act, which might have been otJierwise than 



TUE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 113 

it is. To be sure, I follow the impulse; but with the 
thought that I also luiglit not have followed it. It is 
only thus that the manifestation of my power becomes an 
acting; it is only on this condition that self-consciousness, 
and consciousness in general, is possible. 

We have already distinguished this objective view of 
the Ego, in so far as a determined impulse is originally 
posited, and a feeling deduced from it, from another 
objective view of the same Ego, which ajipears as moral 
law. This distinction can be made clearer at present. 

Materialitcr. — Both are distinct in this, that whereas 
the moral law cannot be derived at all from an objective 
determinedness of the im]>ulsc, but simply from the form 
of the impulse in general, as the impulse of an Ego, 
or from the form of absolute independence and self- 
determination, the feeling' of the impulse presupposes, on 
the contrary, a determined material need. 

Formaliter. — l>otli are distinct in this, that whereas the 
moral law does not al )Solutely force itself upon us, is not 
felt and does not at all exist independently of free reflec- 
tion, arising rather from a reflection of freedom, and from 
the relation of the aliove-described form of all impulse to 
freedom, the feeling of the material impulse, on the con- 
trary, forces itself upon us. , 
Finally, so far as the relation is concerned, the just- 
described impulse docs not at all relate to freedom, 
whereas the moral law does relate itself to freedom, 
since it is a law for freedom. 

In what we have saitl above, we have established the 
conception of an original, determined system of our 
limitedness in general ; the utterance or manifestation 
of this limitedness, and of the limited in us, being pre- 
cisely feeling and impulse; and hence there exists an 
originally determined system of impulses and feelings. 
And since whatsoever is fixed and determined indepen- 
dently of freedom is called nature, according to the above, 
tl^at system of impulses and feelings is to be thought as 
I 



114 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS, 

nature. Moreover, since tlie consciouMiess llicrijoi lorces 
itself upon us, and since the Y/^o or substance, Wi.orcin 
this system rests, is to be the same, wliich tliink.s or wills 
witli freedom, and which we jxtsit as ourselves; it lollov..^ 
that we must think that system of iuipulses and fcolin-.s 
as our nature. 

In other words: I myself am to a certain extent, r;:i(i 
without an infringement upoj) the absolut« micss of niy 
reason and of my freedom — nature; and this niy naLur.^ 
is an iw pulse, 

III. 

But not only do I posit myself as nature, T alvo assume; 
other nature outside of my own, partly in so iar a.- I am 
compelled to relate my causality in general to au exitT^ul 
and independently existing matter, and partly in so far 
as this matter must have, also independently of mv 
activity, at least that form which forces me to ])a..- 
through determined links in order to attain my o'oject. 
Kow, in so far as both are to be nature, they are neces- 
sarily thought as equal ; but in so far as the one is to bü 
7)iy nature, and the other an external nature, they are 
necessarily opposited. Both, therefore, are thoi;;j;lit as 
mediated, i.e., the one is thought through the liiinking 
of the other, which is indeed the general relation of all 
opposites, which are equal in one characteristic. In other 
words, my nature must be originally explained, or derived 
from the whole system of nature and shown to have its 
ground therein. 

Concerning this assertion, well known from and 
sufiiciently explained in my other philosophical works, 
let me say a few words. AVe speak of an explanation 
and deduction, which the Ego itself produces on the 
standpoint of common consciousness, but not of the 
explanation of the transcendental philosopher. The latter 
explains all the occurrences of consciousness from the 
ideal acting of reason as such, while the posit objects 
outside of what is to be explained, in order to explain it. 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 115 

Again: The Ego never becomes conscious of its explain- 
ing, as such, but only of the products tlieroof; or, in 
other words, it is clear that perception starts from the 
nature in nie, and not from the nature outside of rne, 
which latter external nature is the mediated (my own 
being the mediating), or that which is mediately cognized 
by means of the cognition of my own nature. Wiiereas 
the standpoint of reality proceeds reversely from external 
nature, which is held to determine our nature and to 
contain the ground, why our nature is constituted thus 
and not otherwise. How, then, is oiir nature to be ex- 
plained ? Or, what else does the assumption of a nature 
in us involve ? Or, under what condition is it possilde to 
ascrilie a nature to us ? This investigation we have now 
to undertake. 

My nature is an impulse. How can an impulse as 
such be comprehended, i.e., how is the thinking of the 
impulse mediated, in beings thinking altogether discur- 
sively and through mediation ? 

We can make very clear what we speak of here, by the 
opposite mode of thinking. Whatsoever lies within a 
series of causes and effects is easily comprehended by the 
laws of natural mechanism. Each link in the series has 
its activity communicated through it by another link- 
external to it, and directs this its activity to a tliird 
external link. In such a series, a quantum of power is 
only passed over from link to link, and passes, as it were, 
through the whole series. Whence this power may come 
we never learn, being forced, at each link in the series, to 
proceed further upwards, and never arriving at an original 
source. This power, penetrating the series, is the power 
by means whereof we think the activity and passivity of 
each separate link in the series. 

But in such a manner we cannot comprehend the 
impulse as working, and hence, we cannot think it all as 
a link in such a series. Let us assume an external cause 
directed upon the substrate of the impulse, then there 



ii6 TfrE SCIENCE OF ET/ /I CS. 

also results nii external causality upon a third link; but 
if this external cause has no influence over tin; substrati- 
of the mipulso, there results nothing at all. Hence, the 
impulse is something, which neither comes from, nor goes 
into, the external world; it is an internal activity of the 
substrate directed upon itself. Self-determination is the 
only conception by means of which we can think an 
impulse. 

Hence, my nature, in so far as it is to consist in an 
impulse, is thought as determining itself through itself; 
for only then can an impulse be conceived. But that an 
impulse exists at all, is simply fact of consciousness on 
the standpoint of ordinary consciousness, beyond which 
fact that standpcjint does not transcend. It is only the 
transcendental philosopher who goes beyond it in order 
to look up the ground of this fact. 

COROLLARIÜM. 

In the first mode of proceeding, our judgment is what 
Kant calls subsuming, and in the latter mode, what lie 
calls reflecting. The distinction is this: The law of natural 
mechanism is nothing but the law of the successions of 
reflections, and of their reciprocal determination (through. 
which alone time, and identity of consciousness in the 
progress of time, arises for us), transferred to external 
objects. The understanding, in this sort of thinkings 
proceeds its ordinary way mechanically ; and our free 
power of judgment has only to reflect upon what it 
actually does as mechanical understanding, in order to 
become conscious of it. The matter is comprehended 
without any activity of freedom or consideration : it is 
comprehended through the mere mechanism of the power 
of cognition ; and this procedure is justly called subsuming. 

But in the second mode of proceeding the comprehend- 
ing cannot at all occur in this mechanical manner ; and 
hence, there arises a check and doubt in our minds» 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 117 

accompanied by the reflection, that tlie crmiprchcnsion 
cannot succeed thus. Now, tlie coinprchension cannot be 
thus achieved, and yet must l»u achieved — must be 
embodied in the unity of self-consciousness, signifies : 
the mode of thinking must be reversed (precisely as the 
proposition : the ground of something is not to l»e found 
in the Ego, and yet there must be a ground ; signifies : 
that ground is in the non-Ego). 

This function of the reflective power of judgment arises 
only, however, where subsumption is not possible; and 
reflective judgment prescribes itself its own laiv, namely, 
the law to reverse the law of subsumption. 

IV. 

Nature — at present as yet only mj/ nature, but which, 
in its essence, is nature — determines itself. But nature, as 
such, is characterised through opposition to freedom ; or 
through this : that, whereas all being of freedom is to 
proceed from a thinking, all being of nature is, on the 
contrary, to proceed itself from an absolute Ijeing. Hence, 
nature, as such, cannot determine itself like a free-being, 
through a conceptioii. Nature determines itself signifies 
tiierefore : nature is determined to determine itself through 
its essence; is determined /o?'?nfl/i<cr to determine itself 
in general ; or nature can never be undetermined, as 
a free being may well be. Again, nature is deternnned to 
<letermine itself matcrialitcr, or precisely in such and such 
a manner, having no choice between a determination and 
its opposite, as a free being well has. 

My nature is not all nature. There is nature outside 
of me, and this external nature is posited for the very, 
sake of explaining the determination of my nature. Now, 
my nature is described as an impulse ; and this impulse 
must, therefore, be explained, and is originally, in fact, 
explained from that other nature. In other words, the 
determinedness of my nature as an impulse, is result of 
the determinedness of all nature. The impulse belongs 



Ii8 THE SCIENCE OE ET/f/CS. 

to mo in so far ns I am nature, not in so far ns T niu 
iiitclli^H'nco ; for tho intelligence, as 8uch, lias, as we have 
seen, not the remotest influence upon the iinpulse. Hence, 
the conception of the impulse is synth(?tically united with 
the conception of nature, and to he exjdained from il ; 
and hence, everything which is thought in the conception 
of nature, is thought as impulse, and hence, as self- 
determining. 

As I must separate my nature from all otlier natur.-, 
80 can I also, since nature is a general manifold, separaie 
parts of that external nature from otlier parts. (We 
assert here only an ideal separation, leaving it undecided 
whether there may he still another ground of this 
separating than the freedom of ^arbitrary thiriking; i.e.^ 
undecided whether there are actually, and independently 
of our thinking, separate parts of nature.) 

The part thus separated must be through itself what id 
is, but the whole must contain the ground of its thus 
determining itself. The whole, however, is nothing but 
the reciprocal action of the sum of all the parts upori 
each other. 

Or still more clear : Abstract from your own nature — 
because your nature involves a characteristic distinction 
from all other nature, namely, the necessity to limit iD 
precisely so far and no further — and reflect merely upon 
external nature : separate from that nature whatever part 
you may chose. That you happen to consider precisely 
this quantum of nature as a separate part, of this the 
ground lies exclusively in your free reflection. Call this 
separate part X. In X there is impulse, and a deter- 
mined impulse ; but that impulse is precisely a thus 
determined impulse, is determined through this, that 
outside of X there is precisely so much nature existing, 
which nature, through its existence, limits the impulse of 
that separate part to be the totality, and leaves to it only 
such a limited quantum of reality, and giving to it for the 
rest only an impulse. 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 119 

Now, if wc had not been forced to cliaractciize nature 
as an impulse, we could have posited all that X is not 
in X only as ne<i;ation. ]jut at present, havincj pr.siied 
nature as impulse, we posit all that X is not as impulse 
in X. For the general tendency to have reality pene- 
trates the whole, and is in each part of tlio whole. J»ut 
since each is only a part, each lacks all the reality of the 
other parts, and has only an impulse left for them. Tiiat 
this remainder is only imindsc, and is precisely a thus- 
determined impulse, has its f^round therein, because 
outside of the part there is still something else, and a 
precisely thus-determined something else. 

Now at present X is a separate part for me, solely 
because I have made it such through freedom of think- 
ing. Nothing prevents me from again separating ixoxw ir, 
by the same freedom, another part — Y. In Y also there 
is impulse, determined through all that exists outside of 
it, including that which I previously called X. Again, 
nothing prevents me from separating from Y another 
part — Z. This Z will be related to Y as Y was related 
to X. In short, in this mode of procedure there is 
absolutely no primary and no ultimate. I can make 
each part again a totality, and each totality a part. 

That which is constituted in such a manner as forces 
us to say of each part, that it is determined thr<jugh 
itself, and yet likewise that this its self-determinedness 
is again the result of the dctcrmincdncss of all other 2)(('^'ts 
through themselves, we call an organic whole. Each part 
of the whole can again be considered as an organic 
whole or as a part, and only the highest cannot be 
regarded as a part. Nature in general is, therefore, such 
an organic ivhole, and is posited as such. 

We can illustrate this conception in another way. 
According to the conception of natural mechanism, each 
thing is, through another, what it is, and manifests its 
existence in a third. According to the conception of an 
impulse, each thing is, through itself, what it is, and 



I20 THE SCIENCE OF ET /{/CS. 

manifests its existence in itself. Now, if a free l>einc? 
is to be tlionglit, then this conropjion is valid in all ita 
strictness, without the least niodilieation — not as coji- 
ception of an impulse, but as c()no(;])tion of absolute 
freedom. Freedom is directly opposikd to natural mechan- 
ism, and is in no manner determined thereby. ]]ut when 
we speak of an impulse of nature, then the general 
character of nature, namely, as a mechanism, must l^e 
retained, together with the character of an impulse, and 
l)oth characters, therefore, synthetically joined together: 
by which means we shall receive a mediating link ijetween 
nature as mere mechanism (or the causality-r(;lation) ; 
and freedom as the opposite of mechanism (or the sub- 
stantiality-relation), which third link we, indeed, very 
nuich need to explain the causality of freedom in nature. 
The conception of this synthesis is clearly the conception 
just developed by us. Something = A, is, indeed, througli 
itself what it is, l)ut that it is precisely this through 
itself has its ground in the other {i.e., in all possible - A). 
Again, that the other is precisely this, and that A is 
precisely thus determined, has its ground in A itself, since 
- A on its part becomes through A what it is. Thus, 
necessity and independence are united, and we have no 
longer the simple thread of causality, but the closed 
sphere of reciprocal activity. 

V. 

I must posit wiy nature as a closed whole, to which 
there appertains precisely so much and no more: such 
is the result of our proof. The conception of this totality 
cannot be explained upon the standpoint of common 
consciousness, upon which we have placed the Ego in our 
whole latter investigation, from any reflection of tliat 
consciousness, as the transcendental philosopher, indeed, 
does explain it ; but the conception is simply given. My 
nature is determined and fixed in this manner, and this 
.totality itself is nature. 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. i2r 

Let lis ask first: How do I coinprclieiid at all, and 
accordiiii; to wliat law do I think sonictliiii^ in nalnrc as 
a real or^fanic whole, since this soniL'tliin;^ is itself oidy 
a part of nature in general ? This questi<»n is asked very 
properly, for, as yet, we have only deduced the totality 
of nature as a real whole, hut not any part tliereof ; and 
yet it is a fact that we think at least our own natuie, 
which, after all, is only a part of the. whole of nature, 
as a complete whole. 

I have said : A rml whole, and this determination is 
the chief point. Let me first explain this conception 
by its opposite. In the manner in which we regarded 
nature just now, it was completely a matter of tiie free- 
dom of reflection, to grasp each part as a whole, and 
again to separate this part into ever so many parts, etc., 
I had a totality, but simply because I had made it a 
totality, and there was no other ground of determination 
for its limits than the freedom of my thinking. I had an 
ideal totality, a collective unity, but l)y no means a real 
totality. I had an aggregate, and not a compositum. If 
my whole is to be a real totality, then its parts must 
unite in a whole of themselves and independently of uiy 
thinking. 

Reality is determined through a compulsion of reflec- 
tion, whereas reflection is free in the representation of 
the ideal. This freedom, to limit the totality arbitrarily, 
must therefore be cancelled, and the intelligence be com- 
pelled to gather precisely so much and no more within it, 
if it is to become a real totality. Such is the case, as 
we have seen, with reference to the representation of my 
nature as a fixed whole. 

Now, through what law of thinking may this necessity 
of a determination of the limits arise for us ? Wherever 
.we can no longer comprehend through mere subsuuip- 
tion, there the law of reflective judgment enters, and the 
latter is a mere reversion of the former. Now, it miglit 
well happen that our power of judgment, once safely 



122 , THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

arrived witliin the siilicre of reneclioii, can no loiK'er 
coiiipreliend even by means of the law wliicli anj.se from 
a reversion of tlie law of Kul)siiinptii)ii ; and }i(;)ife it 
would have again to reverse that law. I'lius liicrc; wr.ald 
arise a composite law of rellection, a rccijn'ocuiity of 
reflection with itself. (We are to comjjrcliend somcthincr. 
We cannot comprehend it by the law of sub.suniptioii, 
and hence we reverse that law, and olilain the law r,f 
reflection; now we are again to comprehend .soinelliiiig 
else, and if we cannot even comprehend l^y this new law 
of reflection, hence we have to reverse it agaiii.) Each 
part of nature is through itself, and in itself, wiiat it is. 
So says the simple conception of reflection. liut accord- 
ing to the conception, which arose by reversing Mie simple 
conception of reflection, no part of nature is througli and 
for itself what it is, Imt only the totality is tiirough and 
for itself. Hence each part of the totality is determined 
through all other parts of the same totality, and each 
complete totality is itself to be regarded as we regarded 
the whole universe, which latter, therefore, changes from 
a totality of parts, into a totality of totalities,* a system 
of real totalities. 

Let us now analyze these conceptions still further, and 
thus connect our present argument with what we liave 
previously said. According to our previous result, each 
had its measure of reality, and for all other reality an 
impulse. Impulse and reality were in reciprocal causality, 
and mutually exhausted each other. In none was there 
an impulse to have a reality, which it possessed, nor a 
lack, which it had not an impulse to replace. This mode 
of consideration we were able to continue or stop at 
pleasure ; it fitted whatsoever came to our notice, and 
everything was perfectly uniform. 

But at present a determined = X is asseiied to be given, 
"which cannot be comprehended by this sort of conception. 
How, then, must it be constituted ? Let ua consider any 

* Leibnitz'8 Moiufds. — Tk. 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORAUTY. 123 

particular part of X, and call it A. Tf in A impulse and 
reality could not l)c, reciprocally explained each fioni llic 
other, if the impulse did not impel to have a realiiy 
which A lacked, and which helonged to A, or if llie 
impulse did impel to have reality which A lacked not, 
and which did not l)elong to A; then A could not 
be explained and comprehended through itself. My 
comprehending would be shut off; I should not havi- 
comprehended anything, and it would 1)e evident iliat 
I ought not to have arbitrarily separated the part A 
from X. 

Now let us consider the remainder of X = B. If ?>, 
considered in and for itself, were to result just as A did, 
so far as the relation of impulse and reality are concerned ; 
but if it were likewise to appear that the impulse in 1j 
impels to have the reality which A lacks, whereas, on tliC 
other hand, the impulse iu A impels to have the reality 
lacking in B : then my consideration of B would lead lae 
back to A, in order to ascertain whether A really lacks 
that reality for which I discovered impulse in B, an<l 
whether there is really in A an impulse for the reality 
I discovered lacking in B. Thus should I be compelled 
to consider the matter once more, or to reflect upon, and 
thus lünit my reflection. A composite reflection would 
thus arise, and, since it is governed by necessity, a 
composite law of reflection. 

Moreover, since I could, in like manner, not comprehend 
A except through B, and vice versa; and since I should 
thus be forced to synthetically unite both : X would 
become a real and not merely an ideal totality. 

But X generally is also organic nature, and hence, the 
general law of that nature must apply to it. In so far, it 
is infinitely divisible. Hence, I can divide A in h c d, 
and again « / ^, etc., ad infinitum. Each part, as nature 
in general, has reality and impulse, and is, in so far, 
independent; but each part has this peculiarity, that 
the relation between its impulse and reality cannot be 



124 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

explained out of itself; for, otherwise, it would not Ik? a 
part of tlie actual totality X. 

No part can be explained l)efore all pnrts of X are 
gathered together. Each part tends to satisfy the need 
of all, and all, on the other hand, tend to satisfy tlie need 
of each single part. That which can only be compre- 
hended in this manner, we shall call for the present, until, 
perhaps, we can find a better name for it: an actual 
organic whole. 

I myself am at least such an organic whole. Wlicther 
there are more such outside of me, we cannot at present 
decide. The decision will depend upon tliis: whetlier 
I can comprehend myself as such an organic whole 
without assuming others outside of me or not ? But at 
present, the only question is : how such an actual wliolo 
may be explained out of nature, and what new predicates 
may be ascribed to nature by means of this explanation. 

By requiring that something shall 1)6 explained out 
of nature, we require that it shall be explained to us from 
a law of physical, and not of moral, necessity. Hence, 
by merely asserting the possiljility of such an explanation, 
we assert that it is necessary for nature, and one of tlie 
qualities absolutely appertaining to nature, to organize 
itself into actual totalities, and that the rational 1 »eing can 
think nature only in this manner, and not otherwise. 

(Let no one, therefore, take refuge, from pure laziness of 
reason, in the assumption of an intelligence as the creator 
or architect of the world ; for, amongst other things, it is 
— Firstly, perfectly unthinkable that an intelligence should 
create matter ; and, secondly, it is as yet incomprehensiljle 
how reason can have any influence upon nature, which, 
indeed, we are at present endeavouring to explain. For, 
let an intelligence be ever so able to compose and connect, 
the result of this will merely be aggregation and alliga- 
tion, but never a melting together, which latter process 
presupposes an internal power in nature herself. Neither 
■let anyone attempt to explain organization from mechanical 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 125 

laws. Those laws involve an everlasting r(,'pclling and 
moving away of niattcr,involve attraction and repulsion, 1)Ut 
nothing more. The law of organism is an immanent law of 
nature, which rational beings must think when thinking the 
conception of nature, in order to be aide to explain itself; 
but which law can itself be no further explained. To 
explain it would signify to deduce it from mechanism. 

Of course it is only from the standpoint of common con- 
sciousness, and of common science, that this law remains a 
final absolute, and unexplainal)le. But from the .stand- 
point of transcendental philosophy, and in the science of 
knowledge, it is easily explained, since that science 
explains all nature and deduces it from the Ego.) 

The only question is, what sort of a law this may be, 
and what determined process of nature must necessarily 
be assumed in assuming it ? According to our previously 
established law, each thing which is a thing of nature is, 
through itself, and for itself, that which it is ; no thing i;^ 
anything to another, and no other thing is anything to it. 
This is the principle of substantiality; whereas that of 
natural mechanism is the principle of causality. 

Now, according to our present principle, there is no 
possible element, to which that principle of substantiality 
may apply; no element is self-suflficient, and for and 
through itself independent; each needs another, and this 
other needs it. There is in each an impulse for another. 

If there is such a new principle, then the impulse thus 
determined rules throughout nature. Hence this law of 
nature may also be then expressed : each part of nature 
is impelled to unite its being and its working with the 
being and working of a determined other part of nature, 
and to dissolve together with it in space — if we think 
these parts in space. This impulse we call the orrjanizhuj 
principle in the active and passive significance of the 
word. It is the impulse to organize and to be organized, 
and it is necessary in nature ; e.g., it is not a foreign 
ingredient without which nature might get along just as 



126 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

well. Only let care be taken not to think the seat of 
this im])ulse as cither here or there; or, still worse, to 
think this impulse as itself a separate part. It is no 
substance at all, but an accidence, and an accidence 
pertaining to all parts. 

By thus positing the organization of the Ego as the 
result of a law of nature, we have at least gained so 
much that we find the organizing principle throughout 
all nature; for whether this impulse has causality also 
outside of our bodies, we are not as yet to decide. 

But in me — this is our second point gained — this 
impulse has certainly causality. Certain parts of nature, 
and of the being and working of nature, have united 
themselves to produce one being and one causality. In 
this respect, that which we called an actual whole of 
nature may more properly be called organized product 
of nature. 

There are such products, for I myself am such. We 
do not speak, as yet, of materiality in space, which would 
result in an actual manifold, although it miglit be easy to 
deduce it ; but it is at least sure that the ideal manifold 
within me unites to form organization. Xow this uniting 
is product of the organizing power of nature. 

Hence the result of our present investigation is this : 
As sure as I am, I must ascribe causality to nature, since 
I can posit myself only as the product of nature. 

We have therefore proven, though by no means yet 
completely analyzed, that which was to be proven. 



CHAPTER VI. 

RESULTS FROM THE FOREGOING. 
I. 

I FIND myself as an organized product of nature. But 
in such a product the essence of the part consists in 
an impulse to maintain certain other parts in unity with 
itself, which impulse, when attributed to the whole, is 
called the impulse of self-preservation. For since the 
essence of the whole is nothing but a uniting of certain 
parts into itself, self-preservation is simply the preserva- 
tion of this uniting. To see this clearly, let tlie reader 
consider the following : Each possible part strives to unite 
other determined parts with itself. But this tendency 
can have no causality unless parts that nmtually support 
each other are united ; for only on this condition does an 
organized whole exist. Now, the whole is nothing but 
the parts taken together. Hence, nothing can be in the 
whole but that which is in the parts, namely, a desire to 
gather certain parts into itself; and, in so far as a complete 
whole is to exist, this desire must have causality. Its 
essence consists in a reciprocal causality between this 
tendency and this causality, which are mutually con- 
ditioned through another, for it is a wliole, and the 
comprehending of the same is completed ; and, in so far, 
the above established conception applies again to it in 
relation to all other nature. It preserves itself, signifies: 
it preserves that reciprocal causality between its tendency 
and its causality. If either is cancelled, everthing is 

127 



128 THE SCIENCE OE ET///CS. 

cancelled. A product of nature, wliich no lonj^cr organizes 
itself, ceases to be an organized produf.t, for tlic cliaractcr 
of organization consists in the continuing of the process 
of organization. 

The tendency to self-j)rosorvation is not, as seems 
generally to l)e assumed, a tendency whicli desires existence 
in general, but which desires a particular determined exis- 
tence; it is an impulse of the thing to be and to remain 
that which it is. For mere general existence is simply an 
abstract conception, and not anytliing concrete. An 
impulse having it for its object does not exist at all. A 
rational being never desires to 1)6 in order to be, Ijut in 
order to be this or that. Xeither does an irrational 
product of nature ever strive and work to be, l^ut always 
to be precisely that which it is ; an apple tree strives 
to be and remain an apple tree, and a pear tree a pear 
tree. In irrational products of nature, moreover, tlie 
impulse is, at the same time, effect ; and hence, the apple 
tree can never bear pears, nor the pear tree apples. 
To change kind in this manner is a check of the whole 
organization, and sooner or later results in its destruction. 

It is in like manner with me. There is in me an 
impulse, originated through nature, and relating itself 
to objects of nature, in order to unite them with my being ; 
not exactly to gather them into myself, as I do meat and 
drink through digestion, but rather to relate them in 
general to my natural necessities, or to put them intc^ 
a certain relation with myself. Now, this impulse is the 
impulse of self-preservation in the above specified signifi- 
cance of the word, of the preservation of myself as this 
particular product of nature. The relating of those means 
to my impulse and object is done immediately and abso- 
lutely without all mediating cognition, calculation, or 
consideration. That upon which this impulse is directed, 
belongs to my preservation, because the impulse craves it ; 
and whatsoever belongs to my preservation the impulse 
craves, because it belongs to my preservation. The con- 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 129 

nection is not made tlnougli freedom, but is involved in 
nature's law of orii;anizati()n. 

Here already we meet an important fact, tlie results 
whereof extend very far, and the neglect whereof lias 
been of great disadvantage as well to phil().s(i]ihy in 
general as to the science of morality in particular. 
— My impulse craves the object X. Docs perhaps the 
attraction proceed from X, and taking hold of my nature, 
thus determine my impulse? By no means. The impulse 
solely proceeds out from my nature. This nature lias 
already determined, in advance, what is to exist for me, 
and my impulses and tendencies are directed upon all 
that which is thus determined to exist for me, even 
before it actually docs exist and affect me ; nay, would 
crave it even though it could not exist for me, and would 
never be satisfied without it. But it does exist and mtist 
exist, by virtue of the completedness of nature as an 
organized totality in itself. I do not hunger because food 
exists for me, but certain objects of nature become food 
for me because I am hungry. It is the same with all 
organized products of nature. A plant is not impelled 
by the existence of substances which belong to its 
composition to gather them up into itself, but rather 
the internal construction of the plant demands the 
existence of precisely these substances independent of 
their actual existence, and if these substances did not 
exist in nature at all, that plant could also not exist 
in nature. 

In short, everywhere is harmony and reciprocality, not 
mere mechanism, for mechanism produces no impulse 1 
As sure as I am I, my desires and tendencies never 
proceed — even in my most animal needs — from the 
external object, but always from myself. If this remark 
is overlooked here, it will not be understood when it 
occurs again in a more important part, viz., when we 
come to develop the law of morality. 



K 



130 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

II. 

This my impulse is, moreover, for me an oliject of my 
reflection, and this necessarily as described alcove. As 
certain as I reflect at all, am I necessitated to perceive 
this impulse, and to posit it as mine. I say, as certain as 
/ reflect, for reflection itself is no product of nature, and 
cannot be such. Itself in its form occurs with al)Soh;te 
spontaneity, and only the object of the reflection, and the 
necessity to attend to this object, is an effect of nature. 

Through this reflection directed upon tlie impulse tliere 
arises firstly a yearning, a feeling of a need not known to 
one's self. We lack we do not know what. Even through 
this, as the very first result of reflection, is the Ego 
distinguished from all other products of nature. Im- 
pulses in the latter either result in being satisfied, or 
result in nothing at all. 

No one will seriously assert that in dry weather plants 
experience a yearning, caused by the absence of water. 
They either drink or wither, and there is no third result 
as the effect of their natural impulse. 

III. 

As intelligence, and hence as subject of consciousness, 
I am absolutely free and dependent only upon my self- 
determination. This is my character. Hence my nature 
also, in so far as it is assigned to me ; i.e., in so far as it is 
immediate object of consciousness, must also be dependent 
only upon self-determination. 

But in how far is it assigned to me, as suhjcct (>f 
conscioiiS7iess ? The product of the reciprocal causality 
of my nature is the impulse. Now this reciprocal 
causality is not my causality as intelligence; I do not 
become immediately conscious of it at all. The impulse 
itself is likewise not my product, it is given and does not 
depend upon my freedom. But the impulse enters con- 
sciousness, and all it effects in this region depends upon 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 131 

inc, or rather, the impulse li.as no effect iii tlii.s region at 
all, it being I who do or do not cflect Bomething in it hy 
virtue of tliat impulse. Here, then, lies the tiansition to 
self-determination on the part of the rational l)eing; here 
lies the determined and sharpdrawn limit between 
necessity and freedom. 

The satisfaction of the impulse in plant or animnl 
occurs necessarily wherever its conditions arise. Lut 
man is not at all impelled by his natural impulse. Our 
digestion, the change of our food into nourishment, or the 
circulation of our blood, &c., are not matters under our 
.-control, they are the processes of nature in us, above 
alluded to. They are not under our control, as intelli- 
gence, because we do not immediately become conscious of 
them ; for that which physiologists or doctors know of 
them they know mediately. But the satisfying of our 
hunger or thirst is under our control, since we have 
immediate consciousness of our desire for food and drink. 
Or, is there anyone willing to assert that he eats and 
drinks with the same mechanical necessity wherewith 
he digests. 

In short, it is not within my control to feel or not feel 
an impulse within me, but it is within my control to 
satisfy it or not. 

IV. 

I reflect on my yearning, and thus raise to clear con- 
sciousness what at first was only a dark feeling. But I 
cannot reflect on it without determining it as a yearning, 
in consequence "of the universally valid law of reflection ; 
or, in other words, without distinguishing it from another 
possible yearning. But one yearning can be distinguished 
from another only through its object. Hence through 
this second reflection I also become conscious of the 
object of my yearning; concerning the reality or non- 
reality whereof we do not as yet trouble ourselves. We 
merely posit it here as an object yearned for. But a 
yearning determined through its object is called desire. 



132 THE SCIENCE OF ETI/ICS. 

The manifold of desire united into one conception, and 
considered as a faculty grounded in the Ego, is called 
fnculty of desire. If we should in the course of our 
investigation meet with another desire — the manifold 
whereof we could also unite into a faculty — it would ho 
proper to call the present faculty, as Kant has indeed 
called it, the lower desire. 

The form of this desire as such, i.e., that it is an 
impulse accompanied by consciousness, has its ground in 
the free act of reflection. But that an impulse exists at 
all, and that this impulse or this desire is directed 
precisely upon such an o]»ject, has its ground in nature; 
not however in external nature, \\\ the nature of ohjects, 
Init in my own nature, and hence it is an inimanenb 
ground. Thus even in desire does freedom already 
manifest itself, since a free reflection enters between 
yearning and desiring. 

Hence it is well possible to suppress inordinate desires, 
by not reflecting upon, by ignoring them, or by busying 
oneself, particularly with mental labour ; in short, by not 
"giving way to them," as the theological moralists very 
properly express themselves. 

V. 

My desire has for its object things of nature, either 
with a view to immediately unite them with me (like 
food and drink) or, to place them into a certain relation 
to me (like free air, fine prospect, clear weather), etc. 
• Now things of nature exist firstly in space for me, 
which we presuppose as well known from the science of 
knowledge; and hence that wherewith they are to bo 
imitcd, or to which they are to be placed in a certain 
relation, must also exist in space ; since there is no uniting 
of that which has space, and no relating of it except to 
that which also is in space ; for otherwise it would either 
not remain in space, which is absurd, or it would not be 
a relation, which ia against the presupposition. Xow 



THE PRINCIPLE OE MORALITY. 133 

that wliich is in si)<ace and fills s[)ace we call iiiaticr. I 
am, therefore, as product of natnre, matter, and, according 
to the above, organized matter, forming a fixed totality. 
We call this our hody. 

But it is, secondly, to be within the control of my will, 
whether I will unite things with me, or, place them into 
a relation to me, or not. Now this uniting and relation 
relates to parts of my organized body, and this (my 
body) is the immediate instrument of my will. Hence 
these parts must stand under the control of my will. 
Again, since here we speak of relations in space, these 
parts as parts, i.e. in their relation to the totality of my 
body, must be movable; and my body itself must be 
moval)le in its relation to the totality of nature. More- 
over, since this movement is to depend upon a free pro- 
duced conception, indefinitely modifiable, it must be a 
manifold movement. Such an arrangement of the body 
is called articulation. If I am to be free, my body must 
be articulated. (Compare the first part of my science of 
rights.) 

Remark. 

We have arrived at one of those standpoints from 
which we can comfortably look around us, and observe 
whether our investigation has been somewhat cleared up. 

There exists in us an impulse for things of nature, in 
order to bring them into a certain relation to our own 
nature ; an impulse which has no object except itself, and 
which craves to satisfy itself merely that it may l)e 
satisfied. Satisfaction for the sake of satisfaction is 
called mere enjoijmcnt. 

It is of importance to ns that the conviction of the 
absoluteness of this natural impulse should force itself 
upon everyone. Each organised product of nature is its 
own object, i.e. it organizes simply for the sake of organizing, 
and organizes thus, simply in order to organize thus. Not 
as if we wanted to say that the irrational product of 



134 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

nature never iliinlis another olijeet.tlian itself; for tliis is 
Belf-understood, since it does not think at all; Init we 
wish to say, that even an intelligenee outside of such 
product cannot — without Ijcing illogical, and explaining 
utterly wrongly — ascribe any other or external object to 
such products. There is only an internal and absolute, 
but by no means a relative, teleological arrangement in 
nature ; since the latter only arises through the manifold 
purposes which a free being may propose to itself, and, 
perliapa in part, execute in nature. 

It is the same with the rational being in so far as it is 
mere nature. It satisfies itself simply in order to satisfy 
itself, and every determined object which satisfies it, 
exists simply because precisely such oliject was required 
by the nature of the rational being. Again, since the 
rational being becomes conscious of its yearning, it 
necessarily also becomes conscious of the satisfaction of 
this yearning ; this satisfaction produces enjoyment, and 
this enjoyment is its last end and object. The natural 
man does not eat with a view to preserve and strengthen 
his body, but because hunger i§ painful, and food pleasant 

to him. 

Several analysers of our feelings, particularly ]\Iendels- 
sohn, have explained the feeling of enjoyment as arising 
from the feeling of an improvement of our bodily con- 
dition. This is quite correct if mere sensual enjoyment 
is meant, and if the bodily condition is accepted merely 
as a state of organization. Jersusalem, in his Philosophicat 
Essays, objects to this theory, that enjoyment is felt even 
when our bodily condition is growing worse, nay, in the 
immediate feeling of this growing worse, as, for instance, 
in the case of drunkards when they are becoming in- 
toxicated. But in all examples of this kind it will be 
remarked that the growing worse has only reference to 
the state of articulation, whereas the state of the organi- 
zation is constantly growing better at the time, the play 
and t]ie reciprocal action of the several parts more perfect. 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 135 

and their coinmunication with suiTouiuHiig nature more 
unchecked. But all sensuous enjoyment, as we liave 
shown, has reference to the or^ranization of the 1>ody, 
whereas tlie articulation, as such, as tool of our frccdovi, 
is not truly product of nature, l»ut rather of practice 
through freedom ; and the bad results, which the organi- 
zation may be threatened with, we do not take into 
account, since the future is never immediately felt, Man 
is herein a mere plant. When the plant grows it would 
feel well, could it rcllect. But the plant miglit also over-, 
grow, and thus hasten on its destruction, and yet not l>e 
disturbed in its feeling of satisfaction. 

Now, it is within our power of freedom to either follow 
this impulse of mere enjoyment or not. Each satisfying 
of an impulse, if consciously undertaken, is necessarily 
done through freedom, and our body is so arranged that we 
can work through it with freedom. 

In so far as man has mere enjoyment for his oltject, he 
is dependent upon something given, namely, upon the 
existence of the object of his impulse ; hence, he is not 
self-sufficient, and the attainment of his purpose depends 
also in part upon nature. But, in so far as man but 
reflects and thus becomes subject of consciqusness — we have 
shown above, that he necessarily reflects on the impulse, — 
he becomes Ego, and hence, the tendency of reason to 
absolutely determine itself through itself as subject of con- 
sciousness, will manifest itself in him. 

One important question. My impulse as a being of 
nature, and my tendency as pure spirit: are they two 
different im.pulses ? By no means. Erom the transcen- 
dental point of view, both are one and the same original 
impulse, which constitutes my being, only regarded from 
two different sides. For I am subject-object, and in the 
identity and inseparability of both consists my true being. 
If I regard myself as object, completely determined through 
the laws of sensuous perception and discursive thinking, 
then that, which is in part my only impulse, becomes my 



130 : THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

natural impulse, l)Gcause I myself am nature from this 
point of view. But if I regard myself as sm^/cc^, then that 
impulse becomes for me a purely si)iritual impulse, or 
a law of my self-determination. All the phenomena of tlie 
Ego are based simply upon the reciprocity of tliese two 
impulses, which two impulses are, in fact, only the reci- 
procal relation of one and the same impulse to itself: its 
self-relation. 

This explains,, at the same time, how two such utter 
opposites as tlie two impulses can occur in a Ijeing, whicli 
is to be absolutely one and the same. Both are, indeed, 
also one; but the wliole Egoness is based upon tlieir 
appearing as two opposites. The limit between ])oth is 
reflection. 

The reflecting, as that which contemplates in the re- 
flection, is higlier than the reflected, rises above and 
eml)races it; hence, the impulse of the reflecting, of tlio 
subject of consciousness, is properly called the higher 
impidse, and a faculty of desire, determined by it, is called 
the higher faculty of desire. 

Only the reflected is nature. The reflecting is opposed 
to it, and hence, is no nature, but raised al)ove all nature. 
The higher impulse, as the impulse of tlie purely 
spiritual, is directed upon absolute self-determination to 
an activity for the mere sake of the activity. Hence, it 
is opposed to all enjoyment which is a mere passive 
surrendering to nature. 

But both constitute only one and the same Ego ; hence, 
both impulses must be united within the sphere of con- 
sciousness. It will appear that in this union the higher 
' impulse must abandon its ^pj^'zY?/, i.e., its non-determined- 
ness through an object; whilst the lower impulse must 
abandon its enjoyment, for the mere sake of enjoyment. 
Hence, as result, there will appear an ohj'cctive activity, 
the final end whereof is absolute freedom, absolute inde- 
pendence of nature. But this is an infinite, never 
ä,ttainable end; and hence, it can only be our problem 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 137 

to state how we must act in order to appi'oach tliat 
final end. 

To take cognizance merely of the liiglier impulse would 
result in a mere mctaphysic of morals, which is formal and 
empty. Only through synthetically uniting it with the 
lower impulse do we attain a science of morals which 
is real. 



CHAPTER VIL 

CONCERNING FKEEDOM AND THE HIGHER IMPULSE. 

I. 

The final production of my nature, as such, is an impulse. 
/ reflect on myself, i.e., on this my given nature, which, as 
immediate object of my reflection, is nothing but an im- 
pulse. Now, everything depends upon our completely 
determining this reflection. In order to do so, we must 
examine — 1st, its form; 2nd, its content; and 3rd, the 
connection of both. 

TJmt the reflection occurs, or its form, is an absolute 
fact ; it occurs because it does, or because I am I. So far 
as its content or object is concerned, we have alreaxly 
shown that this is our natural impulse, and the only ques- 
tion is, lioiu far our nature may be the immediate object 
of that reflection. This, also, we have already answered 
as follows: in so far as I am necessitated to assign somewhat 
to me as the reflecting. The connection of both is, that 
both are to be one and the same. T, the natural being (for 
another I does not exist for me), am at the same time for 
myself the reflecting. That natural being is the substance, 
and the reflection is an accidence of that substance; is an 
expression of the freedom of the natural being. Thus 
posits the reflection about to be described. Concerning 
the ground of this connection, common consciousness does 
not even ask. From the standpoint of common conscious- 
ness it would merely be said: "I 'happen to be such a 
being, with such a given nature, and the consciousness 

«3» 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 139 

thereof; and tliat sulliccs"; leaving altogctlicr uncom- 
prehended, wliicli indeed tliat standpoint also docs not 
propose to comprehend, how such a harnK)ny lietween 
complete and mutually independent oj)2)Osite8 is at all 
possihle. That nature, on its part, determines and limits- 
something in tlic manner in wliicli my nature is deter- 
mined and limited, can be comprehended; and likewise, 
that the intelligence, on its part, forms a certain re]irc- 
sentation and determines it in a certain manner. IJut- 
how both, in tlieir independent actions, sliould liarmOnizc 
and arrive at the samt result, is utterly incom})rchensiljle, 
since neither the intelligence gives laws to nature, nor 
nature to the intelligence. The former assertion would,- 
indeed, be Idealism, and the latter Materialism ; whereas 
the system of fore-established harmony, as usually taken, 
takes cognizance of neither side, and leaves the question 
unanswered. 

From the standpoint of transcendental philosophy we 
have already solved this problem. There is no such thing 
as nature by itself; my nature and all other nature, 
posited to explain mine, is merely a peculiar manner of 
regarding myself. I am limited only in the world of 
intelligence, and through this limitation of my original 
impulse my reflection is most certainly limited to myself, 
and, vice versa, through my reflection of myself my 
original impulse is limited ; of course, for me, since we 
cannot speak of any other limitation of myself than for 
myself. On the standpoint of transcendentalism we have 
no independent twofold at all, but an absolute simple ; 
and where there is no difference it were absurd to speak 
of a harmony, or ask for its ground. 

But at present we occupy the standpoint of common 
consciousness, and follow its path. Through the described 
reflection the Ego tears itself loose from all, that is, to be 
outside of it, gets itself under its own control, and places 
itself before itself as absolutely self-sufflcient. For the 
reflecting is self-sufficient, and only dependent upon itself; 



I40 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

l)nfc the reflected is tlie same as tlie renectiii^'. Nf)t, as 
iiii<;lit Hceiii at tlio first fijlaiico, as if we merely iDeant to 
say that the Ego, from this ])oiiit inwards, simply observes 
itself; nay, we distinctly assert that from this point 
nothing can occur in the Ego without the active deter- 
mining of the intelligence, Reflecting and reflected are 
united, and represent one single undivided person. The 
reflected brings the actual power, and the reflecting brings 
consciousness, into the person. The person liereafter can 
do nothing except with consciousness and according to 
free conceptions. 

An actuality, which has its ground in a conception, is 
called a product of freedom. No actuality can, from tlie 
stated point, be ascribed to the Ego, except as a con- 
sequence of the Ego's own conception thereof. Hence 
the Ego is free from that point onwards, and all that the 
Ego henceforth does is product of this freedom. 

This is indeed the important point, and it is our 
present intention to clear up at once the theory of 
freedom. Each link in a series of nature is a pre- 
determiner, be it according to the law of mechanism or 
of organization. Hence if we know the nature of a thing, 
and the law which governs it, we can tell for all time to 
come how the thing will manifest itself. But that which 
occurs in the Ego, commencing at the point where it 
became an Ego, and providing the Ego truly remains Ego, 
is not predetermined, and is absolutely undeterminable. 
There is no law according to which free self-determinations 
occur or may be calculated in advance, since they are 
dependent upon the self-determination of the Intelligence, 
which, as such, is absolutely free and altogether pure 
activity. 

A series of nature is steady. Each link in it effects 
wholly whatsoever it can effect. But a series of freedom- 
determination consists of leaps and progresses utterly 
irregularly.. Think one link of such a series as determined, 
and call it A. From A many other links are possible. 



THE PRINCIPLE OE MORALITY. 141 

liut not all possible links, only ono of theni^X results. 
Hence whilst in a scries of nature all links connect closely, 
in such a scries of freedom the connection l)ieaks off at 
every link. In a series of freedom-determinations no link 
can be explained, for each is a primary and a])sohite. 
In series of nature the law of causality is valid ; Imt 
in the freedom series the law of substantiality rules, 
i.e. each free resolve is itself substantial, is what it is 
absolutely through itself. 

Beyond the stated rcHection, natural necessity can no 
longer control me, for beyond it I am no longer a link 
of nature's chain. The last link of nature is an impulse, 
but only an impulse, having, therefore, no causality in a 
spiritual being ; and thus we can make freedom com- 
prehensible even from the standpoint of a philosophy of 
nature. The causality of nature has its limit; now if 
there is to be any causality beyond the limit, it must 
be that of another power. That which results from an 
impulse is not a result of nature, since nature exhausted 
herself in the production of the impulse. It is / who 
produce this result, true by means of a power which 
I get from nature, but which is no longer under her 
but under my control, since it is under the control of 
a principle utterly removed beyond the authority of 
nature, namely, of the Conception. We shall call free- 
dom in this respect, formal freedom. Whatsoever I do, 
simply being conscious in so doing, I do with formal 
freedom. Hence a man might always follow merely 
his natural impulse, and yet, if he only acted with 
consciousness, and not mechanically, we should have to 
ascribe freedom to him in the above significance of the 
word, for the last ground of his act would be his con- 
sciousness of the impulse, and not the natural impulse 
itself. (I am not aware that- any writer has as yet 
treated the conception of freedom in this respect, in 
which it is nevertheless the root of all freedom, with 
care and attention. Perhaps most of the errors and 



142 THE SCIENCE OE ETHICS. 

<;oinp]aints respecting the incoinprehensiljility of our 
doctrine have their origin in tlii.s.) 

COROLLAUIUM. 

No opponent of the assertion of freedom can deny that 
he is conscious of states, for whicli he can assign no other 
ground than themselves. But tlie sharpwitted of these 
opponents say: "It does not follow from tliat fact that 
those states have no external ground at all, hut merely 
that we are not conscious of them." And they proceed: 
"It does not follow that because we are not conscious 
of those grounds, those states have no causes." Xow 
here they l)ecome at once transcendent. We are abso- 
lutely unable to posit causes, signifies for us, I trust: 
Such causes are not. They continue : " For everything 
has its cause, and hence those resolves, which we believe 
to be our own, have also their causes, although we are 
not conscious of these causes." Here they clearly pre- 
suppose what was to ])e proven, namely, that the Ego 
belongs to the series of nature and is subject to the laws 
of nature ; their proof is, therefore, an evident circle. 
Of course, the defender of freedom can on his part also 
only presuppose that Egoness, the conception whereof 
involves that it does not belong to nature. But he has 
the decided advantage over his opponents that he is aljle 
to actually build up a system of philosophy, which they 
cannot do ; and moreover, he has on his side a contem- 
plation whereof they know nothing. They are only 
discursive thinkers, and utterly lack intuition. One 
inust not enter into dispute with them, but one ought 
to cultivate them, if possible, 

IL 

According to the foregoing I am free, but do not 
posit myself as free; I am free, perhaps, for an intelligence 
outside of me, not for myself. But / am something only 
in so far as I posit myself as such. 



THE PRINXIPLE OF MORALITY. 143 

■ What appertains, let us ask firstly, to this positin«^ 
myself as free? I posit myself as free when 1 liecome 
conscious of my transition from undeterminedness to 
<letermineclnes3. I, in so far as I have a power of action, 
find myself undetermined. In the reilection on this con- 
dition it is expressed hy my power of imagination lloating 
hetween opposite determinations. With tliis commences 
the perception of my freedom. But now I determine 
myself, and the reflection is also at the same time 
determined. / determine myself; which is this deter- 
mining I ? Doubtless the one 1^'go, which resulted from 
the union of the reflecting and the reflected ; and this 
same determining Ego is in the same undivided act, and 
in the same view, likewise the determined. In the con- 
sciousness of freedom object and subject are completely 
one.. The conception (of my purpose) grows immediately 
into the deed ; and the deed immediately into the con- 
ception (cognition of my freedom). 

Those were quite in the right who denied that freedom 
could be dbjzd of consciousness ; freedom is not object 
but subject-object of consciousness. It is true that we 
become immediately conscious of our freedom through 
the deed, by self-actively tearing ourselves loose from 
a state of indecision, and choosing a definite purpose, 
because we choose it, particularly if this purpose runs 
contrary to all our inclinations, and is nevertheless chosen 
for duty's sake. But this consciousness requires energy 
of will and intensity of contemplation. There are in- 
dividuals, who, in point of fact, never vnll, but always 
leave themselves to be driven and impelled by a blind 
impulse, and who, for that reason, have also never clear 
consciousness, since they never self-actively produce, 
determine, and direct their representations, but merely 
dream a long dream, determined by the dark . association 
of ideas. To these, of course, we do not speak, when we 
fipeak of consciousness of freedom. 

Consciousness of my undeterminedness is, thgrpfore, 



144 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

the condition of the consciousness of my free-active self- 
determining. But imdeterminedness is not merely not- 
determinedness = 0, but is an undecided lioating between 
many possible determinations ( = a negative), since other- 
wise it could not be posited, and would be notliing. 
At present, however, we are as yet unaljle to tell how 
freedom can be directed, and posited as thus directed 
upon many possible determinations. There is no otlier 
object of the application of freedom than the natural 
impulse. Whenever this impulse occurs, there is no 
reason why freedom should not follow it. And there 
is reason why freedom should follow it. True, it might 
be said, that there are many impulses working at the 
same time — though we have no reasoji to assume this 
on our present standpoint; but if there are, then the 
strongest impulse will decide, and we have again no 
possibility of an undeterminedness. 

In so far as the free being occupies this state, which is 
not an original state, but may unhappily be too truly an 
acquired state, we say that the free being follows an 
inclination; and since this inclination is preceded by no 
reflection and no undeterminedness, we justly call it a 
blind inclination ; an inclination whereof the free being 
as such does not, and cannot, become conscious. 

But I am I only, in so far as I am conscious of this 
my I ; that is to say, as I am free and self-determined. 
This consciousness of freedom is the condition of Egoness. 
(It is thus that that which we are al)Out to deduce 
obtains universal validity, namely, by our showing, tliat 
a rational being is not at all possible without conscious- 
ness of this freedom, and hence without the conditions of 
this freedom; and since the consciousness of morality 
belongs to these conditions, that a rational being is not at 
all possible without this moral consciousness. Morality 
is^ therefore, not sometliing accidental, nor a foreign in- 
gredient, but it is an essential condition of rationality. 
That this consciousness of freedom and morality may at 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 145 

times, and, perhaps, to a great extent, be clouded, and 
man thus sink down to be a mere machine, is certainly 
possible, and we shall hereafter show tlie reason for it. 
All we mean to assert, at present, is that no man can be 
absolutely without all moral feeling.) 

Since all that occurs in the Ego is explained out of an 
impulse, there must be an impulse to become conscious of 
this freedom, and hence also of the conditions of that 
consciousness. But the condition of such a consciousness 
is undeterminedness. Undetermincdncss is not possiljle 
if the Ego solely follows the natural impulse. Hence 
there must be an impulse in the Ego to determine itself, 
without regard, nay, in very opposition to the natural 
impulse. But such an impulse, since we are here speak- 
ing of the consciousness of freedom, would he cravinrj for 
freedom for the mere sake of freedom. 

I will call this freedom, to distinguish it from the 
previously described formal freedom, material freedom. 
Formal freedom arises when a new formal principle, a 
new power, enters, although the material in the series of 
effects does not experience the least change. It is not 
nature any longer that acts, but the free Ijeing. The free 
being, however, effects precisely the same as nature would 
have effected. 

Whereas material freedom is distinguished by this, 
that not only a new power, but also a wholly new series 
of material acts, enters. The intelligence does not merely 
work, but works out likewise something utterly different 
from what nature would have worked out. 

It is our next duty to deduce this impulse, to describe 
it, and to show how it may manifest itself. 



III. 

We have to deduce the impulse. In our forgoing we 
have proven that unless such an impulse exists self- 
consciousness is not possible, since the consciousness of 



146 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

an uiidctcnniiicdness, wliicli is tlio condition of self- 
consciousnoss, is not possible. Tliis was an indirect j^root' 
of that impulse. IJut for the sake — not of the certainty 
of the matter, Init of the results which will show them- 
selves, we must furnish this proof directly, i.e., genetically, 
or from the conception of the Ej^'o itself. 

I have said that the Ego gets itself altogether under its 
own control through the absolute free reflection of the 
Ego on itself, as a natural being. All I need now is to 
make this proposition clearer, and the direct j^rofjf 
required will be furnished. 

This self-reflection of the Ego, as a primary reflection, 
is an act aljsolutely grounded in the Ego. An act, I 
say, whereas the natural impulse upon which the 
reflection is directed, and which is certainly held to 
belong to the Ego, is a passivity in relation to that act ; 
is a something given, and existing indej)endent of tliat 
free activity. 

Now let it l)e firstly olxserved, that in order to explain 
the consciousness of that first reflection as an act, we 
must posit a new reflection, having for its oly'ect the 
reflecting of the flrst reflection. Let us consider tliis 
second reflection. Since the object of the first reflection 
— the natural impulse-^is a])stracted from, this second 
reflection clearly has for its object only the pure aVjsolutc 
activity of the flrst reflection, and this activity alone is 
the real and true p]go, to which the impulse is opjiosited 
as something foreign, which, althougli it is in the Ego, is 
not the Ego. 

Xow these two reflections are not in any way to be 
thought as separate and distinct reflections, although we 
had thus to describe them, merely to make their descrip- 
tion possible. They are, on the contrary, one and the 
same act. The Ego becomes immediately conscious of 
its absolute activity through inner self -contemplation; 
without which, indeed, an Ego were completely incompre- 
hensible. 



THE PRFNCrPLE OF MORALITY. 147 

For let it bo well ol)serv(;(l, it is only through th(; 
second reflection (it seems I must continue thus to 
describe them as separates) that the activity, which other- 
wise would have remained simply tiie determined activity 
of reflecting, changes wito activity in general, tlie oltject 
thereof having been aljstracted from. The distinction 
between mere ideal activity, the reflection of a given 
Bomewhat, and the real absolute determining of a given 
somewhat, occurs later. 

To state it more concisely, and tlms perhaps clearer, 
with the reflection enters a new power, which transmits 
through itself the tendency of nature. This is wliat we 
have shown above. At present this new power is to 
enter for mc, I am to l)ecome conscious thereof as of a 
particular and new power. This is only })ossible, if I 
think that power as torn loose from tlie hold of the 
impulse, i.e., if I assume that it may not follow Ijut can 
resist the impulse. Now this resisting is, as yet, posited 
as a mere power to resist; and if it is, as it must be, 
considered as immanent and essential in the Ego, it is 
posited as an impulse. Indeed — which throws a flood of 
light on this proof from another side — it is through this 
very impulse of resistance that the influence of nature 
upon us remains merely an impulse, since without it, it 
would be actual causality. 

Now this impulse of the Ego, which merely occui's in 
the Ego as pure activity, we shall call, therefore, the pure 
impulse ; and leave to the other impulse the name already 
given — natural impulse. 

We only need now to consider the relation of these two 
impulses to each other, in order to see how both manifest 
themselves, but particularly how the pure impulse, the 
most important to our present investigation, may manifest 
itself. 

The natural impulse, as impulse determined in 2}fccisel>/ 
such or sueh a manner, is accidental to the Effo. Regarded 
from the transcendental point of view, this impulse is the 



148 THE SCIENCE OF ET/flCS. 

result of our limitation. Tnio, it is necessary that we are 
limited at all, aiiico otherwise consciousness would he 
impossible ; but it is accidental, that wc are limited in 
prccischj such or such a manner. 

The imrc impulse, on the contrary, is essential to tlic 
Ego, since it is grounded in the Egoness as such. Hence 
the impulse exists in all rational beings, and hence its 
results are valid for all rational beinss. 

Again, the pure impulse is a higher, superior impulse — 
an impulse which elevates me in my pure essence above 
nature, and requires of me, as an empirical l)eing in time, 
to elevate myself al)ove nature. For nature has causality, 
and is a power in relation to me ; nature produces an 
impulse within me, which, when directed upon my purely 
formal freedom, utters itself as an inclination. But 
according to the higher impulse, tliis power of nature has 
not, and shall not, have control over me ; I am to deter- 
mine myself utterly independent of the impulses of 
nature. 

Through this higher impulse, I am thus not only 
separated from, but likewise elevated aljove nature ; I am 
not only a link in the scries of natural, but I can, more- 
over, self-actively interfere in this series. 

In perceiving the power of nature to lie below me, that 
power becomes something which I no longer esteem. For 
I only esteem that which arouses me to exert all my 
energy in order merely to counterbalance it; and I do not 
esteem that which does not demand such energy of me. 
This is the case with nature ; one resolve, and I stand 
above nature. 

If, on the other hand, I should surrender myself, and 
become a part of that which I cannot esteem, I also can 
no longer esteem myself from the higher point of view. 
Hence, in its relation to the inclination which would drag 
me down into the series of natural causality, the higher 
impulse manifests itself as an impulse which claims my 
esteem, arouses me to esteem myself, and invests me with 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 149 

a dignity superior to all nature. It never lias onjoyrnent 
for its ol)ject, and, on the contrary, dos])iscs enjoyment. 
The higher impulse makes enjoyment, for mere enjoy- 
ment's sake, contemptible. It has for its ol)ject solely tiic 
maintenance of my dignity, which consists in absolute 
ßclf-determinedness and self-sufficiency. 



CHAPTEli Vlil. 

CONX'ERNING CONSCIENCE. 

In opposition to our usual habit, it becomes almost 
necessary for us to step out of the systematic connection, 
in order to furnish a preliminary description of a concep- 
tion, through which we hope to spread a clearer liglit over 
the important but difficult investigation to which we now 
have to pass over. 

It is a fact that some events are utterly indi fie rent to 
us, while others arouse our interest; and it is to be 
supposed that these expressions are understood by all. 
That which is indifierent to me has apparently no relation 
— but since this is impossible, it has only a remote rela- 
tion—to my impulse. That which interests me, on the 
contrary, must have an ivimcdiatc relation to my impulse, 
and cannot be produced by any arguments. No one can 
cause you to rejoice or sorrow by the power of his demon- 
strations. All mediated interest (interest is something as 
a means to attain a certain object) is grounded in an 
immediate interest. 

What does this signify: something has immediate 
relation to an impulse ? The impulse itself is only object 
of feeling ; hence, an immediate relation to it could also 
only be felt. An interest in something is of an immediate 
character, signifies therefore : its harmony or disharmony 
with the impulse is felt in advance of all reasoning, and 
independent of all reasoning. 

But I feel only myself; and, hence, this harmony or 

ISO 



THE PRINCIPLE OP MORALITY. 151 

di^hr.niiony must l)e iu iiiyself, or must be siuiply a 
harmony or disharmouy of myself with myself. 

Let us look at the matter from another side. All 
interest is mediated throuj^h the interest I liave iu 
myself, and it is only a modification of this self-interest. 
Whatsoever interests me relates itself to me ; I enjoy in 
all enjoyment, I suHer in all sufTcring. "Whence arises 
this interest in myself ? Simply from an impulse, since 
all interest arises from an impulse, and it arises in this 
manner: my fundamental impulse, as a ])ure and em- 
pirical being who have liecome one, out of these two very 
different components of myself, only through means of 
that impulse, is an impulse craving harmony between my 
original Ego, as determined in the mere idea, and my 
actual empirical Ego. Now this original im] )ulse — namely 
the pure and the natural impulse in their union — is a 
determined impulse, that is to say, is directed upon some- 
thing in an immediate manner. Now, whenever my 
actual condition agrees with this direction or requirement 
of the original impulse, enjoyment arises ; and whenever 
my actual condition contradicts that requirement, dis- 
satisfaction ensues ; and Ijoth enjoyment or satisfaction, 
and suffering or dissatisfaction, are nothing but the 
immediate sensation of harmony or disharmony of my 
actual condition, with the condition required by the 
original impulse. 

The lower faculty of desire arises from an impulse, 
which, in truth, is nothing but the organizing impulse of 
our nature. This im})ulse directs itself to the self- 
determined being, which is necessitated to unite that 
impulse with itself synthetically, or to posit itself as 
being impelled. The impulse manifests itself through a 
yearning. Where lies this yearning? Not in nature, 
but in the subject of consciousness, for it has Ijeen 
reflected. Yearning has for its object nothing that is not 
involved in the natural impulse ; namely, a material 
relation of the external world to my body. Now, posit 



152 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

that tin's yearning is Katisficd, we will leave iinclccided 
whether hy accident or through free activity. Dou]>tlesH, 
this satisfaction is i)crceived. Now, why do we not con- 
tent ourself with the cold judgment of cognition, wjiieli 
we should apply to a plant, and say, "Our body grows 
and prospers"; why do we, moreover, say, "We experience 
enjoyment"? 

For this reason, my fundamental impulse has such a 
judgment for its immediate ol)ject, and hence its results. 
That which satisfies this impulse, and causes the enjoy- 
ment, is the harmony of the actuality with its require- 
ments. 

But it is quite different so far as the jture, impulse is 
concerned. This is an impulse to be active for the sake 
of being active, and which arises through the Ego con- 
templating internally its absolute jiower. Here, there- 
fore, there does not occur a mere feeling of the impulse, 
but a contemplation. The pure impulse does not occur 
as an affection ; the Ego is not hcinrj impelled, hut it impels 
itself, and contemplates itself in thus impelling itself. 
The pure impulse craves to find the acting Ego self- 
sufficient and determined through itself. It is not proper 
to say that this impulse is a ycarninrj — like the lower 
one — for it is not directed upon anything which is 
expected as a favour from nature, or wliich does not 
depend upon ourselves. This pure impulse is rather au 
absolute demanding. It manifests itself in consciousness 
with all the more vigour — so to use this expression — as 
it is grounded not upon a mere feeling, but upon a con- 
templation. 

Cause the Ego to act. It determines itself, of course, 
through itself, independently of the natural impulse, or 
of the requirement of the higher impulse, since it is 
formaliter free. Now there will either result a deter- 
mination such as the higher impulse required, in which 
case both the subject of the impulse and the actually 
active are in harmony, and a feeling of approval results ; 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. 153 

or the reverse results, and a feeling of disapproval will 
arise, combined with contempt. 

But feeling arises only as the result of a dcterniined- 
ness or limitation. J>ut in the present case there is 
nothing but activity, in the requirement as well as in tlie 
fulfilling of the same. How then, may a feeling result ? 
Through the harmony of both, which is not an act, l)Ut a 
determined condition, resulting, as it does, without our 
active co-operation, and which, therefore, is felt. Thus it 
is, moreover, clear that we must not be understood as if 
we asserted the feeling of a contemplation, which would 
be contradictory. It is the harmony of the contempla- 
tion with the requirement of the impulse, which is felt. 

(This is an imi)ortant remark ; since it explains the 
possibility of a'sthetical feeling, which is also the feeling 
of a contemplation, and lies between the two feelings 
here described.) 

Now can this approval, or disapproval, be cold — a mere 
judgment of cognition — or must it necessarily be con- 
nected with a feeling of interest ? Evidently the latter ; 
for that requirement of absolute self-activity, and of the 
harmony of the empirical Ego with this requirement, is 
itself the oriijinal imp%dse. Now if the latter harmonizes 
with the former, an impulse is being satisfied ; and if it 
does not harmonize with it, an impulse remains un- 
satisfied ; hence that approval is necessarily associated 
with satisfaction, and that disapproval with dissatisfac- 
tion. It cannot be indifferent to us, whether we must 
despise ourselves or not. There is, however, in this kind 
of satisfaction nothing which has the character of 
ordinary enjoyment. For the harmony of actuality with 
the natural impulse does not depend upon myself, in so 
far as I am self, ie., free. Hence the enjoyment which 
arises from it is of a kind which tears me away from 
myself, estranges me from myself, and wherein I forget 
myself. It is an involuntary enjoyment (which is, 
perhaps, the best characteristic for all sensuous enjoy- 



154 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

iiient). In tlic öaiue manner it is with the oi)i)().sitc — 
sensuous ])ain. 

In relation to the pure impulse, however, tliis satisfao- 
tion, and the ground of tliis satisfaction, is not sonietliing 
foreign, but something which depends upon my freedom, 
something which I had cause to expect in accordance 
with a rule. Hence it does not conduct me out of 
myself, but rather l)ack into myself. It is not so much 
enjoyment as satisfaction, which never is the characteristic 
of sensuous enjoyment. It is not so turbulent, but more 
intense, and infuses new courage and new strcngtli. Hence 
also the opposite of this satisfaction — precisely l)ecause 
it was dependent upon our freedom — produces disijust, 
self-reproach — which latter never accompanies sensuous 
pain, as such — and self-contempt. 

This feeling of self-contempt would be absolutely un- 
bearable, if it were not that the requirement of the 
moral law, continuing to be addressed to us, again would 
raise us in our own esteem ; if it were not that this 
unceasing requirement of conscience, which arises out of 
our own self, infuses again courage and esteem in us, and 
if it were not that this self-contempt were lessened by 
the feeling that we are still capable of entertaining 
self-contempt. 

This described feeling, which might well be called 
Jiigher feeling, is usually named conscience. There is rent 
or unrest of conscience, reproaches of conscience, and 
l)cacc of conscience ; but there is no such thing as enjoy- 
ment of conscience. The term conscience is admirably 
chosen. It is, as it were, the immediate consciousness 
of that, without which no consciousness whatever were 
possible ; the immediate consciousness of our higher 
nature and absolute freedom. 



CHAlTEü IX. 

FUNDAMENTAL PRINCIPLE OF AN APPLICABLE SCIENCE OF 

MORALS. 

A. The natural impulse is directed upon a material 
somewhat, simply for the sake of that material, upon 
enjoyment simply for the sake of enjoyment ; whereas, tlie 
pure impulse craves absolute independence of the active, 
as such, from that natural impulse, or craves freedom 
simply for the sake of freedom. If the pure impulse lias, 
nevertheless, causality, it cannot as yet be conceived 
otherwise than a mere negative causality, preventing the 
accomplishment of what the natural impulse craves ; and 
hence, as resulting merely in a leaving undone, Ijut not 
in any positive doing, except the internal act of self- 
determining. 

All writers, who have treated the science of morality 
in simply a formaliter way, ought to have arrived at 
nothing but a continual self-denial — utter abnegation and 
vanishing of self, as those mystics hold, who teach 
that we ought to dissolve our self into God, which 
proposition has, indeed, for its basis something true and. 
sublime, as will appear hereafter. But if we look closer 
at the requirement just now established, with a \dew 
to determine it, we shall find that it will vanish under our 
very hands into a nothing. 

The higher impulse, which addresses itself to the 
subject of consciousness, requires that I shall be able 
to posit myself as free, in a retlection. Hence I am, indeed, 

«55 



156 TUR SCIENCE OE ETHICS. 

to "poüt iny fro.odoin, as a^ws/^ür Rojiiowliat, aa tlu; ground 
of an actual doing, and not of a mere leaving undone. 
I, the reilecting, am, therefore, to relate a certain deter- 
mination of the will to myself as the determining, and to 
be forced to attribute this will solely to my self-deter- 
mination. Hence, the willing, which is to 1)0 related, is to 
be something objective, perceptil)le, in us. But everything 
objective belongs to us solely as sensuous and natural 
beings; in fact, through this mere objectivating, we are 
ourselves posited for ourselves in this objective sphere. 

Let me state this proposition, well known in its 
generality, and elsewhere abundantly proven, in its special 
relation to the present case: All actual willing is 
necessarily directed upon an acting, but all my acting 
> is an acting directed upon objects. Is^ow, in the world 
of objects, I always act by means of natural force, and 
this force is given to me solely throngli the natural 
impulse, nay, is nothing but this impulse as it exists 
in me ; or, in other words, is simply nature's own causality 
directed upon nature itself, but which is no longer within 
natiu'e's own control, as a dead and unconscious nature, 
having passed under my control, as an intelligence, through 
means of my free reflection. Hence, even the most 
immediate object of all possible willing is necessarily 
something empirical, is a certain determination of my 
sensuous power, given to me through my natural impulse, 
and thus something required by that natural impulse, 
' since this impulse only gives by requiring. Each possible 
conception of an end tends, therefore, to satisfy a natural 
impulse. In short, all actual willing is empirical. A 
pure will is uo actual will, but a mere idea, a some- 
thing alisolute from out of the intelligible world, 
which we think of as the explanatory ground of some- 
thing empirical. 

It is scarcely to be apprehended, after all we have said 
previously, that anyone should understand us as asserting 
that the natural impulse, as such, produces the willing. 



THE PRTNCIPLE OF MORALITY. 157 

It is I who will, and not naturo that wills within mo; 
nevertheless, so far as the suhstance of my will is con- 
cerned, I can only will that whi(;h nature woidd also will, 
had she the power to will. 

Thus, not the impulae to have al)Solnte material freedom, 
but, at least, the causality of that impulse seems utterly 
cancelled. lu truth, o\\\y formal freedom remains to me. 
Although I am impelled to do something, which might 
have its material ground solely in myself, I, nevertheless, 
do never and can never do anything, which the natural 
impulse docs not require, since all my possible acting 
is exhausted through that impulse. 

But the causality of my pure impulse must never be 
cancelled, since I posit myself as Ego only in so far 
as I posit such causality. 

We are involved in a contradiction which is all the 
more remarkable since what both of the propositions, just 
now mentioned, estal)lish as this contradiction, is also 
established as a condition of self-consciousness. 

How is this contradiction to be solved ? According 
to the laws of synthesis, only in the following manner : 
the material of the act must be at the same time, and 
in one and the same acting, conformable to the pure 
impulse, and to the natural impulse. As both are united 
in the original impulse, so must they be united in the 
actuality of acting. 

This can only be comprehended as follows. The pur- 
pose, the conception which directs the act, has for its 
object complete liberation from nature ; but that the act 
is, and remains nevertheless conformable to the natural 
impulse, is the result, not of our freely produced con- 
ception, but of our limitedness. The only determining 
ground of the matter of our acts is to relieve ourselves 
of our dependence from nature, although the required 
independence never results. The pure impulse craves 
for absolute independence, and the act is in conformity 
with that impulse if it also is directed upon such iude- 



158 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

pcndeiice, that is to Bay, if it lies in a scries, the completion 
whereof v'ouhl result in the absolute independence of the Erjo. 
Now, accordiii^^ to the j)roof just cstahh'slied, the El^'o can 
never become iiulepcndent, so lonn; as it is to l)e Ego; and 
hence the final end of rational beings lies necessarily in 
infinitude, and is an end wliich can never be realized 
completely, l»ut to which the Ego can incessantly draw 
nearer by virtue of its spiritual nature. 

I must here take cognizance of an objection which I 
would not have considered possil)le had it not been raised 
by men of good minds, and wlio are even well initiated 
'n transcendental pliilosophy. How is it possible, say 
they, to draw nearer to an infinite end ? does not all 
finite size vanish into nothingness when related to 
infinity? This question sounds as if I were speaking 
of infinitude as a thing in itself. / draw nearer, for 
myself. But I never can grasp infinitude, and hence 
have always a determined end liefore my eyes, to which - 
I doubtless can draw nearer, although, after having 
attained it, 1 may have removed my true end just as 
far, partly through the greater perfection my whole Ijeing 
has acquired, and partly through the greater perfection 
of my insight ; and although I may thus be as much, 
removed as ever, in this general sense, from the infinite, 
and may never get nearer to it, my end lies in infinitude 
because my dependence is an infinite dependence. This 
dependence I never seize, however, in its infinite character, 
but only in its determined sphere, and in this determined 
sphere I doubtless can make myself more and more 
independent. 

There must be such a series, in the continuating 
whereof the Ego can think itself as drawing nearer to 
absolute independence, for only on this condition is a 
causality of the pure impulse possible. This series is 
necessarily determined from the first point, upon which 
nature has placed a person, into infinity (of course only 
ideally), and hence in each possible case it is determined 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. T59 

what the pure impulse may require under such conditions. 
Hence we can call this series the moral deterniinednes3 
of the finite rational being. Now, although this series 
is as yet unknown to us, we have clearly aliown that it 
must necessarily occur. We are, therefore, safe in basing 
on this result, and may establish, as the fundamental 
l)rinciple of the science of morality, the following 
proposition : Do at each time lohai thou art (f der mined 
to do, or fulfil always thy destination, although the 
question. What am I determined to do, or wiiat is my 
destination ? is not answered. If this proposition is 
expressed : Fulfil thy destination is general, it involves 
at once the infinity of the end established for us, since 
that end can be fulfilled in no time. (The error of the 
mystics is based on their representing this infinite, and 
in no time completely attainable end, as an end attain- 
al^le in time. The utter annihilation of the individual, 
and submersion of the same in the absolute and pure 
form of reason, or in God, is most certainly the final end 
of finite reason, but it is also not possible in any time.) 

The possibility to fulfil at each time, singly, one's 
destination, is certainly grounded through nature herself, 
and given in nature. The relation of the natural impulse 
to the principle here established is as follows : at each 
moment something is conformable to our moral destination, 
and this same something is also required at the same 
time by the natural impulse (provided nature is left to 
herself, and has not been made artificial through a 
corrupt imagination). But it by no means follows that 
all that which the natural impulse requires should also 
be conformable to our moral determinedness. For 
instance, let the series of the natural impulse, con- 
sidered by itself, be A, B, C, etc. Now the moral 
determinedness of the individual may, perhaps, take and 
realize only a part of B, whereby the natural impulse 
resulting from B will certainly be altered; but even in 
this, its altered form, the moral determinedness of the 



i6o THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS, 

individual may take and realize only a part of if and 

60 on «rf ^vfinüu.^ P.ut in eaci. possible detcrmineiness 

oth nnpulses part y join. It is only tlms that morality 

IS possible in actual acting. "^ 

It is posRilüe to e.vplahi still more clearly the mutual 

STs : "1 '"^^"^ ^^'^ ^"'^^'^^^ -1-'- "-"^^- 
Itself as the just now described moral, and on no account 

AS a ;;,.r. impulse; it does not manifest itself as an 
impulse which craves absolute independence, l>ut as an 
impulse craving determined acts, which acts, howevtr- 
1 he impulse craving them is brought to consciousness 
and they are examined closer-will show themselves to lie 
m that series of absolute independence of the Ego. For 
It ha^ already been shown, that the impulse, as a vnre 
impulse, as one directed merely upon a negation, can 
never enter consciousness. M^e never become conscious 
of a negation, simply because it is nothing. Experience 
moreover, proves this; we feel impelled to do this ov 
tha and reproach ourselves for having left undone this 
or that. All this we state here to correct those who 
deny consciousness of the categorical imperative (of the 
moral impulse), and do not admit a" pure impulse We 
show here that a thorough transcendental philosophy 
also does not assert such a consciousness. The Lrc 
impulse IS beyond all consciousness, and is merely the 
transcendental explanatory ground of something in con- 
sciousness. - ^ 

The moral impulse is a mixed impulse, as we have 
shown. 1 rom the natural impulse it receives the material 
or Its object; in other words, the natural impulse is' 
directed upon the same act, which it craves, at least in 
part. But Its form it has solely from the pure impulse. 
It 18 absolute, like the pure impulse, and demands, with- 
out any external end, simply because it does. It has 
absolutely no enjoyment of any kind for its object. In 
snort, what it craves is absolute independence. ' But has 
this independence then no end again, no enjojinent, or 



THE PRINCIPLE OF MORALITY. i6i 

something of the kind, for its final object? No; ab- 
solutely no such end. That a])solutG independence is 
simply its own end. I am to crave it sim])ly because I 
am to crave it ; simply because I am I, The internal 
satisfaction, which accompanies its attainment, is some- 
thing accidental. The impulse does not arise from it, but 
it arises from the impulse. 

The moral impulse appeals to esteem; and obedience, or 
disobedience to it, excites approval or disapproval, self- 
satisfaction, or most painful self-contempt. The impulse 
is 'positive; it impels to a determined activity. It is 
general; and relates itself to all possible free acts, to 
each manifestation of the natural ijnpulse, which is 
brought to consciousness. It is self -sufficient, always pro- 
posing to itself its own aim ; it craves absolute causality, 
and stands in recijjrocit)/ with the natural impulse, Ijorrow- 
ing from it its matter, and giving it its form. I'inally, it 
commands categorically. What this impulse requires is 
imperatively required, and as a necessity. 

B. The moral impulse demands freedom for the sake 
of freedom. Who does not perceive that the word 
freedom is used here in two difTerent meanings? In 
the latter instance it is used to designate an objective 
condition to be produced, or the final absolute end, 
namely, complete independence from all externality ; 
whereas, in the first instance, it signifies an acting as 
such, and not any real being, signifies, in short, some- 
thing purely subjective. I am to act free in order to 
become free. 

But even in the conception of freedom as it occurs in 
the first instance, a distinction is to be observed. When 
a free act occurs, we may ask (i) How it must be done 
in order to be a free act, and (2) what must be done to 
constitute it a free act. In short, we may inquire after 
both the form and the content of freedom. 

Now the content we have already investigated, and 

K 



i62 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

have found that the act must be one of a series. Lhroui-h 
the infinite continuation whereof tlie E^'o will become 
absolutely independent. We have now, thcrcf(n-c, to look 
finally at the form. 

I am to act fne, that is to say, I as posited Ego, as 
intelligence, am to determine myself, or am to act with 
consciousness of my absolute self-determining character ; 
with considerateness and reliection. Only thus do I act 
free as intelligence ; and otherwise I act blindly, as chance 
impels me. 

I, as intelligence, am to act in a determined manner ; 
that is to say, I am to become conscious of the ground, 
why I act precisely in this manner. Now this ground 
cannot, because it must not, be anotlier ground, Ijecause 
this precise act lies within the descriljed series — or 
since this is a philosophical view and not the view of 
common consciousness — because this act is duty. I am 
to act solely conformably to the conception of my duty, 
am to determine myself solely through the thought th.-it 
this act is my duty, and through no other thouglit or 
motive. 

A few words concerning the last remark. Even the moral 
impulse is not to determine me as mere blind impulse ; 
indeed, the very thing is contradictory, and morality can 
never merely impel. We touch here again what we have 
already said: when it appeared that the impulse, to l»e 
self-active, addresses itself to the intelligence as such ; 
the intelligence is to be self-determined us intelligence; 
but an intelligence, as such, is onlv self-determined when 
it determines itself through conception, and absolutely 
not through mere impulse. The impulse, therefore, Ijoth 
craves and does not crave causality, and has causality 
eimply through not having it, since it demands of the 
intelligence : he free ! If the impulse is mere impulse 
it is not moral, but altogether natural impulse, for it 
is altogether immoral to be blindly impelled. This is, 
fpr instance, the case with the impulses of sympathy, 



THE PRINCIPT.E OF MORALITY. 163 

humanity, &c. It will iii)])cni-, in the ijiojxm- i)lace, that 
these iiii})nlscs are inaiiitV'.statioiiH of the moral impulse, 
hut mixed with the natural im])ulsc, as indeed the moral 
impulse is always mixed. Now, the man who follows 
these impulses may act very charitahly, humanely, &c., hut 
he does not act morally, on the contrary, in so far as he 
hlindly follows these impulses, he acts immorally. 

Here, therefore, arises for the first time the categorical 
imperative, as heing a conception and not an impulse. It 
is not the impulse which is itself the categorical in)])era- 
tive, hut the impulse drives us to form such an imjjcrative; 
impels us to say that something shall be done. It is our 
own product; our product in so far as we are intelligences, 
or beings capable of producing conceptions. 

Thus then, the rational being, in determining its will, 
is, in form, torn loose from all which is not itself. Matter 
does not determine the rational being, nor does the rational 
being determine itself through the mediation of anything 
material, but solely through the formal, and, in itself, 
generated conception of an aljsolute imi^erative. And, in 
this manner, we indeed receive hack again the rational 
being in its actuality, precisely as we originally posited it: 
namely, as the absolutely self-determined; as, indeed, 
everything that is original must represent itself in 
actuality, only with further additions and determinations. 
It is only in the act impelled by duty that we find such a 
representative of the rational l)eing, for all other acts 
have a determining ground which is foreign to the 
intelligence as such. Hence, Kant also says that it is 
only through the power of morality that the rational 
being manifests itself as something in itself, namely, as 
something independent, self-sufficient, existing through no 
reciprocity with anything external, but simply existing 
for itself. Hence also, the inexpressibly sublime character 
of duty, since all that is external sinks down so low under 
us, and vanishes into nothingness, when compared with 
our destination. 



i64 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

From the form of morality follow tlicse two results: 
I. I am to act, in general, with considcrateness and 
consciousness, not blindly and in obedience to mere im- 
pulses, and, in particular, with the consciousness of duty; 
I am never to act without first having related my act to 
this conception. Hence, there are no indifTerent acts at 
all. The moral law relates to all acts — if not materialiter, 
at least surely formaliter — which are truly acts of the 
intelligent being. Formaliter: for we are to inquire 
whether the moral law relates to them or not, and this 
very inquiry establishes already a relation. But even 
materialiter the relation can be proven: for I am never to 
obey the sensuous impulse as such, but all my acts are 
result of that impulse ; hence I must relate each act to 
the moral law, or I cannot act at all. 

2. / am never to aet against my conviction. To do so is 
completest perversity and wickedness. How it happens 
that such a perver.sity, which in itself seems impossible, 
is nevertheless possiUe, and that it loses, at least, that 
horrible character which it has for every uncorrupted man 
in its true appearance, we shall show hereafter. 

Both these results gathered into one might be expressed: 
Act always in accordance with your best conviction of your 
duty ; or, a^t according to your conscience. This is the 
formal condition of the morality of our acts, which, for 
that reason, has been pre-eminently called : the morality 
of those acts. We shall discuss these formal conditions 
of morality in the first chapter of our Applied Science of 
Morals, and establish in the second the material conditions 
of the morality of our acts. 



PART IL 

SYSTEMATIC APPLICATION OF THE 
PRINCIPLES OF MORALITY 



BOOK THIRD. 

CONCERNING THE FORMAL CONDITIONS OF THE 
MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 

Preliminary. 

concerning the will in particular. 

I MIGHT begin ininiediately with a synthetic, systematic 
deduction of the formal conditions of the morality of our 
.acts. But since tliis formal morality, indeed, what is 
pre-eminently termed morality, is also called fjoocl will, 
and as I myself intend thus to characterize it, it behoves 
me to first give an account of my conception or the will. 

True, all that wliich Ijelongs to this investigation has 
l)een already said under other names, and yet, for that 
very reason, it is necessary to say it also under the present 
name, in order to connect what will follow with what has 
been previously established. 

A willing is an a1)solutely free transition from undeter- 
minedness to determinedness, with consciousness of this 
transition. This act has been abundantly described before. 
In the examination of this willing we may draw a 
distinction between the Ego which proceeds from un- 
determinedness to determinedness, and which is called 
the objective Ego, and the Ego which contemplates itself 
in this transition, and which is called the subjective Ego. 
But, in willing itself, both are united. The impulse, the 
yearning, the desire, is not the will. The " impulse, to 
be sure, is accompanied by an inclination, and the desire, 
moreover, by consciousness of the object of this inclination; 

167 



1 68 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

but neither is accompanied by a (Icterininediicss of tlio 
Ego. Desire would well like, its oliject to come to it, Ijut 
cannot its(>lf move hand or foot to reach it. It is only 
tln'ough willing that deterniinedness result«. 

If we look at the general "power of making tliat transition 
consciously, and the laws of theoretical reason force us 
to add such a power in tliinking to the act of transition, 
we shall arrive at the conception of willing in general, as 
a jwiuer to will. This is an abstract conce))tion, notliing 
actually perceptible, not a fact. An actually perceptible 
transition gives a willing. But a willing is not completed, 
and is indeed, no willing, unless it is determined. But 
when it is determined it is no longer called willing, but 
a will ; as, for instance, viy will, your will, this will, etc. 
In common life, tiiis distinction between this general con- 
ception of willing, as a power to will, and a will, as a 
determined expression of this general power, is never 
made, because it is not necessary to make it in ordinary 
life; but in philosophy, where it is very necessary to 
make this distinction, it has also never been made. 

The will is free in the mateiial significance of the word. 
The Ego, in so far as it wills, proposes to itself as intelli- 
gence the object of its willing, by choosing from many 
possible objects one particular oly'ect, and by changing the 
undeterminedness, which the intelligence contemplates 
and comprehends, into a likewise contemplated and com- 
prehended determinedness. 

The fact that the object may be given through the 
natural impulse does not contradict this result. For 
the natural impulse only gives it as an object of yearn- 
ing or desire, but not as an object of the vjill or of the 
determined resolve to realize it. In this respect the will 
absolutely gives itself its own object. In short, the will 
is absolutely free, and an unfree will is an absurdity. ]f 
man wills, he is free, and if he is not free, he does not 
will, but is impelled. Nature produces no will, nay, 
strictly speaking, nature cannot even produce a yearning, 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 169 

as wc have seen l)cfore, since yearning ])re.su) »poses a 
reflection. It is true that in this rellectioii the Kgo does 
not yet become conscious of itself as of a re(lcctin<r, and 
hence assumes that the yearning within it is a product 
of nature, although external observers, and we ourselves, 
from the transcendental point of view, know the opposite 
to be the case. 

Now if the will proceeds from undeterminedness to 
determinedness — and it has been strictly proven that 
this is a condition of the consciousness of freedom, and 
hence of the Ego itself, as such, whereby it has at the 
same time been proven that there is a will, and that the 
will is determined as above descril:)ed — then the will 
must be a power to choose. In other words, no will 
without arbitrariness. For the will is called arbitrary 
when the characteristic of the will is insisted on, that it 
must choose from several equally possible acts. 

IiEMARK. 

Some philosophers have discovered a contradiction in 
the assertion that it is equally possible for freedom to 
seize opposite resolves, either A or - A ; and other philo- 
sophers have been puzzled to refute this assertion of a 
contradiction. Let us see at once what the former pre- 
supposed, \tithout the latter perceiving it. 

Let us posit a natural force = X. ^^ince it is a natural 
force, it necessarily works mechanically, i.e., produces at 
all times only that which it can produce conformably to 
its nature under such condition. If the production of 
such a force is = A, then it is necessarily = A, and it were 
contradictory to assume it to be some - A. 

Now is this law applicable to the will ? Let me first 
state again what I have already insisted on, and which 
is the most important : as soon as the will, or the Ego 
generally, enters on the stage, natural force is utterly at 
an end. What force can these produce? neither A nor -A; 
and can produce, in fad, nothing at all ; for the final 



I70 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

])roduct of tlmt force Ih an impulse, and an im])nlse ha3 
no causality. Hence it is not for nature, but for the 
absolute opposite to nature, namely, for the will, that 
both A and - A is asserted to be equally possible. For if 
it is asserted that the will is free, then the will is thereljy 
asserted to be the primary or the commencing link of a 
Beries, and hence to be not determined by any previous 
or other link, but simply through itself. But it is also 
asserted that the will does not work in a mechanical 
manner, i.e., does not effect all that it can effect, but does 
rather consist in a power to work or not to work, and 
hence is able to limit itself through itself to any particular 
work, in such a manner that if its total sphere embraces 
both A and -A, it may determine to effect either the 
former or the latter without any external grounds. 

Now those who hold that it is a contradiction to assert 
the will to be able to work out either A or - A, ought to 
accept this presupposition. But, instead of doing so, 
they presuppose that which we deny to them, namely, 
that the will is a link of the chain of natural forces. 
They assert the will to be itself a natural force, and with 
this presupposition, of course, their rc&ults are correct 
enough. They prove, therefore, that the will is not free 
from the presupposition that the will is not free ; and 
hence, to speak properly, they ought not t& say "the 
proposition that the will is free contradicts itself," but 
rather "it contradicts our assertion that the will is not 
free," in which form their statement may well be allowed 
to pass. 

P>ut the true contradiction lies much higher than they 
believe. It is a contradiction to their whole individual 
power of thinking, to conceive another series than the 
series of natural mechanism. They have never elevated 
themselves to the higher manifestations of thinking, and 
hence their absolute presupposition which they, indi- 
vidually, cannot surmount. Their absolute principle is : 
" everything happens mechanically," for in their clear 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 171 

consciousness nothin<f but wliat is merely mechanical 
occurs. It is thus with all fatalism ; nor is the matter 
changed by placing the ground of our moral resolves in 
the spiritual world. In the latter case, the ground of 
our will determinations is asserted to be in something 
spiritual, but which determines us precisely in the same 
manner as a physical power, and the effect whereof are 
our will determinations. P.ut how can a ground of 
distinction be applied between such effects and physical 
eflccts, when the category of causality is applied also to 
tiie spiritual world, since all to which that category 
applies is, according to Kant sensuous world? (15y the 
statement that our will determinations are the effect of 
an influence from the spiritual world (or God), we only 
drag down that world to the level of the sensuous world.) 
This necessary choice of the will is, moreover, deter- 
mined as being a choice between the satisfaction of the 
Egotistic (natural) impulse, and of the unselfish (moral) 
impulse. Let us now examine this further determination. 
Freedom is not merely material, but likewise formal, 
according to a distinction deduced above ; and I may well 
become conscious — not originally, but after self-conscious- 
ness has been developed, and experience been gathered — 
not only of the former but also of the latter. If I 
become conscious merely of formal freedom, I thereby, 
as intelligence, attain first and foremost the power to 
postpone the satisfaction of the natural impulse ; and 
since the natural impulse will, during this postponement, 
continue to manifest itself in a manifold manner, the 
power I attain is one to reflect upon the natural impulse 
in the manifold bearings of its manifestations, and to 
choose among the many possible ways of satisfying it. I 
choose one of them ; and in doing so act with full 
freedom, since I choose with the consciousness of self- 
determination ; but I do not sacrifice, in such case, 
enjoyment to morality; I only sacrifice one enjoyment 
to another enjoyment. 



172 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

"Nevertheless," it iiiij^lit be olijectcd, "in so doing you 
only cede to the strongest iin])ulse, and foolislily innigine 
yourself free when you only follow one impulse amongst 
many." Now even if tliis ol)jection were true in general, 
I should reply: "This stronger iinpulse would not be, 
would not have entered my consciousness, liad I not 
checked myself, postponed my resolve, and reliected with 
freedom on the totality of my im])ulse. Hence even if 
the objection were true, I would still have determined my 
will through self-determination, and thus my will would 
remain matcrialiter free." But that objection is not true 
in general. When a certain amount of experience liad 
already been acquired by me, I can, through imagination, 
represent an enjoyment which my nature does not crave 
at present, and can now choose to sacrifice all the present 
cravings of my nature to this artificial one. Formerly 
that craving did certainly exist in my nature, and resulted 
in an actual enjoyment. This enjoyment I now endeavour 
to reproduce through imagination. Hence mere imagina- 
tion impels me to choose, and the products of imagination 
are surely products of freedom. I must certainly, there- 
fore, give to myself in these cases the objects of my will. 
Of course I do not sacrifice my present impulses to 
virtue, I only sacrifice the real enjoyment, which would 
result from satisfying my actual impulses, to an imaginary 
enjoyment. (This is the usual procedure of merely refined 
men, of men who are on the way to culture. Thus the 
worn-out voluptuary, the miser, the coxcomb, &c., sacrifice 
their true physical enjoyments to merely imaginary ones.) 
Indeed, only in this manner is prudence possible, which 
is nothing more than a discreet choice from amongst 
various means of satisfying the natural impulse. Accord- 
ing to the above conception of will, rigorously applied, 
prudence were not at all possible, but the opposition 
. would only be between morality and immorality. 



CHAPTER I. 

CONCERNING THE FOÜMAL CONDITIONS OF THE MORALITY 

OF OUR ACTIONS. 

A. As we have seen, the formal law of morals is as 
follows: Act absolutely in conformity with your con- 
viction of your duty. "We may look either at the form 
or the content of this law, or, which may here be a 
clearer expression, at the condition and the conditioned. 
So far as the former is concerned, it involves, as we 
have seen : At all times try to convince yourself as 
to what your duty is ; in regard to the latter, it in- 
volves : Whatsoever you are convinced is your duty, do, 
and do it solely because you are conviiiced it is your 
duty. 

But how ? somebody might object. How if my convic- 
tion is a wrong one ? In that case I have not done my 
duty, but have acted in violation of it. How can I be 
calm in this ? Evidently only in so far as I consider it 
impossible that my conviction might be a wrong one, nay, 
impossible that I shall ever, in an infinite existence, hold 
it to have been a wrong one. Hence I do not ap}ily 
my act merely to the conception of my present convic- 
tion, but I again apply this conviction to the conception 
of all my possible conviction — to the whole system of my 
conviction, in so far as I can represent it to myself in the 
present moment. Such a comparison and examination is 
a duty, since I am to convince myself. If it is not a 
matter of indifference to me, but rather the highest 

»73 



174 THE SCIENCE OE ETHICS. 

subject of my life, wlietlier I act in conforniity to duty 
or not, tlien it can also not be a matter of indinerence to 
me, whether my conviction is true or erroneous. Hence, 
the correctness of my conviction in any particular case is 
guaranteed by its aijreeing with all thinkable conviction, 
and the investigation, whether this harmony exists or not, 
is itself a duty. 

But the \vliole system of my conviction cannot be 
given to me in any other manner than through my 
present conviction of it. As I may err in judging any 
particular case, so may I also err in judging my judg- 
ment in general, or in my conviction of the totality of 
my conviction. 

Hence my morality, my absolute self-sufficiency and 
repose of conscience, always remain dependent upon an 
accident. When I consider all this — and it is my duty 
to consider it — I must either act trusting to chance, 
which is against conscience, or I must not act at all, but 
pass my whole life in a state of unclecidedne.ss, always 
wavering between doing and not doing. This is the only 
alternative, unless there is an absolute criterion of the 
correctness of my conviction of duty. 

(This is a very important remark, never yet sufficiently 
considered, it appears to me, the development whereof 
will bring a firm connection into our whole theory, and 
gain for us an easier transition from the formal to the 
material conditions of morality.) 

B. If dutiful conduct in life is to be at all possible, 
there must be an absolute criterion of the correctness of 
our convictions respecting duty. Hence a certain con- 
viction must be absolutely correct, and which we must 
accept for the sake of duty. 

Let the maimer of our drawing this conclusion be 
ol)served. We say, if dutiful behaviour is to be possible, 
then such a criterion must exist ; now the moral law says 
such behaviour is possible: hence such a criterion does 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 175 

exist. We therefore coiicbule from the existence and tlie 
necessary causaHty of a moral law as to tlie existence of 
somcthin«^ else in onr power of co^Miition. We thus 
assert a relation of the moral law to theoretical reason, 
or \\\Q, 'primacy of the former, as Kant expresses it. That 
without which (hity in general were impossible, is abso- 
lutely true, and it is duty to consider it as true. 

Lest this proposition should be altogether misappre- 
hended, let the following be observed : the moral l;uv 
assuredly requires a certain determined conviction = A, 
and authorizes it. But since the moral law is not a 
power of cognition, it cannot itself establish this con- 
viction, but expects the power of cognition to establish 
and determine it through its reflecting power of judg- 
ment; and only after it has been thus established through 
cognition does the moral law authorize it, and make it 
our duty to hold to it. The opposite would indeed lead 
to a material belief-morality; i.e., to a theory which 
holds that the moral law contains certain theoretical 
dogmas which must be accepted as true without any 
further examination as to whether we can or not convince 
ourselves of their truth. But such an assertion is partly 
in itself contradictory, since the practical activity of the 
Ego is not the theoretical activity ; would, moreover, 
open the door to all manner of deceptions and to the 
suppression of conscience. The tlieoretical faculties 
pursue their even tenor until they arrive at what meets 
our approval ; but those faculties do not contain in them- 
selves the criterion of the correctness of their result. 
This criterion is to be found in the practical faculty, 
which is the first and highest faculty in man, constituting 
indeed his true essence. Our present assertion is the 
same as already established previously, with only a 
further determination added ; viz. : the moral law is 
purely formal, and must receive its content from another 
source. But tlmt something is its content, must have its 
ground in the moral law itself. i 



r76 THE SCIENCE O'E ETHICS. 

The much iiiore dilhcult question, liowevcr, arises now: 
how does the confirmation by the moral law, of a 
theoretical judf^ment respecting duty, manifest itself, and 
how is it recognised ? 

The moral law, in its relation to empirical man, has a 
determined bcgimiing point of its sphere; namely, the 
determined limitation wherein the individual finds him- 
self by first finding himself : it has moreover a determined 
—although never to be attained— ewi ; namely, absolute 
liberation from all limitation: and it lias finally a com- 
pletely determined ivay to reach this end; namely, the 
order of nature. Hence for each determined man there 
is in each point of his life a determined duty; to do 
something or leave something undone; and it may be 
said that the moral law, in its application to empirical 
beings, postulates this duty. Let us designate this deter- 
mined doing or leaving undone = X. 

Now the practical power, as has been said, is not 
theoretical. Hence it cannot give this X to itself. Tliis 
X must therefore be discovered by the free reflecting 
power of judgment. Since, however, there is an impulse 
to act generally, and moreover to realize the determined 
X through this action, this impulse determines the power 
of judgment, if not matericditer to give this X, which the 
power of judgment cannot do, at least formaliter to 
discover it. Hence the moral impulse here manifesls 
itself as an impulse to realize a determined cognition. 
Let us assume that the power of judgment finds X, 
which seems to depend upon chances, and the impulse to 
realize the cognition will agree with the fact that the 
cognition has been found: the original Ego and the 
empirical Ego will be in harmony and there results a 
feeling, as is always the case according to what we have 
so-id above in this circumstance. 

The only question is: what sort of a feeling may this 
be, and how is it to be distinguished from other feelings? 
All aesthetical feelings are like the present one in this, 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 177 

that they arise from the satisfaction of an impulse to 
realize a determined representation ; but they are distinct 
from the present one in this, that the impulse which lies 
at their basis does not absolutely demand its satisfaction, 
hut merely exjjcds it as a favour of nature. But the 
impulse to realize a cognition, whereof we speak here, is 
the absolutely commanding moral impulse. Hence, there 
cannot arise here — as in the case of those other aisthetical 
feelings — an enjoyment which unexpectedly surprises us, 
but merely a cold apjjvoval of that which was to be ex- 
pected, nay, which could not fail to manifest itself, as sure 
aa reason is reason. That which excites this approval is 
called in actions yus^, in cognitions t7'U€. 

It appears, therefore, that there is o. feeling of truth and 
certainty, and that this feeling is the sought-for absolute 
criterion of the correctness of our conviction of dutv. 
We shall describe this important feeling somewhat more 
at length. 

So long as the power of judgment is still searching ft^r 
the cognition, the free power of imagination floats between 
opposites, and there arises — from the fact that the search 
is undertaken at the instigation of an impulse, which has, 
therefore, not yet been satisfied — a feeling of doubt, 
accompanied by anxiety, because the matter is, above all 
other things, important. (I know, for instance, that I 
doubt. How do I know it ? Surely not from the objective 
quality of my judgment. Doubt is something subjective, 
and can only be felt, like its opposite, certainty.) As 
soon as the power of judgment discovers the required 
cognition, the fact that it is the cognition which was 
required appears from a feeling of agreement which 
manifests itself. The power cf imagination is now 
necessitated as through all reality; I cannot view the 
matter in any other way; compulsion, necessity, binds me, 
as is the case in every feeling. Thus, there results in the 
cognition immediate certainty, accompanied by ^eacc and 
tatis/action. 

K 



178 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

IiEMAIlK. 

Kant says {Rclirjion Within the Limits of Pure Reason, 
§ 4) excellently : " The conseionsncss that an act which 
i undertake is just, is unconditioned duty." But is there 
such a consciousness possil)le ? and how do I recognize it ? 
Kant seems to leave this to the feeling of each individual, 
as is, indeed, proper; hut transcendental philosophy is 
obliged to show up the ground of the possibility of such 
a feeling of certainty, and this is what we have just nov/ 
done. Kant, however, illustrates by an instance which is 
also adniiral)ly fitted to illustrate what we have said. 

The judge of an inquisition, says Kant, who con- 
demns a heretic-, can never l)e sure that he does not, 
perhaps, do wrong in condemning him. Should he ask 
himself: "Art thou confident that, in the presence of Him 
who seeth into all hearts, and staking all that is dear and 
holy to thee, thou wouldst insist on these propositions of 
faith, for dissenting from which thou art about to condemn 
to death this heretic?" he would most surely hesitate and 
tremble, were he ever so zealous a dogmatist. In like 
manner, says Kant, those who get up and say : " Whoso- 
ever does not believe all that we tell you will be eternally 
damned," ought surely to have faith enough to add : " but 
^ if it is not true, we ourselves will agree to be eternally 
damned"; and yet how few would be willing to do it. 
This might convince them, indeed, that they are, after all, 
not so very firmly convinced of dogmas which they want 
to force upon others. 

Using this analogy, we might say : he who is quite sure 
of his matter must be willing to risk eternal damnation 
for it, and if he is not willing to do so he betrays his 
uncertainty. Now, should anyone ask what this might 
signify: to be eternally damned? one could certainly give 
no other rational answer than : to give xqj all ones moral 
improvement throughout all eternity/. This is the greatest 
evü, and an evil which no man can seriously entertain, 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 179 

nay, the serious thought wliereof would annihilate every- 
one. Those \vho most wilfully sin against tlicir own 
conscience comfort themselves secretly with tlie assurance, 
that they intend to do it only this time, or only for so and 
so long a time, and that they will amend in the cours(i of 
time. It is, therefore, a sure sign that one's conscience is 
not clear, so long as he either fixedly determines, or, at 
least, still considers it possil)le to change his mode of 
action at some future time. Whosoever is sure of himself, 
is so at the risk that lie never can change the principles 
which govern his actions, that all his freedom on that 
point is lost, that he will be evermore confirmed in those 
principles. Only this is the safe criterion of true con- 
viction. 

The proof is as follows: Such a conviction places us in 
harmonv with the original Ego. This Ego is elevated 
above all time and changes in time, and hence, in that 
harmony with it, the empirical Ego also rises above all 
changes in time, and posits itself as absolutely unchange- 
able. Hence, the unshakeableness of fixed conviction. 

The result of the foregoing was this : whether I doubt, 
or am certain, is a matter which I become anxious of, not 
through argumentation — since that would need again a 
new proof of its correctness, and so on, ad infinitum — but 
through immediate feeling. It is only in this manner 
that subjective certainty, as a state of the mind, may be 
explained. But the feeling of certainty is always an 
immediate agreement of our consciousness with our 
original Ego, as, indeed, could not be otherwise in a 
philosophy which starts from the Ego. This feeling never 
deceives, for, as we have seen, it only exists where there 
is complete agreement of our empirical with the pure 
Ego, and only the latter is our sole true being, and, indeed, 
all possible being and all possible truth. 

Only in so far as I am a moral being is certitude 
possible for me, since the criterion of all theoretical truth 
cannot be again theoretical. The theoretical power of 



i8o THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

cognition cannot again criticize and confirm itself ; tlio 
criterion must l)e practical, and it must be duty to accept 
it. This criterion, moreover, is universal, since it does not 
only apply to the immediate cognition of our duty, l)ut to 
all possible cognition in general, as, indeed, there is no 
cognition which is not, at least, mediately related to our 
duties. 

C. We have seen that the criterion of the correctness 
of our conviction is an internal one. There is no external 
objective criterion, nor can there be such, since the Ego 
here, where we consider it as moral Ego, must be utterly 
self-sufficient and independent of everything external. 
But this does not prevent us from stating what kind 
of convictions these will be, which this criterion will 
approve ; and to state this is, at present, our final task. 

It is only through the practical impulse tliat objects 
exist for us at all : this is a proposition whicli has already 
been abundantly demonstrated. At present, we oljserve 
the following : My impulse is limited, and, in consequence 
of this limitation, do I posit an object. Now, it is clear 
that I cannot posit and characterize the o1)ject, without 
definitely characterizing the impulse, which limits it ; for 
a determined object is nothing, and cannot be described 
otherwise than as somewhat limiting a determined impulse. 
Thus, I receive the given qualities of the thing, because 
I place myself and the thing into a state of mutual quiet. 
But I may also reflect upon my freedom therein. If I do 
so, then the limitation through the object changes into 
something which may be expanded regularly and in 
a certain order ; and such an expansion of my limits will 
also change the object. If I posit this modificability of the 
object, I determine its usefulness : its utility for various 
purposes. 

Let it be well observed that this determination of the 
usefulness of a thing is none other than of the internal 
unchanging qualities of a thing, and can be none other ; 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 181 

the only difference is that it is regaidcd from a different 
view. In either case tlie object is determined tlirough th(! 
impulse which it is to limit, hut, whereas in the fust 
case the possible liberation from its limitation is not 
considered, in the second case it is considered. In 
the former case the impulse reposes; in the second 
it is placed in motion. For, let it be well remembered, 
that I have deduced the conception of usefulness from the 
relation of an object to freedom in general, but not exactly 
to my own freedom. Something may be thought as useful, 
without the clear conscious additional thought that I, or 
some other free being, can apply tliis usefulness. In an 
unconscious way, the latter thought, of course, is at th(3 
basis of all conception of utility. 

But, perhaps, I only become "parthj conscious of my 
impulse. In that case I have grasped only partly the 
utility of a thing ; have not recognized its true purpose, 
but only some arbitrary purpose for which it may also be 
used. My whole impulse craves absolute independence 
and self-sufficiency ; and, until I have appreliended it as 
such, I have not determined myself completely, nor — 
through opposition to myself — the thing, botli so far as its 
qualities and its uses are concerned. If the latter is 
completely determined in the described manner, I have 
grasped the sphere of all its uses, or its final end-purpose. 
Hence, all compMe cognitions, wliich satisfy,are necessarily 
cognitions of the end-purpose of objects; and conscience 
does not approve a conviction until this insight into the 
end-purpose of the thing has been obtained, and these 
cognitions are, ft the same time, those which govern 
moral behaviour. The moral law, therefore, requires that 
each thing should be treated according to its end-purpose. 
This result has opened to us the easiest transition to the 
scientific establishment of the material of the moral law. 

What I must, moreover, call attention to is this : we 
have just now established a complete finished system 
of cognition, a perfect synthesis. For moral impulse and 



1 82 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

theoretical knowledge stand in reciprocal relation to eac-l» 
other; and all morality is conditioned througli tin's reci- 
procity of l)üth. The moral impulse, in so far as it occurs 
in consciousness, demands a determined conception = X — 
inaccessible to itself — and througli this demand deter- 
mines, in 80 far, the power of cognition forvialilcr : that 
is to say, it impels the reflecting power of judgment 
to hunt up that conception. But the moral impulse, when 
regarded as primary, also determines maierialitcr the 
power of cognition in regard to the conception X; for 
X arises througli the completed determination of the 
object, by means of the whole primary impulse, as we have 
seen. Henc^ all cognition, regarded objectively as a 
system, is, throughout, predetermined through the moral 
impulse. Hence, the rational being — even in respect to 
both matter and form of all its possible knowledge — is 
absolutely determined through itself, and through nothing 
external in any manner whatever. That which we have 
otherwise asserted as simply the result of the conception 
of Egoness, we here meet again, in a more determined 
manner, through a genetic deduction. For that in the 
Ego, which determines all its cognition, is its practical 
essence, since that is its highest. The only firm and final 
basis of all my knowledge is my duty. This duty is the 
intelligible " In itself " (thing in itself, substance, etc.), 
which, through the laws of sensuous representation, changes 
itself into a sensuous world. 

On the other hand, cognition determines the moral 
impulse in consciousness, by giving to it its object. Thus, 
the moral impulse, through the mediation of cognition, 
returns into herself, and the reciprocity just established 
is, in truth, a reciprocity within the moral impulse itself, 
its own self-relation, which manifests itself in the feeling 
of certainty, as we have shown. 

To state it all as concisely as possible. The formal 
condition of the morality of our acts, or their pre- 
eminently so-called morality, consists in this, that we 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 183 

resolve to do that which conscience requircH, solely for 
the sake of conscience. But conscience is the, immediate 
co7isciousness of our determined duty. Tliis is only to he 
understood as has heen explained, to wit: the conscious- 
ness of a determined somewhat is never immediate, hut 
can only be found throu;^di an act of thinking ; and 
hence, so far as its material is concerned, our conscious- 
ness of duty is never immediate ; hut the consciousness 
that this determined somewhat is duty, is an immediate 
consciousness as soon as the determined is given. The 
consciousness of duty is formaliter immediate; and this 
formal part of consciousness is a mere feeling. 

Kant says : Conscience is a consciousness which is itself 
duty. A correct and sulilime statement ! It involves a 
twofold : first, that it is al)solute duty to acquire this 
consciousness, or, as we have stated it, that each one is 
bound to convince himself as to what his duty may l3e, 
and each one can so convince himself in every case. 
This is, as it were, the eonstitutional law of morality, 
namely, that law which prescribes that law shall be 
established. It involves secondly, that consciousness in 
that condition is nothing but a consciousness of duty ; 
that is to say, conscience does not furnish the material 
of our duty, which it is the business of the power of 
judgment to furnish, and conscience is no power of judg- 
ment ; but conscience furnishes the evidence, and this 
sort of evidence occurs only in the consciousness of duty. 

COROLLARIA. 

I. The above deduction has for ever cancelled and 
destroyed the subterfuge of an erring conscience, which 
most of the present systems of morality still retain. 
Conscience never errs, and cannot err, for it is the 
immediate consciousness of our pure original Ego, beyond 
which no other consciousness penetrates, which no other 
consciousness can test or correct, which is itself judge 



104 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

of all conviction, but docs not recognize any lii;;licr jndgo 
than itself. Its decisions are final, and admit of no 
appeal. To try to reach beyond it is to try to go 
out of oneself, to separate oneself from oneself. All 
material systems of morality which seek some otlier end 
for duty than duty itself, thus try to reach beyond it, 
^and are therefore enveloped in the fundamental error 
of all dogmatism, which always looks for the final 
ground of whatsoever is in and for the Ego, outside of 
the Ego. Such moral systems are possible only through 
inconsequence, for logical dogmatism admits no morality, 
but acknowledges simply a system of natural laws. 

Moreover, the power of judgment cannot err as to 
whether conscience has spoken or not. Before men are 
sure on this point, what obliges them to act at all ? No 
act results through man unless he has determined 
himself to achieve this act. If he acts without being 
sure of his conscience, he acts unconscientiously ; his 
guilt is clear, and he cannot escape the responsibility. 
There is no excuse for sin. Sin is, and remains sin. 

I hold it important to insist on this point as well, 
for the sake of its importance for morality itself, as for 
the science of morality. AVhosoever says the opposite 
may find a reason for it in his own heart (the fault 
cannot be in his understanding), Init it is surprising 
that he should be bold enough to confess it to himself 
and to others. 

2. Lest the word feeling should lead to misapprehen- 
sion, I add the following: A theoretical proposition is 
not and cannot be felt, but the certainty and sure 
conviction which accompanies the tliinking of such 
proposition is felt. We must not, when thinking, be 
anxious to think in such a manner as to make it con- 
formable to conscience, for this is an illogical thinking, 
which has its end marked out for it in advance. Let 
thinking strictly proceed in its own manner, inde- 
pendently of conscience. The opposite were cowardice. 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 185 

and could augur little confidence in one's couHcience. 
The pretended objective teachings of feeling are products 
of disorderly imagination, which cannot witlistand the 
tests of theoretical reason ; and the feeling which unites 
with them is the feeling of the free self-activity of our 
l)0wer of imagination. It is the feeling of our self, not 
in our original totality, however, but only of part of 
our self. A proposition thus produced through feeling 
is to be recognized by this, tliat it is in opposition to 
the laws of thinking, which can not be the case witli 
any conviction confirmed by conscience; and the feeling 
which accompanies it, may be recognised by this, that 
though it may not lack depth, intensity, and sublimity, it 
certainly lacks surencss. No fanatic would act on the 
prompting of his feelings at the risk of having a change 
in his convictions made impossible for all eternity. 

3. jihe feeling of certainty arises from the harmony 
of an act of the power of judgment with the moral 
impulse: hence the exclusive condition of the possi- 
bility of such a feeling is, that the suljject itself makes 
this judgment. Hence certainty and conviction can 
never relate to the judgment of others, and conscience 
cannot allow itself to be absolutely governed through 
authority. To do so were an evident, flagrant contra- 
diction. 

Hence, ilie, "ptrson who acts on the strength of aidhority 
acts necessarily unconscientiously ; for he is uncertain. A 
very important proposition, which there is great need 
to establish in all its strictness. 

It is true, we may guide the investigations of men, and 
furnish them with the premises wherefrom to form their 
judgment, which premises they may preliminarily accept 
upon mere authority. This is more or less the history 
of all men. Through education they receive that whicli 
all previous mankind has established up to their time, 
and which has now become the common faith of man- 
kind, as premises from which to frame their own 



186 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

judgments. It is only the true philosoplier who accepts 
nothing witliout examination, and whose thinking starts 
from tlie most absohite donljt of everything. 

But before the act takes place, eacli man is in con- 
science bound to form his own judgment from those 
premises accepted upon faith ; in other words, to draw 
Jiimsclf the final conclusions Avhich determine his acting. 
If his conscience confirms the result of those premises, 
it thereby mediately also establishes the 'practical validity 
of those premises — though, perhaps, not their theoretical 
validity; for the moral element in them, which shows 
itself in the result and is approved througli conscience, 
may be correct, although the theoretical clement be 
altogether wrong. If his conscience disapproves those 
premises, they are annihilated, and it is al)Solute duty 
to give them up. That from which no practical results 
fellow is an adiaphoron, which may be safely left to 
itself. True, no knowledge whatsoever is indifferent to 
mankind in general, and whatsoever is true must have 
practical results. But for s'ome men, in their limited 
condition in life, a great part of the theory may remain. 
a matter of utter indifference all their lifetime. 

For the sake of his conscience, man must form his own 
judgment, and compare this judgment with his feeling; 
for otherwise he acts immorally and unconscientiously. 
Hence there is absolutely no external ground and cri- 
terion of the obligatoriness of a moral commandment. No 
moral command ; and if it were asserted to be of divine 
origin, is unconditionally obligatory, because this or that 
person utters it, or because it is w^'itten here or there; 
it is obligatory only on condition that our own conscience 
will confirm it, and only hccatisc our conscience confirms 
it. Nay, it is absolute duty not to obey it without full 
self -investigation. We must first test it by our own 
conscience, and it is absolutely unconscientious to pass 
over this examination. Nothing can be urged against 
this categorial and unexceptionally valid result of reason ; 



THE MORALfTY OF OUR ACTIONS. 1S7 

and all 8ul)terfnges, e.\x?eptions, or modifications thereof 
are to be invariably repudiated. It is not allowjil)le to 
say, " I have frunid this or that to be true, and lience 
something else " (which occurs, perliaps, at the same 
place) "must also be true." For this or that was true, 
not because it occurred in such a place, but because it 
showed itself to be true, and it were unconscientious to 
risk something else on the mere chance that it may 
also be true. That which docs not proceed from faith, or 
from the confirmation of our own conscience, is aljsolute 
ßin. 



CHAPTER IL 

THE CAUSE OF EVIL IX MAN. 

I. Whatsoever appertains in general to a rational 
being, is necessarily in its wholeness and without lack in 
every individual, since otherwise such individual would 
not be rational. It cannot l^e too often reiterated 
that a rational being is not composed arljitrarily out of 
foreign fragments, but is a totality; and if you cancel 
a necessary component thereof, you cancel it altogether. 

At present we speak of the rational being as originally 
conceived. The moral law demands that empirical tune- 
creatures become an exact copy of the original Ego. This 
time-being is the subject of consciousness, and something 
occurs in it only in so far as it is consciously posited in 
it through a free act of its own self-activity. But it is 
clear that this positing, this reflecting upon that which 
constitutes the original Ego, must form a successive 
series of reflections, each being limited ; and that ^ it 
must, therefore, require a duration of time to raise 
everything which constitutes an original Ego to clear 
consciousness. To describe this process of the reflections 
of the Ego in time is to furnish the history of the em- 
pirical rational being. The one thing to be observed, 
however, is that this will always appears as accidentally 
successive reflections or positings, precisely because these 
all depend upon freedom, and not upon any mechanical 
law of nature. * 

• Hence the folly of the attempt to trace a necessary succession of 
development in human history. Translator's Remarks. 

188 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 189 

2. Of something man must become clearly conscious, 
if he is to liave consciousness at all and to be a rational 
being. First, in time he becomes conscious of the natural 
impulse — the ground whereof has already been indicated 
— and he acts in conformity with tliis impulse ; with 
freedom, it is true, in the formal significance of the word, 
but without consciousness of this freedom. He is free 
for an intelligence which is outside of him and observes 
him in his acts, but he is not free for himself ; for himself 
he is only — if he can l)e said at all to be anything for 
himself on this standpoint — a mere animal. 

It is to be expected that he will reflect upon himself 
in this condition. He then elevates himself above him- 
self, and enters upon a higher grade. This reflection 
does not occur necessarily according to a law, and hence 
we said only that it is to be expected. It occurs through 
absolute freedom ; it occurs because it occurs. It ought to 
occur, because the empirical Ego ought to correspond to 
the pure Ego, but it need not occur necessarily. (The 
society wherein a man moves may occasion, but cannot 
produce, this reflection.) 

Now through this reflection the individual tears him- 
self away from his natural impulse, and places himself 
independently before himself as a free intelligence ; 
through it the individual obtains for himself the power 
to defer self-determination, and hence also the power to 
choose between various ways of gratifying his natural 
impulse, which manifold arises, indeed, through this very 
reflection and the postponement of a resolution. 

Let us consider this possibility of choosing a little. 
The free being determines himself solely in accordance 
with and by means of conceptions. Hence his choice 
must be based upon a conception of this choice, or of 
what is to be chosen. A, B, or C, for instance, is to be 
chosen. Supposing that the free being chooses C, can 
it do so without any intelligible ground ? Clearly not, 
for then the choice would be undertaken not with 



I90 THE SCIENCE OF ET If /CS. 

frcGclom, but tliroi]ji;h Lliiid chance. Freedom acts 
according to conceptions. Hence tlierc nnist be al)SO- 
lutely something in C, which causes it to 1)0 preferred. 
We will call this something X. 

But another question: how happens it that it is 
precisely X, and not some possible -X, wliich determines 
the choice ? The ground of this can be sought for only 
in a general rule, of which the rational being is already 
possessed. There must be a major of a syllogism in 
reason, of the following nature : wjiatsoever is of tliis or 
this nature ( = X), must be preferred to everything else ; 
now C is of this nature; hence, etc. The major contains 
the rule. Such a rule is it whicli Kant has very happily 
designated as a maxim. (In a theoretical syllogism it 
would be the major, but the theoretical is not the higliest 
for man, and every possible mnjor has still a higlier 
proposition as its ground. Lut the highest for man, liis 
maximum, is his rule of action.) 

Let us dwell a little on this conception of a maxim. 
Firstly, so far as its form is concerned, it is a maxim 
through an act of my own freedom. If it did not exist 
through freedom, all other freedom would be cancelled ; 
since all other freedom necessarily and in a fixed order 
results from it. This is Kant's argument. But, more- 
over, and what I should chieHy urge, it is absolutely 
contradictory to hold that anything is externally given 
to the Ego. Whatsoever was given externally to the 
Ego, thereof the Ego could never have become im- 
mediately conscious. But the maxim is certainly the 
object of the most immediate consciousness. 

Hence if an evil maxim should be discovered, it is to 
be explained solely from the freedom of man, and man 
can never remove the responsibility from himself. More- 
over, a mere principle is not a maxim, and — since there 
is no true principle of action except the moral law — the 
moral law is not a maxim, since it does not depend upon, 
thefrccdüiii of the empirical subject. Something becoines 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 191 

a maxim for mc only when I, as an empirical subject, 
make it through freedom the rule of my acting. 

Now, what could possildy be the maxim of man on the 
standpoint of reflection, where we left him ? Since nu 
<ither impulse occurs in consciousness, as yet, tlian tlie 
natural impulse which only craves enjoyment, and has 
lust for its motive power, this maxim can only be as 
follows : " I must choose that which intensively and 
extensively promises the greatest enjoyment"; or in 
other words, the maxim of one's own happiness. Some- 
times indeed it may happen, that through means of (jur 
sympathetic impulses we seek our own happiness in the 
happiness of others, but since in such cases it is after 
ftll oidy the satisfaction of those sympathetic impulses, 
which we seek, our motive power is always after all our 
own happiness. On this standpoint man is a calculating 
animal. 

I have proved, that this must be the maxim on the 
j^resent standpoint; hence I assume, that this maxim is 
determined by a theoretical law, and may be deduced by 
its means. But just now I stated that the maxim is 
determined solely through the absolute spontaneity of 
the empirical subject. How can these two assertions l)e 
reconciled ? I propound this question at this early stage 
of our investigation, although it covers the whole ground 
thereof. 

I said, if man remains on this standpoint of reflection, 
it cannot be otherwise than that he should be ruled by 
this maxim. Hence the maxim was theoretically deduced 
from the presupposed standpoint. But it is not at all 
necessary, that he should remain on that standpoint ; nay, 
he ought to raise himself to a higher one, and can so 
raise himself. That he does not do it, is his own fault, 
and hence the improper maxim, which results from it, is 
also his own fault. It is, therefore, not to be foretold 
what standpoint the' individual will occupy — since tliat 
does not follow from any theoretical law. Heuce^ it 'is 



192 THE SCIENCE OE ETHICS. 

quite right, if the coiichision runs thus: "Under such 
circumstances, i.e., with such a character and mode of 
thinking, he couhl not act otherwise than lie did." Jhit 
it would be wrong to confine the conclusion to this 
assertion, and to deny that he could have anotlier 
character than he has. He absolutely oitght to form 
another one, if his present character is of no account; 
and he can do it, since it depends altogether upon hi.'i 
freedom to do so. 

There is something incomprehG]isil)lc here, as it could 
not well be otherwise, since we have arrived at the limit 
of all comprehensibility, at the doctrine of freedom in its 
application to the empirical subject. For this reason : so 
long as I do not yet occupy the higher standpoint of 
reflection, that standpoint does not exist for me; and 
hence I cannot have a conception of that which I ought 
to do, until I actually do it. Nevertheless it remains 
true, that I absolutely ought to do it; namely with 
reference to another observer, who knows this point, and 
in reference to myself, whenever I shall come to know it. 
For, whenever I come to know it, I cannot excuse myself 
with having been powerless to do it before, but shall, on 
the contrary, accuse myself for not having done it alwavs. 
In other words : I ought to do it in respect to my original 
character, which, to be sure, is only an idea. 

Nor could it, indeed, be otherwise, since an act of 
freedom is absolutely hccausc it is, and is an absolute first, 
which cannot be connected with, nor explained from, any- 
thing else. It is solely from not considering this point, 
that all the difficulties arise, which strike so many, when 
they arrive at this point. To covqirchend signifies to 
connect one thinking with another, or, to think the 
former through the mediation of the latter. When sucli 
a mediation is possible, then there is no freedom, but only 
mechanism. To desire to comprehend an act of freedom 
is therefore absolutely contradictory. If it could be com- 
prehended, it would not be freedom, on that very account. 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 193 

In like iiiaiiner all the particular reflections, whicli are 
here required, are absolute starting-points of an utterly 
new series, regarding which one cannot say whence tliey 
come — since in fact tliey come no wliither. This of 
itself throws much clearness upon what Kant says : that 
the radical evil is inborn in man, and that nevertlieless 
it has its origin in freedom. For it may well be for(^seeii 
and comprehended, that man should remain awhile, or 
perhaps all his lifetime on the lower standpoints of 
reflection, since there is absolutely nothing which drives 
him to a higher standpoint; and experience certainly 
proves such to be the case. In so far, therefore, evil is 
inborn in man. But at the same time it is certainly not 
necessary, that man should remain upon this standpoint ; 
since there is also absolutely nothing, which kecjps him 
hack on that standpoint. It is quite as possible for him 
to raise himself at once to the highest point, and if he 
does not do so the fault lies with his freedom, which he 
does not make use of, although he may not become 
conscious on this standpoint of this his fault. And in so 
far the evil has its ground in freedom. 

The deduced maxim is certainly lawlessness, but is not 
yet positive hostility to, or corruption of, morality. It is 
to be hoped and expected that the man will, sooner or 
later, raise himself, of his own accord, to that higher 
point, if he is only left to himself. This is rendered a 
much more difficult matter if that improper maxim is 
raised through sophistry into a principle, as has been done 
l)y so many so-called philosophers. I do not allude to the 
defenders of the principle of earthly happiness and per- 
fection amongst us Germans ; for with them it is more a 
defect of expression and misapprehension, their meaning 
being usually much more innocent than their words. But 
I allude to the foreign materialistic and atheistic moralists, 
like Heivetius, who say: "Man acts only from selfish 
motives, and there is no other motive power in his cha- 
racter. This is his destination. He cannot, and, ought 




194 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

not to, be otherwise, and wlioever prctendB to be better is 
either a fool or a fanatic, who niisa])prelieii(l8 the liiiiitH of 
his own nature." Such an argument is, of course, calcu- 
lated to suppress and make impossiljle all desire for the 
higher standpoint. 

But, even without such a false i»hilosop]iy, this mode of 
thinking may be confirmed, either throii.^li general habit 
and through the experience, which is proltaljly the same 
in all ages, that most men do not rise lx3yond it ; whicli, 
indeed, gives rise also to the prejudice that those who, 
in their external acts, whicli alone can be oljserved, appear 
better, may, nevertheless, have in their inmost hearts tlie 
same low mode of thinking. Moreover — a not unim- 
portant observation — it is natural for man to exist on 
this low standpoint. That is to say, witliout an act of 
spontaneity man remains ui)on that standpoint, borrows 
his maxims solely from that common — or which to liim 
appears most common — custom, and judges of wliat ovfjJU 
to be done from what is adwdJi/ done. The ground is 
ibis : it is only tlirough education in the widest sejise of 
the word, i.e., through the general intbicnce of society upon 
US, that we are first cultured for the use of our freedom; 
and we always remain on the standpoint of the culture 
we have thus received, unless, through a free act, we rise 
above it. 

If Society were better we, also, sh»»idd be lictter, 
though without merit of our own. The possibility, 
however, to have merit of our own is not cancelled 
thereby, but is only raised to a higher point. 

3. But if man is left to himself, and not enchained 
through the example of his age or a corrupt philosophy, 
it is to be expected that he will always become more 
and more conscious of the impulse to be absolutely self- 
sufficient, which continues to manifest itself within him. 
He will thus elevate himself to quite another sort of 
freedom, for under the previously-described maxim he is 
only formaliter free, and materialiter altogetlier dependent 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 195 

upon natural objects. He has no oilier ol)ject than the 
enjoyment wliich tliese ol)jecta furiiisli. 

I have said: "If man ia l)ut left to himself he will, 
perhaps, rise higher." Each one sees that, from the 
thoughtlessness and inattentiveness wherein that impulse 
al)solutely does not exist for us, there is no steady transi- 
tion to the consciousness of that impulse. This transition 
occurs through a particular act of spontaneity. But, in 
spite of all evil examples and of all erroneous philoso- 
phizings, man is still capable of this act; he shall and can 
rise above his standpoint, and it is always his own fault if 
he does not do so. For all those external circumstances 
have no causality upon him ; they do not work in and 
through him, but it is he himself who determines himself 
by means of their influence. Moreover, it is a fact that, 
in spite of all those obstacles, many men do so elevate 
themselves. The how remains inexplicaV)le, i.e., can only 
be exjilained through freedom. In analogy with a pre- 
eminent intellectual ability it might be called : a genius 
for virtue. It is not sentiment alitj/, as some writer says, 
but self-determination, and he who would develop virtue 
must develop self-determination. 

Now, if, in some incomprehensible manner, this impulse 
to be self-determined arises in consciousness — but as mere 
blind impulse, because the reflection of it does not occur 
consciously, and is not undertaken intentionally — then 
this impulse naturally appears as something accidental ; 
as something which happens to exist in us, and without 
any higher reason. It is to be foreseen that this mani- 
festation will further and otherwise determine the charac- 
ter of the individual, and it is this determinedness of 
character which we have now to investigate. 

The distinguishing characteristics to be noticed in this 
investigation are as follows : The impulse appears only as 
a blind impulse, and not as a law, nor as obeying a law. 
Moreover, it appears as accidental, and non-essential to 
man's nature, our nature having already been determined 



196 THE SCIENCE OE ETHICS. 

by the above maxim of aelfiHlines.s. From these cha- 
racteristics we must draw our conclusions. Tt is not 
necessary that anyone should arrive at tliis point at all, 
and it is equally not necessary that he should remain on 
it ; but if anyone occupies this standpoint it is necessary 
that his character should become determined in a certain 
manner. 

Firstly, on this standpoint, in so far as our acts must be 
explained from it, we do not act according to a maxim ^ 
but accordiii}^ to an impulse. Hence, there arises a mode 
of acting which the acting individual does not and cannot 
explain to himself, and which appears to be contradictory^ 
as, indeed, the defenders of the former utterly sensuous 
mode of acting appeal to the contradictory character of 
this mode of acting, which they mistake for pure morality, 
and thus accuse, likewise, the latter of being absurd. 
This characteristic is, indeed, of itself sufficient to con- 
demn the second mode of acting. The previous maxirn 
of selfishness remains, also, the ruling maxim in this con- 
dition, and all conscious acts on this standpoint are done 
conformably to this maxim. An act which is done merely 
at the instigation of a blind impulse is an exceptirm 
to the rule, and hence, when men seek, on this stand- 
point, to account for the motives of these acts, we usually 
seek to derive them from that maxim of selfishness, and 
to establish an artificial connection with that maxim, 
thereby, as it were, wronging ourselves. 

So far as the material of the desire to will is concerned, 
there thus arises the — not consciously thought, but, to an 
observer from the higher standpoint, noticeable — maxim 
of the unlimited and lawless supreme rule over all that is 
external to us. Man has not the will — indeed, he has no 
will at all, but is blindly impelled — but he acts as if he 
had the will to subjugate everything external to the 
authority of his will, and this he does from alisolutely 
no other possible ground than because he so wills. It is 
immediately clear that such a mode of acting must result 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 197 

from the blind and lawless impulse to l)e absolutely scli'- 
<]eterniined. 

To properly appreciate this maxim we must compare 
it with morality. Morality also demands i"r(;cdom and 
independence, but desires to attain it only ^nadually, .md 
■conformably to certain laws. Hence, it desires no un- 
•conditioned and lawless, but a causality which remains 
\mder certain restrictions; whereas, the maxim whereof 
we speak now, demands unconditioned and unrestricted 
•causality. 

The easily recognizable and very common manifesta- 
tions of this mode of thinking are as follows : The men 
^vho hold it, desire certainly to have a good will, and wisli 
that all other men should let everything depend uiion 
their good will; but they do not want to hear anything 
«aid of their duty or of law. They like to be generous 
a,nd forbearing ; everything but just. They are benevo- 
lently disposed towards others, but have no respect or 
•esteem for their rights. In short, their empirical will, 
which again depends only upon their will, and is there- 
fore an absolute empirical will, is to be law for all ihe 
rest of the world, both irrational and free. 

Every one must see that these characteristics cannot be 
explained from the mere craving after enjoyment. Each 
such attempted explanation is forced, and does not 
Accomplish what it purposes to accomplish, provided only, 
that the happiness of others is really desired, and that 
this improper end is not merely made a pretence to cover 
the still more improper end of mere enjoyment. The 
■object of our will is not at all determined through a 
possible enjoyment, but is absolutely determined through 
the will; in form precisely like the genuinely moral mode 
•of thinking. 

However, this mode of thinking necessarily retains the 
character of impelling esteem. To carry it out may 
require no sacrifice of enjoyment, for instance, if one has 
no passions, or if circumstances require no sacrifices ; 



198 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

in wliicli case we approve coldly. For then we Lelieve 
that we had a right to demand tliat everything .should 
bubmit to and obey our will ; and hence nothing occur.s 
but what was to be expected. There is no true joy 
and gladness connected with this mode of thinking, when 
it is successful, precisely because it expects no favour 
from nature, but merely demands that nature should 
do its duty. Whereas, if it is not successful, there arises 
— if not pain and woe, as a sorrowful depressing sen- 
timent, at least disgust, as an active passion, for the very 
reason that we were impelled by the craving to be 
self-sufficient. We rave against God and nature, hold 
forth about violation of justice, and accuse particularly 
men of ingratitude and want of recognition. 

But to carry out this mode of thinking may also 
require sacrifices. It is very possible to carry it out with 
the greatest self-denial, precisely because it is higher than 
the impulse to attain mere enjoyment. In this case there 
results self-valuation. Tliis is not so much an esteeming 
of our free acting through absolute self-determination, as 
rather an esteeming of our character, as a iiermanent, 
reposeful heing. We enjoy to find ourselves l)etter and 
nobler than we should almost have credited. That it must 
be thus, appears from the following : we act in accordance 
with a blind impulse, and hence not properly with freedom 
and matureness ; we did not weigh our action in advance 
of the acting, but now find it as a given act only by 
its occurrence; and the rule according to which it might 
have occurred, we likewise do not discover until after- 
ward. Thus the act is and remains a given and not 
a self-made act, and since it is a good act the doing 
it remains an inborn goodness. This characteristic 
appears often, in ordinary life as well as in philosophical 
argument. For instance : the assertion of an original 
goodness of human nature is based on experience, and on 
the above kind of experience. And yet the assertion 
is utterly false. Human nature is originally neither 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS;. 199 

good nor bad. It becomes good or bad only tlirough 
freedom. 

Moreover, this self-valuation is not a cold and quiot 
approval like moral self-esteem, but is connected witli 
joy, which always proceeds from the uncx])ccted; joy 
over ourselves because we are so good. Tliat it must 
be so, appears clearly from the following: "VVe have acted 
in accordance with a blind impulse, and have not re- 
quired any sacrifice from ourselves. The common lino 
on which we place ourselves with the rest of mankind 
is selfishjiesa. We have made up our mind that all men 
are selfish, and that nothing else is to be expected of 
them. But now we suddenly find ourselves raised above 
this common standard of humanity ; we have clear merits. 
"We do not find ourselves — as tlie moral law wants us 
to find ourselves — a& wc ought to he, but we find ourselves 
incomparably better than we have any need to Ije. For 
us there exist none but great, noble and meritorious acts, 
none but opera superorjativa. To characterize this mode 
of thinking in one word: everything which God, men, 
and nature do for us is nothing but their absolute duty ; 
they never can do anything more than what they are 
l)ound to do for us, and are alwavs fj-ood-for-nothiiijr 
servants ; but whatsoever we do for them is graciousness 
and kindness. However we may act we can never 
act wrongly. If we sacrifice everything to enjoyment 
it is all right, and nothing but the exercise of our well- 
founded right. If we deny ourselves enjoyment but in 
the slightest degree, it is already a superfluous merit. 

That this mode of thinking, when reduced to its 
principle, is irrational, will probably not be denied by 
anyone; and that it occurs frequently — though without 
clear consciousness of its character — and, moreover, iu 
those persons who pass for very honest and virtuous men, 
wül also be denied by no one who knows mankind and 
is able to penetrate into their inmost heart. We will noL 
refer to particular individuals, but to all mankind. 



20O ■ THE SCIENCE OE ETHICS. 

Almost the wliolc liistory of luankind is .sini]>]y a proof 
of our assertion, and liistory l^econics comprehcnsihle only 
through the present position of such a mode of tliinking. 
Subjugation of the bodies and souls of nations, wars 
of conquest and of religion, all the misdeeds, in short, 
which have ever dishonoured mankind ; how are they 
to be explained ? "What induced the subjugator to 
pursue his ol)ject against danger and labour ? j[)id he 
hope thereby to enlarge the sources of his sensuous 
• enjoyment? By no means. "That which I will, shall 
1)6 done ; what I say, shall 1)e law 1 " This was the only 
principle which moved him. 

It has already been acknowledged that this kind of 
character has not enjoyment for its object. The egotistic 
self-merit which accompanies it is based on the con- 
sciousness of sacrifices, which we need not have made 
in our opinion. True, the satisfaction of these sacrifices 
affords an enjoyment afterwards, which enjoyment is not 
sensual, namely, the enjoyment of these caresses which 
we lavish upon ourselves ; Ijut this enjoyment was not 
the end we had in view ; not the motive power of our 
acts. The real object which governs our acts, althougli 
it is never clearly thought and raised to consciousness, 
is this, that our lawless arbitrariness may govern every- 
thing. We sacrifice our enjoyment to this purpose, and 
then flatter ourselves at our unselfishness. 

If man is regarded as a natural being, this mode of 
thinking has one advantage over the one previously 
described, which estimates everything according to the 
sensual enjoyment which it furnishes. Viewed from this 
standpoint, such a character inspires admiration ; whereas 
the man who first calculates how much enjoyment he 
may get out of an act, inspires contempt. For this 
character, after all, is, and remains, independence from 
all the external world ; is a self-sufficiency. It might 
be called the heroic character. In fact, it is the usual 
mode of thinking of the heroes of history. 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 201 

But when we regard this character from the moral 
standpoint, it has no vahie at all, since it does not 
proceed from' morality. Nay, it is more dangerous than 
the former sensuous character. For it falsifies and soils 
— if not the principle of morality, since that does not 
exist for this mode of thinking — at least, the judgment 
of material acts emanating from that principle; since 
it accustoms men to consider tliat which is merely duty 
as something nol)le and meritorious. True, the publican 
and sinner has no more value than the self-conceited 
Pharisee, for both have no value at all ; but it is easier 
to convert the former than the latter. 

4. Man has nothing further to do than to raise that 
craving for absolute self-sufficiency, which, when working 
as a blind impulse, produc&s a very immoral character 
into clear consciousness, and the impulse will, througli 
this mere reflection, change in consciousness into an 
absolutely imperative law, as has already been shown. 
As every reflection limits the reflected, thus the reflected 
impulse is also limited through this reflection, and in 
virtue of this limitedness it changes from a blind craving 
for absolute causality into a law of conditioned causality. 
Man now knows that he shall (ought to) do something 
absolutely. 

Now if this knowing is to change into acting, man 
must make it a maxim for himself, to do always, and 
in every case, that which duty demands, precisely because 
duty demands it. The latter condition, indeed, is already 
involved in the conception of a maxim, as being the 
highest and absolute rule, which recognizes no higher 
one. 

It is absolutely impossible and contradictory that any- 
one with a clear consciousness of his duty should, in 
the moment of action, consciously resolve not to do his 
duty. That he should revolt and refuse obedience to 
the iaw^, and make it his maxim not to do what his 
duty is precisely because it is his duty. Such a maxim 



202 ; , THE SCIENCE OE ETHICS. 

were devilish ; but the conception of a devil contradicts, 
and thus cancels itself. This we prove as follows : — 

Man is clearly conscious of his duty, signifies: Man, 
as an intelligence, absolutely requires of himself to do 
something. Now, to say man consciously resolves to 
act against his duty, signifies : he requires of himself in 
the same undivided moment, not to do that very thing. 
Hence, in the same undivided moment, the same intelli- 
gence in him must require contradictory acts, which is 
certainly a self-annihilating proposition, and the most 
flagrant contradiction. 

But it is very possible to darken in one's self the 
clear consciousness of the requirement of duty. For 
this consciousness arises only through an act of absolute 
spontaneity, and remains only through the continuation 
of that act of freedom ; when we cease to reflect it 
vanishes. (It is the same with this consciousness as 
with many conceptions of transcendental philosophy. 
As soon as we descend from the higher standpoint, 
upon which alone they are possible, they vanish into 
nothingness.) The matter therefore stands in this 
shape : if we continue to reflect in accordance with the 
requirement of the law, and keep it in view, it is 
impossible for us not to act in conformity .with it — 
impossible to resist it. If, on the contrary, we lose 
sight of it, it is equally impossible to act conformably 
to it. In either case there is necessity, and we thus 
seem to fall into an intellectual fatalism, but of a lower 
kind than the ordinary one. For according to the 
ordinary intellectual fatalism, the moral law which 
exists in man, -without any co-operation of his own, 
causes, in one case, consciousness of itself, as well as 
acts in conformity with it; and, in another case, it 
does not produce such consciousness or such acts, and 
hence leaves open room for lower impulses. We have 
already done away with this sort of fatalism by showing 
that the moral law is not sometliing which exists within 



THE AfORALHY OF OUR ACTIONS. 203 

ua, iiKlopendently of our co-operation, being, on the 
contrary, first created by ourselves. 

But the present kind of fatalism holds that either the 
moral law continues in our consciousness, in which case 
it necessarily produces moral acts, or it vanishes, in 
which case moral acts are impossible. Hence the 
appearance of fatalism vanishes altogether as soon as 
we observe that it depends upon our freedom wliether 
that consciousness shall continue in us, or shall darken 
itself. It is the same with this consciousness as with 
the above-mentioned standpoint of reflection. 

Again, let it be well noted that this act of freedom, 
which either retains that consciousness clear, or allows 
it to be darkened, is also an absolute first, and hence 
unexplainable act. It occurs, not according to a maxim 
and hence not Avith accompanying consciousness of wliat 
I do, and not with a consciousness of the freedom where- 
with I do it. If it did, the allowing that consciousness 
to be darkened would be precisely that conscious revolt 
against the moral law, which we have shown to be a 
contradiction. It occurs, when it occurs, simply hecause 
it occurs without any higher ground. Or, to represent 
the matter from still another side: the vanishing of 
the consciousness of duty is an abstractian. Xow, there 
are two very different kinds of abstraction. Either I 
make the abstraction with clear consciousness, and 
according to a rule ; or the abstraction arises in me of 
its own account, even where I did not intend to abstract, 
through an undetermined thinking, such as, for instance, 
produces all formular philosophy. Xow the vanishing 
whereof we speak here, is of the latter kind ; it is an 
undetermined thinking, and a violation of duty because 
the determined consciousness of duty is itself duty. 

It is through thoughtlessness and that inattentiveness 
to oar higher nature, wherewith our life necessarily 
•begins, that we grow accustomed to this thoughtlessness, 
and thus drift along in our usual current. But this 



204 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

does not imply, by any means, that we cannot, tlirongli 
freedom, get out of tliis current. In tJie .same manner 
we may, on tlie other liand, hahituatc onrself to matuic 
consideration and attentiveness to tlie law, without tliis 
habit becoming a necessity for us. I'ractice and attentive- 
ness, nay, careful watching of one's self, must Ijc in- 
cessantly continued. No one is sure for one moment 
of his morality without continued exertion. Xo man, 
nay, so far as we can see, no finite being is confirmed 
in goodness. 

The determined clear consciousness of the moral law 
vanishes. Two cases are supposable. Either this con- 
sciousness vanishes altogether and no thought of duty 
remains until after the act; in which case we act either 
according to the maxim of selfishness, or in ol^edience 
to the blind impulse to have our lawless will rule 
everywhere. We have already described both of these 
conditions. 

Or there remains a consciousness of duty, but only an 
indistinct consciousness. Here it is important, first of all, 
to note how a determined consciousness may change itself 
into an undetermined and wavering consciousness. All our 
consciousness begins with undeterminedness, for it begins 
with the power of imagination, which is a power of floating 
undecidedly over two opposites. It is only through the 
nnderstanding that the product of this floating, which, as 
yet, has no outlines, becomes fixed and determined. But, 
even after it has been determined, it may easily happen 
that the sharp outline is lost sight of, and that the object 
is again . held merely by the power of imagination. This 
we do, for instance, consciously whenever we form a general 
conception in arbitrary abstraction ; we drop the particular 
determinations, and thus raise the conception to a general 
one. True, the conception remains determined in this 
instance; the very fact that it is, in a certain degree, 
undetermined, constituting its determinedness. Uncon- 
sciously, WQ do it when we are thoughtless or distrait. 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 205 

P.y far the fewest men 8ei/ce thinga determinedly and 
closely defined. Olijects only float vaguely before their 
minds as in a dream or as covered by a fog. Now, was tlieir 
understanding then altogether inactive? Certainly not, 
or no consciousness at all would have been possible. lUit 
the determinedness iinme<liately escapes them again, and 
its passage through the region of the understanding is 
very quick. Even in regard to its undcterminedness, 
a conception held in this manner is undetermined. It 
wavers between more or less undetermincdness without 
co-operation of the power of judgment. Now, this is the 
presupposed case with the conception of duty ; it darkens 
of itself simply because I do not hold it fixedly. 

The conception of duty, as thought in a given case, 
involves a threefold determinedness which may lose its 
determined character. Firstly, in each special case some 
particular act of all possible acts is duty ; and all others 
are absolutely not duty. It is only the conception of this 
one act, which is accompanied by the above described 
feeling of certainty and conviction. This determinedness 
of the act escapes us, although the form of the conception 
of duty remains. "We take hold of sometliing else as our 
duty, nay, perhaps even suppose this something else to be 
our duty, although, if we went honestly to work, we 
should be sure to find it impelled and determined through 
some inclination or another, since we have already lost the 
true thread of conscience. We then deceive ourselves 
concerning that which is our duty, and act, as is usually 
said, from an erring conscience. But this error is, and 
remains, our guilt. If we had but held firm to our 
insight into our duty, which we thus possessed before, we 
should not have erred; and thus to hold it firm was a matter 
of our freedom. There is a self-deception here, against 
which we cannot be too much on our guard. (I said above, 
"if we go honestly to work"; for it is very well possible 
that some one should only try to make others believe tliat 
he does from motives of duty, what he knows well 



2o6 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

enough, he docs only from motives of selfishness. Foi 
instance, he may bo utterly indifferent as to duty, being 
a dogmatic unbeliever. Such a cliaracter would be that 
of a miserable hypocrite, and is not included in the above 
class.) 

Secondly, there is involved in the conception tliis 
determinedness, that it is prcciselij in the 'present case, 
that we have to act in a determined manner. This deter- 
minedness of the present time may escape us, in which 
case the command appears as one whicli is not determined 
by time : that is as one which, though it certainly requires 
obedience, does not demand it precisely at the present 
time, and which we need not be in a hurry to oliey. 
Hence, comes the postponement of reform ; the thought, 
that we will enjoy only yet this or that delight, or carry 
out this or that reprehensible plan, and then seriously 
consider about reforming. This mode of thinking is 
partly utterly wicked, because the moral law allows no 
time for consideration, but demands, whenever it speaks, 
implicit and immediate obedience ; and partly very dan- 
gerous, for if we have once learned postponing, we are 
very likely to continue it. The time when we shall have 
no more cherished plans, will never, come ; for man has 
always wishes. Such a character is lazy, and requires to 
be removed by some outside power from the standpoint 
which he occupies; but such a power does not exist. 
Even the Almighty cannot do what the cure of this 
laziness requires. 

Thirdly and finally, the requirement of duty is 
determined in its form, as duty ; it demands al^solutely 
obedience, regardless of all other impulses. If we allow 
this determinedness to darken within us, the commands 
of duty will no longer appear as commands, but only, 
perhaps, as good advice which we may follow if we so 
list and if it does not cost too much self-denial, Ijut 
which we may also, if necessary, trim a little. In this 
condition we frame for ourselves a mixed maxim. We do 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. lot. 

not ahvayH Inint afler the greatest enjoyment and' care 
only for it, bnt often content ourselves with having to 
do our duty ; nay, perhaps we even sacrifice to duty those 
enjoyments whicli are naturally not enticing for us — the 
.spendthrift sacrificing avarice, the ambitious man lusts 
which might interfere with his ambition, etc., — but we 
retain those enjoyments which are dearest to us. Thus, 
we make a compromise between conscience and lust ; nay, 
believe to have satisfied both at the same time. 

It is this mode of thinking which impudently asserts 
that we' cannot live as the moral law requires, that the 
punctual practice of that law is au impossibility: an 
assertion which is very frequently heard in ordinary life, 
but which has also sneaked into philosophical and 
theological systems. But, of what impossilnlity, I ask, 
does this assertion speak ? That we often cannot realize our 
firmest will in the external world on account of external 
obstacles, is true enough ; but neither does the moral law 
unconditionally demand this realization. Tlie moral law 
requires only that we should exert all our powers, should 
do all we can do ; and why should we not be able to 
do what we can do ? The moral law requires only that 
we should not do the opposite of our duty. And wliy 
should we not be able to leave that undone ? What power 
can force us free beings to act ? 

What that assertion really means to say is : we cannot 
do our duty, if we want to retiiin this or that enjoyment, 
this or that possession, &c. Duty demands that we 
should sacrifice them. But we cannot both sacrifice and 
retain them. 

True enough ; but who has said that we ought to retain 
these enjoyments or those possessions ? Everything, life, 
honour, and all that is dear to man, is to be sacrificed to 
duty. Such is our opinion. We have never asserted that 
in every case duty and the satisfaction of selfish impulses 
could co-exist. The latter are to be sacrificed. Hence 
the truth is not, we cannot do our duty, but we vnll not do 



2o8 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

our duty. Wo cannot make up our will to make tlio.so 
sacrifices. It is our will, not our power to do, wliich is at 
fault. 

If anything, indeed, proves the wide extent of human 
corruption and its shamelessness, it is this conti'adictory 
and utterly irrational subterfuge, which is put forth 
again and again, and put forth and defended even by the 
most sensible men, nay, which even teachers of morality 
have accepted and seriously discussed, as if there really 
were a grain of rationality in it. 

(It is precisely the same, when men speak of impossi- 
bility in relation to what pure reason requires to be 
realized in a technical -practical respect. The "we 
cannot" always signifies the same. If, for instance, a 
thorougli reform of State organization is demanded, men 
cry " those propositions cannot be realized, they are im- 
practicable." Of course they are impracticable, if the 
old abuses are to remain. But who says that they are 
to remain ?) 

These three different modes of evading the severity 
of the moral law may be united, but the latter con- 
dition is undoubtedly of greatest danger to mankind. 
If we have once persuaded ourselves that we can 
make a compromise with the strictness of morality, we 
shall likely remain all our lifetime 'making such com- 
promises, unless indeed some severe external concussion 
stirs us up to repent ; and in so far indeed it is much 
easier to reform a sinner, than a conceited just man 
of the latter sort. 

CONCLUDING REMARKS. 

In order to place the doctrine of freedom in the clearest 
light, and to prosecute fatalism into its extremest hiding- 
corners, we append some remarks more specially referring 
to Kant's assertion of a radical evil in man. 

The existence of evil in man we have explained as 
follows: each one to be called a man, must arrive at 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 209 

sclf-conscioiisncss. Now this involves simply that he 
should become conscious of his freedom in the clioiec 
of his actions. This consciousness arises already, when 
man learns to make a choice between the manifold whicli 
the mere natural impulse demands of liim. In this case 
he will act unconsciously and darkly — or, if his under- 
standing is somewhat developed — consciously and clearly 
according to the maxim of selfishness ; and in so far we 
may certainly, as licinhold does, ascribe to man a selfish 
impulse, althotigh it is to be remeniljcred, that he has 
made himself selfish only through a voluntarily chosen 
maxim; for the mere natural impulse is by no means 
selfish or blameworthy ; it being rather duty to satisfy it, 
as we shall show in time. Ui^on this standpoint man 
remains very readily, since nothing impels him onward, 
and since no necessity whatever compels him to reflect 
upon his higher nature. 

Now if we had merely said, man can remain on this 
standpoint, tl>ere would be no difficulty about the asser- 
tion. It would be an altogether problematical statement. 
But how do we come to make the statement categorical 
and positive ; how do we come to say it is certainly not 
necessary, but it is to be expected that man will remain 
on that standpoint ? What is it which we really do assert 
in this statement, and what is the posiiiveness which 
we presuppose unwittingly ? 

It is this : man will not do anything, which is not 
absolutely necessary, and which he is not comjKlled by 
his nature as man to do. We therefore presuppose an 
original laziness to reflect, and what is simply the result 
of it, to act in accordance with such reflection. This 
would, therefore, be a true positive radical evil, and 
not merely a negative evil, as it has hitherto seemed 
to appear. It was indeed necessary that it should be 
thus. We had need of a positive, were it but to explain 
the negative. 

Now, what justifies such a presupposition? Is it 
P 



2IO THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

merely experience? Kant seems to assume this, aUliou-li 
lie arrives at the same conclusion, wliich we shall 
immediately arrive at. But mere experience would never 
justify such a universal presupposition. Hence there 
must be a rational ground for it ; not one which 
venerates necessity, for then freedom would be cancelled, 
but one which renders explicable tliat universality of 
experience. We ascribe to nature as sucli a ]jower of 
inertia {vis inerticc). This results, indeed, from the 
conception of the causality of a free ])eing, wliich must 
necessarily occur in time if it is to be perceptiljle, 
and which could not so occur, were it not ]iosited as 
resisted by external objects. True, the conception of a 
power of inertia seems contradictory, but nevertheless 
it is a real one ; and it is only requisite that we should 
understand it properly. 

Nature, as such, as mere Ego and Object in general, 

has only repose, only being ; it is what it is, and in so 

far no active power whatsoever is to be ascrilied to 

nature. But for the very purpose of thus remaining, or 

reposing, nature must have a quantum of tendency or 

power to remain what it is. If it has not tins power, 

nature would not retain its form for a moment, would 

change incessantly and thus have no form at all. In 

Bhort"^ nature would not be nature. Now, if an opposite 

power influences nature, nature necessarily resists 

with all its power, in order to remain as it is; and 

it is only now, through relation to an opposite power, that 

what was before inertia becomes activity. It is thus that 

both conceptions are syntlietically united, and it is 

this synthesis which is signified by a 2^owcr of inertia. 

Now, on the indicated standpoint we ourselves are 
nothing but nature. Our powers are powers of nature, 
and although it is freedom which gives them vitality, 
since the causality of nature came to an end in the 
impulse, yet the direction is absolutely no other than the 
direction which nature itself would have taken, if left 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 211 

undisturbed. IMoreover, the fact that we do occupy the 
described standpoint, is also to be taken into considera- 
tion, since it is a necessary fact, as a result of natiirul 
nieclmnisin. Thus we are nature in every rcsjjcct. But 
that wliich appertains to all nature nnist also a])})ertii,in 
to man in so far as lie is Jiature : a reluctance to enieig(i 
from liis prcvsent condition ; a tendency to remain in the 
old accustomed pathway. 

It is only thus alone tliat we explained a universal 
phenomenon amongst men, which is illustrated in all 
human actions : ih& possibility of habit, and the ten- 
dency to remain in the old Itcaten track. Each man, 
even the most powerful and active, has his " Schlendrian," 
to use a low but very characteristic expression, and 
will have to fight against it all his lifetime. This is the 
power of inertia in our nature. Even the regularity and 
order of most men is nothing but this tendency to repose 
and habit. It always costs labour to tear loose from 
it. Even if we are successful for once, and if the stirrinfr 
up holds on awhile, we nevertheless fall back into our old 
laziness as soon as we cease to watch ourselves. 

Let us consider man in the described condition. Since 
he is, in general, in his original essence, altliough not in 
actuality, free and independent of nature, he is certain 
to tear himself loose from this condition, and can-do so, 
if we regard him as absolutely free ; but he must be free 
before he can tear himself thus loose through freedom. 
It is precisely his freedom which is enchained ; the power 
which is to help him is in league against him. There 
is no equilibrium, no balance ; the weight of nature drags 
him down, and there is no weight of the moral law to 
counterbalance it. Now it is true enough that man 
absolutely ought to place himself in the other scale, and 
ought to decide that step ; it is likewise true that man 
has the actual power within him to give himself sufficient 
weight to overbalance his inertia or laziness, and that 
he can at each moment, through a pressure upon himself 



212 THE SCIENCE OF ETHTCS. 

by mcana of the mere will, raise this power; but how 
is ho to get this will, this first pressure upon himself ? 
It is by no means a result of his condition, which, on the 
contrary, rather retards it. Moreover, this first pressure 
is not to arise from his natural state, Ijut absolutely 
from his self-activity. But where, then, in his natural 
condition, is tlie point from which lie mi^dit raise tiiat 
power ? Absolutely nowhere. If we view the matter 
from a natural point of view, it is absolutely impossible 
that man should help liimself, or should grow better. 
Only a miracle, to be achieved by himself, can help 
him. (Hence those who assert a servimt arlitrium, and 
characterize man as a piece of log or a stick, who cannot, 
through his own power, move liimself, but must be im- 
pelled by a higher power, are altogether in the right, ajul 
logical, if they speak of the natural man.) 

Laziness, therefore, reproducing itself infinitely through 
long habit, and soon changing into utter impotency to 
be good, is the true, inborn evil which has its ground 
in human nature itself, and can be easily enough ex- 
plained from it. Man is by nature lazy, says Kant very 
correctly. 

From this laziness next arises cowardice, the second 
fundamental vice of man. Cowardice is laziness to main- 
tain our freedom and independence in our contact with 
others. Each one has courage enough when ojiposed 
to a man, of whose weakness he is already convinced; 
but if he has not this conviction, if he comes in contact 
with a man in whom he presumes more strength — no 
matter of what kind — than he himself possesses, he gets 
afraid at the exertion of power which he will need to 
maintain his independence, and hence gives way. Only 
thus is slavery, physical as well as moral slavery, amongst 
men to be explained : subjection and authority woi'ship. 
I am terror-stricken in view of the bodily exertion of 
resistance, and subject my body ; I am terror-stricken 
at the trouble of self-thinking, which somebody else 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 213 

requires of nic by making bold or intricate statements, 
ami asking me to see into them ; and I rather submit 
to his authority, so as to get soon rid of hi.s demands 
upon me. (There are always men who wisli to nde ; 
we have stated the reason above. IJut these are tlie 
fewer and more energetic men. Tiiey have a l^old, 
strong character. How, then, does it liappen tliat tlie 
others, who, united, would be much stronger, suljmit to 
these few ? Thus : the trouljle which it would require of 
them to resist, is more painful to them than the slavery 
to which they submit, and wJiich tliey hope they sliall 
be able to bear. The least exertion of power is far more 
painful to ordinary man than thousandfold suffering, 
and he would rather bear everything than act once. In 
suffering he at least remains passive and quiet, and gets 
accustomed to it. Thus the sailor of the anecdote was 
willing rather to comfort himself with tlie hope that 
he should be able to stand it in hell, than exert himself 
sufficiently to better himself in this life. There he would 
only suffer, but here he should have to act.) 

The coward comforts himself in this subjection, which 
after all is not lieartfelt, by means of falseness and 
deception ; for the third fundamental vice of man, which 
naturally arises from cowardice, is falseness. Man cannot 
80 utterly deny his selfhood and sacrifice it to another, 
as he may pretend to do, in order to be relieved of the 
trouble to defend himself openly. Hence he only shams 
it in order to espy a better opportunity, and that he may 
oppose his oppressor when the same shall no longer have 
his attention directed upon him. All falseness, all lying, 
all cunning and treachery, arise from the fact that there 
are oppressors, and everyone who oppresses must expect 
such results. Only the coward is false. The courageous 
man lies not, nor is he false ; if not from virtue, at least 
from pride and strength of character. 

This is the position of the ordinary natural man. 
Ordinary, I say ; for the extraordinary man, whom nature 



2r4 THE SCIENCE OF ET/f/CS. 

lias specially favoured, ha« a powerful cliaractcr, alUioiirr'r. 
from a moral ])oiut of view he is no heUer. lie is ueiUier 
lazy, nor cowardly, nor falHe ; l»ut he train]»le.s overl>ear- 
in<j;ly upon everything around liim, and becomes master 
and subjugator of those who choose to l)e slaves. 

This descrij^tion may appear ugly and disgustiug. But 
let no one set up the customary groaning and ranting 
about the imperfection of human nature. Precisely the 
fact that these characteristics appear so disgusting to 
you, proves the nobility and suljlime character of 
humanity. Do you find it disgusting if the stronger 
animal devours the weaker, or if the weaker animal 
overpowers the stronger through cunning ? Doubtless 
not ; you find this to be all in order and proper. But 
not so in the case of man, and precisely because it is 
impossible for you to consider man as a mere product 
of nature. You are forced to regard man as a beins 
above all nature, as a free and supersensual being. The 
very fact that man is capable of vice shows that he is 
destined for virtue. IMoreover, what were virtue unless 
it were the actively acquired jiroduct of our own freedom, 
the elevating of oneself into an altogether different order 
of things ? 

Finally, who that has remarked the grounds we have 
shown up for these characteristics, can hold them valid 
only for the human race, as if only to the human 
race they were foreign, having been engrafted upon it 
through some hostile demon, and as if they were not 
rather valid for all finite, rational beings. For these 
characteristics are not grounded, as we have seen, in a 
peculiarity of our nature, but rather in the concejition 
of general finity itself. Let us ever so much try to 
conceive cherubim and seraphim ; we may certainly 
conceive them as differing from man in their more 
particular determinations, but not as so differing in their 
general characteristics. There is but One who is holy, 
and all created being ia by nature necessarily unholy 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 215 

and impure, and can elevate itself to morality only 
through its own freedom. 

But how is help to come to man, considering tliat tliis 
involved laziness cripples the only power tlirougli wliicli 
man can help himself ? What does he really lack ? Not 
the power, for this he has ; hut the consciousness thereof 
and the impulse to make use of it. This impulse cannot 
come to him internally, from the reasons stated aljove. 
If it is not to arise tlirougli a miracle, but naturally, it 
must cofiie externally. 

In this way it can come to him only through the 
understanding, and through the whole theoretical faculty, 
which certainly is capable of culture. The individual 
must learn to see himself in his contemptible nature, 
and to experience disgust with himself ; he must likewise 
be brought in contact with exemplary men, who would 
elevate him and teach him how he ouglit to be, and thus 
inspire him at the same time with a desire to become 
himself worthy of such esteem. There is no other way 
of culture. But this only furnishes what is lacking — 
consciousness and impulse. Improvement and elevation, 
however, depend upon our own freedom, and for the 
man who makes no use of this freedom there is no help. 

But whence are these external impulses to be brought 
amongst mankind ? Since it remains a possibility for 
each individual, in spite of his laziness, to elevate himself 
above it, we must assume, and very properly may assume, 
that amongst the whole mass of men some individuals 
have actually thus elevated themselves to morality. It 
will necessarily be the aim of such men to inÜuence their 
fellow-men, and to influence them in the described maimer. 

Now, something like this is positive religion; institu- 
tions arranged by pre-eminently good men, with a view- 
to cultivate the moral sensibility of others. Their age 
and general usefulness may, moreover, have invested 
these institutions with a peculiar authority, which may 
be very useful to those who need them, particularly in 



2i6 THE SCIENCE OE ET/ //CS. 

exciting their attention, but anything' else, such aa, 
for instance, faith in authority, or hhnd ohcdienco, tliosc 
institutions cannot have in view without making man- 
>^ kind utterly ininionil, as has been sliown above. 

It is very natural that those men from whose inner 
consciousness this moral sensibility (lcvelo])ed itself— as 
by a real miracle and without any external cause — not 
meeting with this same sensibility in tlieir fellow-men, 
should have interpreted it as having Ijcen efi'ected in 
them through an exterjial spiritual Ijeing; and if they 
meant their empirical Ego as signifying themselves, they 
doubtless were right. It is possible that this interpreta- 
tion has descended down unto our times. It is a 
theoretically true interpretation, if meant to indicate 
what we have just stated, and even, if not exactly so 
explained, is utterly without danger, 'provided it is Tiot 
made iise of to enforce blind obedience ; and each one may 
:^old whatsoever he chooses regarding this matter; 
practically it is of no significance to most men. 



BOOK FOURTH. 

CONCERNING THE MATERIAL CONDITIONS OF 
THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 

Preliminary. 

A. I HAVE cansality, signifies, as we know : That which I 
proposed to myself, as end, actually occurs. "We have 
seen, from the transcendental standpoint, that this agree- 
ment of perception with the will is, in its highest ground, 
nothing but an agreement of our empirical being, as 
determined through absolute spontaneity, with an original 
impulse. If I determine myself to do something which 
my original impulse actually demands, I, as the em- 
pirically-determined time -being, am being placed in 
harmony with my original self, as it exists without any 
consciousness of mine. Thus there arises in me a feeling, 
for I feel myself whole; and this feeling is a perception, 
as has been shown more at length above. 

Now the original impulse is directed upon manifold 
matters, for it has been given me for all eternity, and 
throughout all eternity my whole existence and ex- 
perience is nothing but an analysis of this, my original 
impulse. True, it can only be satisfied gradually, and 
by means of passing through various middle stages ; 
and even in those cases when it is satisfied, we can 
again, through free reflection, separate the object of the 
impulse into an infinite manifold. In other words : the 

2»7 



2l8 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

original impnlso cmvea at all tiniea a dctcrrninod onfl = X, 
an X (Ictermiiied thrnnj^di all that has passed before it, 
and through its own nature ; but nevertheless also an X, 
which, since it is a quantvvi, can again, through free 
reflection, be infinitely divided into a, h, c, and again 
into d, c, /, &c., &c. It is only thus that a manifold 
acting is possi1)le. I'ut since the wiiole X is possible — 
it being demanded by the original impulse.— all parts of 
it are likewise possible. In each case infinitely many 
actions are possible. But in order that something sliould 
occur, it is necessary not only that it be possible, but 
likewise, that I determine myself to do it. That which 
I do not will does not occur through my impulse, and 
only that amongst all possible acts, which I will, does 
occur. 

B. Let us linger over the conception of the manifold, 
which is possible as such; i.e., let us not look at the 
relation of these acts to each other, whether they exclude 
or include each other, &c., for this does not concern us as 
yet. Amongst this possible manifold, al^solutely only 
one (a determined part of the manifold) is conformable 
to duty, and all others are opposed to duty. (Let me 
observe here, moreover, that the command of duty 
always lies within the sphere of the possible, for it lies 
within the sphere of what the original impulse, upon 
which the moral law is based, demands. The impossible 
is never duty ; and duty is never impossible.) 

Now which then is this One, demanded through duty ? 
In the previous chapter we were referred for this one 
to an internal feeling, called conscience. Whatsoever 
conscience will confirm is always duty, and conscience 
can never err if we only attend to its voices. This, then, 
would be sufficient for our actual acting, and we need 
' nothing more to make it possible. The popular teacher, 
for instance, need not go any further, and can close his 
moral teachings at this point. 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 219 

But it is not suflicient for science. Eitlior wc must 
be able d jyriori to determine wliat conscience will confirm, 
or we must confess that a science of morality, as an 
applicable science, is impossil)le. 

Let us look at the matter from another side. Feeling 
decides. This decision, douljtless, ])ases itself on a 
law, grounded in reason, whicli certainly cannot be an 
object of consciousness on the standpoint of common 
understanding, since in consciousness it is only manifested 
as a feeling ; but which may, j^erliaps, l:»e dissevera])le from 
the transcendental point of view. Mere popular teaching 
remains in the standjioint of common consciousness, and 
hence everything which takes place on the transcendental 
standpoint does not occur for it, but philosophical teaching 
is philosophical or scientific only in so far as it rises 
beyond the former. 

Eeason is throughout determined. Hence whatsoever 
lives in reason, and as a consequence the whole system of 
conscience, which manifests itself in feelings, must also 
be determined. In the course of our investigation we 
shall find still other external grounds for tlie necessity 
of such a law, reason, upon which the feelings ff 
conscience are based. If we succeed in discovering this 
law, we shall have, at the same time, answered in advance 
of the immediate decision of conscience, the question : 
What is our duty ? 

C. We might give a preliminary answer which, although 
it is identical, and hence not decisive, may, nevertheless, 
be a guide to us in our investigation. 

Namely : the final end of the Moral Law is absolute 
independence and self-sufficiency, not merely so far as 
our will is concerned, for the will is always independent, 
but so far as our whole being is concerned. Now this 
end is unattainable ; true enough, but, at the same time, 
it can be steadily and uninterruptedly approached. 
Hence there must be possible from the first standpoint 



220 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

of every individual a steady and iinintennptcd series 
of acts, thronn;h which lie can ai)iiioacli that end. 
Conscience can always ajtjjrovc only tliose ac^ts wliich 
occur in this series. Let us figure this in the sha])e of 
a straiglit line. Only that which occurs as jwint in 
this line can he approved hy conscience, and nothing 
else. Hence our question may also l)e framed thus: 
What are the acts which occur in the descrihed series ? 

To promote insight into the general connection of our 
nietliod. Our investigation connects here ])reciHely with 
where we dropjied it, at the end of the Second Book, 
concerning the applicahility of the moral })rinci[»le. "We 
were nnahle to see, then, how it were possible ä priori 
to determine our duty, and had no other criterion tliuii 
the approval or disapproval of our conscience after the 
deed. We should always have been forced to run tlie 
risk, and could only have collected a few moral i)rinci]i]c8 
througli long exi)erieiice and after many mis-steps. Tlie 
moral law, as a law determining the acts, as an essentially 
practical law, would have been almost utterly done away 
with, and would have been changed into a mere regulative 
principle of judgment. We, then, in the first chapter 
of the Third Book found such a criterion, it is true, 
namely, the feeling of conscience, and thus we secured 
the practical applicability of the moral law. But although 
sufficient for acting in life, this was not suflicient for 
science. At present the question is, whether there is 
still a higher principle, if not in consciousness, at least 
in philosophy ; a highest uniting ground of these feelings 
of conscience. Our investigation has, therefore, evenly 
pursued its course, and we may hope that it will 
succeed in penetrating where hitherto we have been 
unable to pass. 

D. What then are in their substance these acts which 
lie in the series of approach to absolute self-determination? 
This is our present problem. We have already shown 



THE MORAL/TV OF OUR ACTIONS. 221 

ahove, tliat tliese acts are siicli, tlirongli which we treat 
ol)jects coiiforinal)ly to their ])urpo.se or end. We re- 
capitulate in a few words. It is only in consequence 
of a determined limitation of tlie impulse, and in order 
to explain this limitednesa, that a determined ol>ject 
is at all posited. If this impidse itself is })osited as 
impulse (as a yearning or desiring) and related to the 
oljject, then we have that which the Ego would like to 
produce in the oly'ect, or what it would like to use it 
for; in short, we have the originally determined, and by 
no means arbitrarily to be posited, final end and aim 
of such object. But, according to our al)Ove remark, 
every arbitrary purpose is also an original end and aim ; 
or clearer, I can, at least, execute no purpose which is 
not demanded by an original impulse. It is, however, 
quite well possible that 1 am conscious only of a part 
of my original impulse as directed upon an object ; 
in which case I also comprehend only part of the 
purpose of the object; but if I comprehend my whole 
impulse in its relation to an object, then I also com- 
prehend the whole purpose or the final end of such 
object. 

E. Let it be well considered what this may mean ; 
I am to comprehend the totality of my impulse. Every 
totality is completed, hence limited. Thus an original 
limitedness of the impulse is asserted. 

Let it be noted, however, that it is a limitedness of an 
imjndse and not of an actual causality (a power to 
realize) that we speak here. Thus the assertion signifies, 
that the impulse, as original impulse, cannot crave certain 
things at all. 

What sort of a limitedness might this be? By no 
means one of the impulse in its form, for as such it 
craves, as we know, absolute self-sufficiency. But this 
absolute self-sufficiency is an end which lies in an infinity 
and can never be attained, hence the impulse in itself 



222 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

cannot cease throuf^liout all infinity. Where then can the 
liniitedness be ? It must evidently be a material liniited- 
ness ; the impulse must not be able to crave certain things 
at all. 

Now this liniitedness is to be an original and necessary 
one ; hence grounded in reason itself, and by no means 
accidental and empirical. 

But there is no other limitedness of reason througli 
itself than the one which results from the identical 
proposition, that reason is to be reason, tliat the Ego is to 
be Ego. Thus it would seem that the original limited- 
ness of the impulse which is grounded in the Ego, is the 
limitedness which results from the Egohood itself; and 
the impulse is comprehended in its totality, wherever 
positively no limitedness thereof occurs beyond that 
which results from the Egohood itself. 

There can be no impulse in the Ego to cease to be Ego, 
or to become non-Ego ; for if there were, the impulse of 
the Ego would be to annihilate itself, which is con- 
tradictory. But again, every limitedness of the impulse, 
which does not result immediately from the Ego, is no 
original limitedness, but simply a limitedness which we 
have appended to ourselves through our imperfect re- 
flection. We have contented ourselves with so much less 
than we can demand. 

In short, the impulse, viewed in its totality, craves the 
absolute self-determination of an Ego as such. The con- 
ceptions of Egohood and of absolute self-determination 
are to be synthetically united, and through this synthesis 
we shall receive the material content of the moral law. 
I shall be a self-determined Ego ; this is my final 
end and aim : and whatsoever external things promote 
this my self-sufficiency, to that use I am to put them : 
such is their final end and aim. We have thus opened 
to us an even way into our investigation We have only 
to establish all the conditions of the Egohood as such, to 
relate them to the impulse of self-determination, and to 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 223 

determine this impulse thereby. When we have achieved 
this, we shall have exhausted the content of the moral 
law. 

We now proceed to do so. 

I. 

THE BODY AS CONDITION OF THE MORAL CAUSALITY 

OF THE EGO. 

The reflecting Ego must find itself as Ego ; must, as it 
were, be itself given to itself. In this respect we liave 
shown above, that it finds itself with an impulse, which 
impulse, precisely because it is only found as given, and 
evinces no self-activity in this finding, is posited as 
natural impulse. 

That which has been thus found, being the object of a 
reflection, is necessarily a private and limited quantum. 
If the natural impulse, which in itself is one, is separated 
through free reflection in the before-described manner, 
there arises a manifold of impulses, which, however, 
being finite, must necessarily be a closed system of 
manifold impulses. I cannot look upon these impulses 
or this impulse as something foreign, but must relate it to 
myself and place it as an accidence in the same substance, 
which freely thinks and wills. 

For although I must relate that impulse to myself, and 
posit it as my impulse, it yet, in a certain respect, remains 
objective to me, to me as the truly free and self-sufficient 
'Ego. There results from the impulse a mere yearning, 
which I can or can not satisfy, as I choose, which, there- 
fore, in so far as I am free, remains always outside of 
and under me ; in short, tliere results from it for me as 
intelligence, only the knowledge tliat this determined 
yearning is in me. As power, as motive, etc., it remains 
foreign to me. Now if I determine myself through 
freedom to satisfy this yearning, it becomes mine in quite 
another significance. It is now mine in so far as I am 



224 THE SCIENCE OE ET///CS. 

frco, and liavc ap])r()j)riatccl it tlirougli freedom ; it is 
a.sai<i;iied to inc not only idea/üer, throiigli theoretical 
cognition ; but realiter, through self-determination. Even 
on the standpoint of common consciousnesH I regard 
myself as double, get into dispute with myself, enter into 
judgment with myself, etc. 

In the latter case I posit myself, and am solely that 
as which I posit myself. This holds good to such an 
extent, that I do not truly appropriate as mine that 
which I find in me in the first-mentioned respect, but 
only that which I posit in me through self-determination. 
Even in common life we distinguish very clearly between 
that which belongs to our personality, and is not ours 
through our own freedom, as, for instance, birth, health, 
genius, etc., and that which we are through freedom; for 
instance, when tlie poet says : ycnits, et proavi, et quae 
non fecimus ipsi, vix ca NO.STRA puio. 

Now that, which the original impulse demands, is 
always, when I determine myself to do it through free- 
dom, to occur in experience. At present this case occurs. 
The natural impulse belougs to the original impulse. 
What will be the result, if I determine myself self- 
actively to satisfy it ? By answering this question we 
shall make clearer the distinction just drawn. 

The result of the natural impulse is a mere working of 
nature, the causality of which nature is precisely at an 
end in that impulse, whicli I posit as mine ; but the 
result of my self-determination is in truth my working, 
is grounded in me as a free being. It will occur in 
experience, signifies : I feel it as a tendency in nature to 
exercise causality upon herself. 

All my power and causality in nature is nothing but 
the causality of nature (in me) upon herself (outside of 
me). 

Now my nature stands under the control of freedom, 
and nothing can result through it without the direction 
of the latter. In the plant, the nature of the plant 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 225 

works immerliatnly upon itself; but in mo, nature can 
only affect herself by passing throu<^l\ the mediation of a 
voluntarily- produced conception. Previous to the self- 
determining, all that which, on the part of nature, is 
necessary to success lias been given, it is true; but nature 
in this region is not in itself suflicient to produce a 
causality. That which, on the part of the sulyect, is 
necessary to success has not been given previous to the 
self-determining. The act of self-determining supplies 
this, and now all that which is necessary for a causality is 
complete. Self-determination furnishes to the power of 
my nature the requisite principle, namely, the first motive 
power, which nature lacks, and thus it is that the doing 
of nature now becomes my doing, as actual Ego, which 
has made itself to be that which it is. 

This is the first and primary matter on which our 
argumentation is based. It will be necessary, however, 
to call attention to something else, which is already 
known and proven. In consequence of the reflection, all 
nature is posited necessarily as contained in and filling 
up space, hence, as matter. Now, since we have posited 
the system of our natural impulses as product and part 
of nature, we must necessarily posit it, likewise, as matter. 
It is thus that the system of our natural impulse becomes 
a material body. In this our body is contained, and con- 
centrates itself, that working of nature, which, however, 
has no causality in itself. But it has causality immedi- 
ately, in consequence of our will, and thus our will 
becomes immediate cause in our body. "We only need to 
will, and that which we will results in the body. The 
body is immediately completely in our power, and need 
not first be subjected to our will like all other external 
nature. Kature has placed the body alone in our power, 
without any free co-operation of our own. 

Our body has sensation, i.e., the natural impulse con- 
centrated in it is necessarily posited as ours and appro- 
priated by us, and we may satisfy, or not satisfy it, as we 
Q 



226 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

choose. From this alone ariHca, as we have sliown, tlio 
wliole system of our sensuous cognition. Again: tlio 
body is placed in motion immediately tluough the will, 
and has causality u])on nature. Sucli a body, precisely 
such a one, is condition of Egoiiood, since it results simply 
from self-reflection, which alone makes the Ego to be an 
Ego. 

We develop the further results. All possil^le acting is, in 
its substance, an acting demanded through the natural im- 
pulse. For all our acting occurs in nature, and is possible 
and becomes actual for us in nature, Ijut all external nature 
exists for us only in consequence of the natural impulse. 
The natural impulse appeals to me only through my 
body, and is realized in the world outside of me only 
through the causality of my body. The Itody is instru- 
ment of all our perceptions, and hence, since all cognition 
is based on perception, of all our cognition ; it is instru- 
ment, likewise, of all in causality. This relation is a 
condition of Egohood. The natural impulse is directed 
upon conservation, culture, and the general well-being or 
perfection of our body, as sure as it is an impulse and is 
directed upon itself, for this impulse is itself our body in 
its materialization. But the natural impulse goes no 
further, for nature cannot rise above itself. Nature's end 
is itself. Our nature has our nature for its final end and 
aim, but our nature is encircled in our body, and hence, 
our, as well as all, nature has only the body for its final 
end and aim. 

My highest impulse is to have al)solute self-dependence. 
This I can approach only through acting, but I can act 
only through my body. Hence, the satisfying of that 
impulse, or all morality, is conditioned through the pre- 
servation and highest perfection of the body. On the 
other hand, self-sufficiency, or morality, is to be the only 
consciously posited object, of my acting. Hence, I must 
subordinate the former end to the latter, must preserve 
and cultivate my body solely as tool for moral acting and 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 227 

not {IS end in itself. All care for my l)ody must be 
induced solely by the purpose to make it a proper tool for 
morality, and to preserve it as such. 

We thus receive here tliree material moral commands. 

1. The first one is negative in its character: our l)ody 
must never be located as end in itself, or must never 
become object of an enjoyment for the mere enjoyment's 
8ake. 

2. The second is a positive command: the body is to 
be cultivated as much as possible for all possible purposes 
of freedom. (To kill off sentiments and desires, or to dull 
our general powers, is absolutely against duty.) 

3. The third a limitative command : all enjoyment 
which may not, with clearest conviction, be related to the 
development of our body for moral aims, is not ])ermitted, 
and in violation of the moral law. It is absolutely im- 
moral to take care of our body without the conviction 
that it is thus cultured and preserved for moral activity, 
or, in short, for conscience' sake. Eat and drink for the 
glory of God. If anyone thinks this morality to be 
austere and painful, we cannot help him, for there is no 
other. 

By this established condition of Egohood the caus- 
ality of the Ego, which the moral law requires, is con- 
ditioned. We make this remark to show tlie progress 
of the method. It will ap])ear that tliere is a second 
condition of Egohood, namely, a condition of tlie 8uh- 
stantiality of the subject of morality ; and that there is a 
third condition, which requires a certain necessary reci- 
procity in this subject; and thus we shall complete tlie 
external proof that all the conditions of Egohood have 
been exhausted. The internal proof appears from the 
systematic connection of what is to be established. 



228 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

II. 

THE INTELLIGENCE AS CONDITION OF THE MORAL 
SUBSTANTIALITY OF THE EGO. 

The EfTO must find itself as Ego: sucli was tlio assertion, 
from which our last investigation took its staj-ting-point. 
The present one starts from tlie same statement, but with 
this distinction, that, whereas, in the former we con- 
sidered tlie passivity of the Ego in that reflection of itself, 
or the object of the reflection, we now view the activity 
of the Ego in it, or the subject of the reflection. An 
Ego must have a power of reflection, in order to 
reproduce the given internally through freedom in a 
conception. The activity of the Ego, in this respect, we 
have called ideal activity. It is at once clear that this 
activity is a condition of Egohood. The Ego is necessarily 
intelligence. 

How is the impulse to be self-determined, or the moral 
law related, to this condition of Egohood ? 

The moral law appeals to the intelligence as such. 
Consciously, and with mature reflection, am I to approach 
self-determination. A moral law exists only in so far 
as I am intelligence, in so far as I adopt it as my law, and 
make it the rule of my action. The intelligence, therefore, 
conditions the whole being, the substantiality, of the moral 
law ; and not merely, like the body, the causality thereof. 
Only when, and in so far as I am intelligence, is there 
a moral law: the latter extends no further than the former, 
and the former is the vehicle of the latter. Hence, 
a material subordination of the intelligence to the moral 
law (such as of the natural impulse to the moral law), 
is not possible. I must not wish not to know something, 
for fear it might be against my duty ; as I, certainly, must 
not give way to many inclinations or lusts of the body, 
from the same fear. 

Self-determiuedness (morality) is our highest purpose. 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 229 

Theoretical cognition is, tliereforc, to l)c formaliter 
Bubordinatcd to duty. That is to Ray, tlie linal cud 
and aim of all my cognition, of all my thinking and 
investigating, must l)e cognition of my dnty. 

From this result the following three moral laws: 

1. The first one, negative : Never subordinate your 
theoretical reason as such, but investigate with absolute 
freedom, and without regard to anything outside of your 
cognition. (Do not, in advance, resolve upon an end 
which you would like to arrive at in theory ; for where 
could you get this end ?) 

2. The second, positive : Cultivate your power of cogni- 
tion as much as you can ; learn, think, and investigate as 
much as you possibly can. 

3. The third, limitation : Eelate all your thinking 
formaliter to your duty. In all your thinking be clearly 
conscious of this purpose. Investigate from duty, and not 
from mere curiosity or in order to employ your mind. 
Do not regulate your thoughts so as to find this or that to 
be your duty — for how could you recognize your duty 
in advance of your cognition ? — but always merely with 
the view of recognizing what your duty is. 

III. 

INDIVIDUALITY AS CONDITION OF THE EGOHOOD. 

In our Science of Rights the proof has already been 
estalilished that the Ego can only posit itself as individual. 
Hence, the consciousness of individuality is a condition 
of Egohood. But, inasmuch as the science of morality 
is higher than any other particular philosophical science, 
we must here establish that proof from a higher 
principle. 

A. Whatsoever is object of a reflection is necessarily 
limited, and becomes limited by merely being such object. 
The Ego is to become object of a reflection. Hence, it is 



230 . THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

necessarily limited. Now, the Ego is cliaracteriTOd through 
a free activity as such, and hence, the free activity must 
also be limited. Free activity is limited signifies : a 
quantum, thereof, is opposited to free activity in general, 
and, in so far, to other free activity. In short, the Ego 
cannot, by any manner of means, ascribe free activity 
to itself without this free activity being a quantum, and 
hence, without, at the same time and immediately together 
with that thinking, positing another free activity which, 
in so far, does not belong to it. 

B. This would of itself lead to no result respecting 
individuality, since it is very possilile tliat the Ego may 
posit that free activity outside of its own, througli mere 
ideal activity, as a purely ^ossi6/e activity ; as, indeed, very 
often hajipens in actual consciousness. Whenever I ascribe 
an act to myself I thereby deny that act to all other free 
beings, which are, however, not determined, but merely 
possible free beings. 

C. But the following is decisive : Originally, I cannot 
determine myself through free ideal activity, but must 
find myself as determined object;- and, since I am Ego 
only in so far as I am free, I must find myself free, must 
be given to myself as free : curious as this may appear 
at first. For I can posit something as possible only in 
opposition to something already known to me as actual. 
All mere possibility is based upon abstraction from 
known actuality. All consciousness proceeds from an 
actuality — this is an important proposition of a real 
philosophy ; and hence, likewise, the consciousness of 
freedom. 

We add the following to promote insight into our 
method and conviction : I find myself as object, signified 
above ; I find myself as natural impulse, as product and 
part of nature. That I must reflect, or must be intelli- 
gence ill order to find this, is understood; but this 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 231 

reflection, when it occurs, docs not enter consciousness ; 
in fact, it does not enter consciousness at all without 
a new reflection directed ui)on it. Now I am to ascriljc 
that natural impulse to myself, nay, as we have seen in 
§ I., I am to posit it, as somethinf^ which, althouj^h it 
appertains to me, yet does not constitute essentially 
myself. Which, then, is this / to whom I am to ascribe 
tiie natural impulse ? The substantial, true Ego. Not 
the intelligence as such, as we have just shown, but 
rather the free, active Ego. As sure, therefore, as I am 
to find myself as natural product, I ' must also find 
myself as free active, for otherwise the first finding 
is not possible. The former is determined through the 
latter. I am to find myself generally, and hence I 
must also find myself as free active. What may this 
signify, and how is it possiljle ? 

Firstly, the real, true self-determination through 
spontaneity I cannot find as given to me ; I must give 
it to myself. I can, therefore, find a certain self- 
determination only through ideal activity ; througli 
reproducing one which exists already independently of 
me. But my self-determination exists without my 
co-operation signifies : it exists as a conception ; or, in 
short : an appeal is addressed to me to determine 
myself. As sure as I understand this appeal, I also 
think my self-deterjuination as something given in that 
appeal, and thus am given to myself as free in the 
conception of that appeal. 

As sure as I compreliend this appeal, I ascribe to 
myself a determined sphere for my freedom ; no matter 
whether I use and fill it up or not. If I do not com- 
prehend it, then there arises no consciousness ; I do not 
find myself as yet, but will find myself at another 
time perhaps, although all the conditions of my finding 
myself exist already. For since I am free, even the 
existence of all the conditions of my finding myself 
as free, cannot compel me thus to find myself in 



232 THE SCIENCE OE ETHICS. 

reflection ; to make this refiection alwolute spontaneity 
on my part is requisite. On the otiicr liand, unless 
all these conditions were ^'i^'cii, it could not make the 
reflection in spite of all spontaneity. 

D. This requirement, or ap])eal, addressed to me to lie 
self-active, I cannot comprehend without ascril>in;^ it 
to an actual being outside of me, which intended to 
communicate to me such a conception; and which is 
therefore capable of a conception of the conception. 
But such a being is a rational being, a being positing 
itself as Ego, hence an Ego. (This furnishes the only 
sufficient ground for concluding the existence of a 
rational cause outside of us; and such ground is not 
furnished merely by the comprehension of the influence 
exerted upon us, for that comprehension is always 
possible. [See Science of Rights.] It is a condition of 
self - consciousness, of Egohood, to assume an actual 
rational being outside of myself.) 

This rational being I opposit to «lyself, and myself 
to it ; that is to say, I posit myself as individual in 
relation to it, and it an individual in relation to me. 
Hence it is condition of Egohood to posit itself as 
individual. 

E. Hence it may be strictly ä priori proven that a 
rational being does not become rational in an isolated 
condition, but that at least one other individual outside 
of it must be assumed, through which it might elevate 
itself to freedom. But further influences, and more 
than one other individual, cannot be thus proven, as we 
shall soon see more closely. 

From what we have here deduced, however, there 
follows already a limitation of the impulse to be self- 
determined, and hence a further determination of 
morality, which we shall state at once. Xamely, my 
Egohood and self-sufficiency generally is conditioned 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 233 

through tlie freedom of the otlicr individual; hence my 
craving after self •determination camiot i)08silily liave for 
its ol)ject to annihilate the condition of its ovm possi- 
hility ; namely, the freedom of tlie otlier. Xow [ am 
ahsolutely only to act in obedience to this impulse of 
self-determination, and in ol)cdience to no other impulse. 
Hence the present limitation of this impulse involves 
the absolute proliibition to disturb the freedom of the 
other; and the al)solute command to consider the other 
as self-sufficient, and never to use him as means. (The 
natural impulse was subordinated to the self-determining 
impulse. The theoretical power is not subordinated to 
it matcrialiter ; but neither is it to the theoretical power. 
But it is subordinate to the freedom of the other. I 
must not be self-determined at the expense of the 
freedom of others.) 

F. Through my positing even but this one otlier indi- 
vidual outside of me, some of all my possible free acts 
have become impossible for me ; namely, all those which 
condition the freedom ascribed by me to the other. 
But even in the progress of acting I must always 
choose some from all that which is possiljle to me, 
in consequence of my freedom. Now, according to 
our presupposition, that wliich I do not clioose, 
which my freedom excludes from my actions, is taken 
possession of not through actual, but at least through 
possible, individuals ; and under this presupposition I 
determine my individuality still further through each 
act. 

(An important conception, concerning which I explain 
myself still clearer, since it removes a very great diffi- 
culty in the doctrine of freedom.) 

Who am I, in truth ? That is to say, what individual 
am I ? And what is the ground, why I am Üiis indi- 
vidual and none other ? I reply : From the moment that 
I have arrived at consciousness / am that individual 



234 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

VJhich I make myself to he with freedom, and I am it 
because 1 make myself it. 

At each luonient of iny existence my being is — if not 
in its conditions, at least in its final determination — a 
being through freedom. Through this being again is 
limited the possibility of my being in the future moment 
(that is to say, being such in the present moment, I 
cannot be certain things in tlie future moment) ; but 
which amongst all still iiossihle things in the future I 
choose to be, depends again upon my freedom. Jiut all 
this determines my individuality; all this makes me 
materialitcr the one who I am. 

But it is only under the present presupposition that 
there is only one individual outside of me, and that only 
one free influence is directed upon me, that tlie ßist 
condition, which might be called the root of my indi- 
viduality, is not determined through my freedom, but 
through my connection with another rational being ; 
whereas all following conditions depend al^solutely upon 
my freedom. In each future moment I must select 
amongst many acts, but there is no external ground 
why I should not select every other amongst all possible 
acts. 

G. But there may be many individuals outside of me 
that influence me. A priori, as we have seen, we cannot 
prove that this must be so ; but we, at least, owe the proof 
that it can be so. 

The essence of freedom itself compels me, as we have 
seen, to limit myself in each free act, and hence to leave 
to other possible free beings the possibility also to act 
free. Nothing prevents these free beings from actually 
existing. They can exist, so it appears at least at present, 
without detriment to my freedom, which must, as we 
have seen, be anyhow limited. 

But can they have actual existence for me, i.e., can 
1 perceive them as actually existing, and how ? This 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 235 

question might be easily answered, according to tlie 
above principles, as follows: tliey can intlucnce nie as 
free beings iniluence free beings, by rcrpiiring me to be 
freely active. 

]iut it is not at all necessary that they should im- 
mediately influence me. Tliey may merely iniluence 
nature, and yet I will bo able to conclude from the 
manner of the influence as to the existence of a rational 
being, now that I have the conception of actual rational 
beings outside of inc. Originally this conclusion would 
have been im})Ossible for me. The mode of influencing 
nature here mentioned, is that mode through which a 
work of art is produced. Such a work evinces a con- 
ception of a conception, which we have shown to be 
the criterion of reason. For the end and aim of the 
product of art lies not, as in the product of nature, in 
itself, but outside of itself. It is always tool, or means 
for an end. Its conception is something which is not 
involved in the mere contemplation, but can only be 
thought : hence a mere conception. But whosoever 
produced the work of art, necessarily thought the con- 
ception he intended to represent; hence he had necessarily 
a conception of a conception. As sure as I recognize 
something to be a product of art, I necessarily posit an 
actually existing rational being as its originator. It is 
not thus with a product of nature. True, there is a 
conception ; but you cannot show up a conception of a 
conception, unless, perhaps, you presuppose it in a world 
creator. 

I have said "as sure as I recognize it as a product 
of art." But this itself is only possible on condition 
that I think already a reason outside of me ; and this 
latter assumption does not proceed from the perception 
of product of art — which would be a circle of explanation 
— but from the above described requirement or appeal 
to free activity. 

It ia thus on the standpoint of common consciousness, 



236 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

upon which perception in us is explained through the 
existence of things outside of us. IJut that which is 
assumed on tlie standpoint of common consciousness 
nmst itself he explained from the transcendoital j^oint 
of view; on which it is not permitted to proceed from 
the assumption of anything external, hut on wliich that 
which is said to he external to us nmst first he explained 
from something in ourselves. Hence the higher question 
is to be answered : how do we come to assume products 
of art outside of us ? 

Whatsoever is held to be outside of us, is posited 
through a limitation of the impulse. It is the same with 
the art-product, in so far as it is object. Jjut whence 
comes the particular determination of it, tiiat it is posited 
as art-product ? This leads us to infer a special, peculiar 
limitation of the impulse. Let me say it concisely ; 
through^ the object in general our being is limited; or 
better : from the limitation of our hdng we assume an 
object in general ; Ijut the impulse may desire a modi- 
fication of the object. In the present instance, however, 
there is not merely a limitation of our hcing, but also 
of our becoming ; we feel our acting repelled internally ; 
there is even a limitation of our desire to act, and hence 
we assume freedom outside of us. (Mr. Schelling ex- 
presses this excellently in the Philosophical Journal, 
vol. iv. page 281 : " Wherever my moral power finds 
resistance, there cannot be mere nature. Shudderingly 
I stop. ' Here is nian ! ' speaks a voice to me. I mud 
not go further.") 

This can happen, as we have seen. If it does happen, 
I am still further limited than through mere Egohood ; 
for it was not involved in the conception of Egohood, 
as we have seen. If it does happen, I am no longer a 
mere rational being in general, which I could be if there 
existed only one other individual outside of me, and if he 
had only uttered himself 07icc ii^ relation to me ; but I am 
a particular rational being. It is this particular limited- 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 237 

ness which cannot be d priori deduced from the general 
liniitedness, since in that case it were not a particular 
one. Upon it is based the purely empirical, which in 
its possibility, however, must also be grounded ä priori. 
Nevertheless this liniitedness is an original one. Let it 
not be supposed, therefore, that it originates in time. 
How, nevertheless, in a certain respect, it does arise in 
time, we shall immediately see. 

The result of the above proposition is this: Individuality 
may also in its progress be dctennined through something 
else than freedom, namely, tlirough original limitedness, 
which, however, cannot be deduced, but being a particular 
limitedness is in this respect accidental for us on the 
standpoint of experience. 

It truty be thus : With this, philosophy must content 
itself; and in treating a science which is influenced by 
this presupposition, pliilosophy must always establish 
the results derived from it as conditioned propositions. 
Such a science is the science of morality, and hence the 
material part of this science contains something con- 
ditioned. If we give up our claim to pure philosophy, 
and place ourselves on the standpoint of facts, we can, 
of course, say : it is so. For instance, I can and must 
not be and become everything, since there are others wlio 
are also free. But on the standpoint of pure j)hilosophy, 
this and others always remain conditioned propositions. 

Originally I am limited not merely formaliter through 
the Egohood, but likewise Tnatcrialiter through something 
which does not necessarily belong to Egohood. There 
are certain points beyond which I am not to go even 
with my freedom, and this non-shalling evinces itself in 
me immediately. I explain these points to me through 
the existence of other free beings and their free effects 
in my sensuous world. 



^38 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

H. But this tlieory seems to have enveloped us in a 
contradiction, and led us to very dangerous results. [ 
will enter upon their discussion, partly to ]^roniole 
clearness, and partly because it decides a difiirult i»hiIo- 
sophical dispute, and places the doctrine of freedom, 
which is all-important in a science of morality, in the 
complete light. 

The free acts of otliera are originally to lie within me 
as the limitative points of my individuality. ' They are, 
therefore, to make use of this popular ex]>rcHsion, pre- 
destined from all eternity, and are not determined in time. 
But docs not this cancel my freedom ? By no means, if 
it is not at the same time predestined how I sliall react 
upon those free acts ; and the freedom of choice amongst 
all possible acts remains always mine, as we have fully 
established. But let us rise to a higher point. The other 
beings in the sensuous \v6rld, upon whom / act, are also 
rational beings, and the perception of my influence uj)on 
tiiem is predestined for ihcm, as for vie tlie perception of 
their influence upon me is predestined. For me, my acts 
are not predetermined, I perceiving them as the result 
of my absolute self-determination, but for all others, who 
live together with me, they are predetermined, and, in 
like manner, do their acts appear to them self-determined, 
and to me predetermined. Hence, my free actions are 
certainly predestined. But how can freedom co- exist 
with this ? 

The matter stands thus: predetermination cannot be 
dropped, for if we drop it, the reciprocal relation of 
rational beings, and hence, those rational beings them- 
selves, remain inexplicable ; but neither can we abandon 
freedom, for if we do, free or rational beings cease 
to be. 

The solution is not difHcult. For me (I shall say so at 
present, in order to be but able to express myself, althougli 
an important remark will have to be made respecting it), 
fur me, all the influences of free beings are a priori deter- 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 239 

mined. But let lis recollect what a priori signifies. 
Ä 2)i'iori is no time and no succession, no one after another, 
but everything simultaneously (an improper but necessary 
expression). Hence, it is not at all determined liow I 
cause the events to follow eacli other in time, how I 
connect this scries with that otiier determined individual 
series, e^c. What I am to experience in my life is 
determined, but not from whom. The others outside of 
me remain free. 

In the same ]nanncr, it is certainly determined for 
others what infhienccs of other free beings are to be 
directed upo» them, and hence, likewise, those inÜuences 
which / have exerted upon them were predetermined; 
but it was not predestined, by any means, that /, the 
individual which had these and those original determina- 
tions, should exercise these influences. If another one 
exerted them before I did, I did not exert them, and if 
I did not exert them, perhaps another one exerted them 
after me, or if they exerted it in their own freedom, 
to be that which I am, no one exerted such influence 
upon them. Who am I then, after all ? We repeat 
again : I am only that which I make myself to be. I 
have now acted so or so far, and hence, I am the in- 
dividual to whom appertain the acts a, h, c, «fee. From 
c, again, an infinity of predestined acts stretch out before 
me, from which I can choose. The possibility and reality 
of all these acts is predestined, but, by no means, tliat 
precisely the one which I now choose should follow the 
series a, h, c, which constitutes now my individuality, 
and so on ad infinitum. There are first determined 
points of individuality, and from each of these there 
stretch out an infinity, and it depends altogether upon its 
own freedom which of all the still possible individuals it 
becomes. 

My assertion, therefore, is this : all free acts are pre- 
destined from all eternity, i.e., outside of all time, through 
reason, and each free individual is placed in harmony with 



240 THE SCIENCE OE ETHICS. 

these acts in rcspoct to pcrccptioTi. For tlio totality of 
reason there extends an infinite manifold of freedom and 
jwrception, and all individuals shaie in it, as it were. 
]5ut the succession and content of time is not predestined, 
from the .suflicient reason that time is not somethin;^ 
eternal and pure, Imt merely a form of the contemjdation 
of finite beings, namely, the time in which sometliing is 
to occur; neither are the actors predestined. And thus, 
by a little attention, the apparently unanswerable question 
has dissolved of its own accord : predetermination and 
freedom are completely united. 

The difficulties which might still seem to linger here 
.are based on the fundamental defect of dogmatism, which 
makes all being primary and original, and hence, sepa- 
rates being and acting — if it does recognize acting at all 
— altogether from each other, giving to an individual his 
whole being independently of his acting. By this pro- 
cedure, if one thinks determinedly enough, all freedom 
and all real acthig are certainly cancelled. Xo man in 
the world can act otherwise than he does act, altliough, 
perhaps, he acts badly, being the man he is. There is 
nothing truer than this proposition, which is, in fact, 
merely an identical proposition. But he ought not to be 
this man, and could be quite, another man; nay, iherb 
ought not to he such a man in the world at all. 

Nevertheless, it is said : that a person is such a 
person as it is even before it is born, that its relations 
and fate, from the day of its birth to its death, are pre- 
destined, only not its actions. But what is our fate, and 
what are our relations in life, otherwise than the objective 
view of our acting ? If our actions depend upon our 
freedom, surely so does our fate. I am only what I act. 
Now, if I think myself in time, I am, in a certain 
respect, not determined until I have acted in this respect. 
True, he who cannot cure himself of the fundamental 
evil of dogmatism cannot see into the theory of freedom. 



CHAPTEU III. 

AfiSOLUTE HARMONY OF ALL RATIONAL BEINGS AS 
. . CONDITION OF MORALITY. 



Self-sufficiency, our final end and aim, consists, as we 
have often said, in this, that everything is dependent upon 
me, and I not dependent upon anything; that in my 
whole sensuous world that which I will happens simply 
because I will it, precisely as is the case in my body, 
the beginning point of my absolute causality. The world 
must become for me, what my body is. True, this object 
is unattainable, but I shall always endeavour to approach 
it, and hence shall always treat everything in the 
sensuous world, so as to make it a means for this final end 
and aim. This approaching is my real end. 

It is no hindrance to my freedom, that I was set down 
upon a certain point by nature, and that nature thus, as it 
were, took the first step for me on this my way into 
infinity. Nor does it interfere with my freedom, that 
at the very commencement there was given to me a 
sphere for my possible path of freedom through anotlier 
rational being outside of me ; for only thus do I attain 
freedom, and before I have freedom my freedom cannot 
be interfered with. Nor does it hinder luy freedom, if 
I am forced to assume still other free and rational beings 
outside of me, for their freedom and rationality, as such, 
is not an oliject of perception, which miglit limit me, l)ut 
is altogether a spiritual conception. Finally it is no 
li '24t 



242 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

curtailing of my freedom, if I miiHt ehoosc amongst 
many possible acts ; for such a choice is tlie condition of 
the consciousness of my freedom, and hence Conditions 
that freedom itself. Moreover, the matter of the choice 
is always under my control, because all possible free 
modes of acting are under my control ; and even if other 
free beings should then choose amongst those possible 
acts which I did not choose, this would not limit my self- 
sufficiency. They would not limit me, therel)y, but 7 
them. 

If, however, in accordance with our last presupposition, 
and with general experience, that which falls within 
my path and into the world of my experience should 
already be modified through free beings outside of me; in 
that case my freedom is certainly checked, if I may 
no longer modify this object myself according to my pur- 
pose ; and we have seen that the moral law absolutely 
forbids my doing so. I am not to disturb the freedom of 
rational beings. But if I change the products of their 
freedom I disturb their freedom itself ; for those products 
are to them means for other purposes, and if I take away 
from them these means they cannot continue their 
causality in accordance with their first pur^^ose. 

Here we therefore seem to have hit upon a contradiction 
of the impulse of self-determination, and hence of the 
moral law with itself. The moral law requires (i) that I 
should subject whatsoever limits ; or, which is the same, 
whatsoever lies in my sensual world, to my absolute 
end and aim ; that I should make it a means to draw 
nearer to absolute self-sufficiency. 

(2) That I should not subject certain things, which 
limit me, or which are in my sensuous world, to my 
absolute end-purpose, but should leave them as I find 
them. 

Both are immediate commands of the moral law ; 
the first, when we consider this law generally ; and the 
second, when we consider it in a particular manifestation. 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 243 

II. 

The contradiction can be solved, and tlic liarniony 
of tlie moral law with itself can be restored only, if 
we presuppose that all free beings have nccessarili/ the 
same final end and aim. If this is so, then the end of the 
one individual is at the same time the end of the other ; 
and the liberation of one from dependence the liberation 
of all others. Is this so ? Since everything — parti- 
cularly everything to us, namely, the peculiar char- 
acteristic of our science of morality — depends upon 
the answering of this question, we shall discuss it more 
thoroughly. 

The impulse to be self-sufficient is an impulse of 
Egohood, and has only Egohood for its end; the Ego alone 
is to be the subject of self-sufficiency. Now it is certainly, 
as we have seen, involved in Egohood, that each Ego 
should be an individual, but only an individual in general, 
and not this particular individual A, B, C, &c. Since all 
the determinations, except the original and first one of 
our individuality, depend upon our freedom, as we have 
seen that A, B, &c., can only signify to me the original 
limitation of freedom ; or, what we have called above, the 
root of all individuality. Hence since it is accidental 
to the Egohood in general, that 7, the individual A, am 
precisely this A, and since the impulse of self-sufficiency 
is to be an impulse of the Egohood in general, as such, 
this impulse certainly does not crave the self-sufficiency 
of the particular individual A, but of reason in general. 
The self-sufficiency of reason as such, is our ultimate 
purpose ; and hence not the self-sufficiency of our reason, 
in so far as it is an individual reason. 

But I, this A, am so far as I am concerned, only in 
80 far as I am A. Hence A is my empirical self; and 
only it becomes conscious of that impulse and that law of 
consciousness. Only through A can I work in obedience 
to the moral law, since I can only work through A at all. 



244 ■ TIfP- SCIENCE OE ETHICS. 

A is for me, the exclusive condition of the causality 
of this moral impulse. In one word, A is not ohj^d, but 
A is for me the only tool and vcldch of the moral law. 
At first only the hody was such tool, hut now it is 
the ivhoU sensuous empirically determined man ; and tlius 
we have here for once separated the empirical and the 
pure Ego in the strictest manner, which is very important 
for alf philosophy, and particularly for the science of 

morals. ■, ^t 

If the impulse of self-sufficiency craves the sclt- 
sufficiency of reason in general, and if this self- 
sufficiency can only be represented in the individuals 
A, B, C, &c., and through them; then it is necessarily 
altogether indifferent to me, whether A, or B, or C 
represents it; for, since all belong equally to the one 
undivided empire of reason, it is always reason in general 
which is represented, and hence my impulse is always 
satisfied. I desire morality in general ivithin or outside 
of me ; this is all the same. I desire it of myself only, 
in so far as it appertains to me and of others in so far 
as it belongs to them ; my end is attained equally in the 
one or the otlier manner. 

My end is attained, if the other acts morally. But he 
is free, and through freedom may also act immorally. In 
the latter case my end is not attained. Have I not then 
the right and the obligation to destroy the effect of his 
freedom? I do not appeal to the above negative pro- 
position, but deduce it here anew and thoroughly, since 
this is the proper place for doing so. Eeason is to be 
self-sufficient, but reason appeals with this demand to 
the determined individual B, C, &c., and there is no such 
demand at all. nor any (material) self-sufficiency m fact, 
except by means of the formal freedom of all mdividuals. 
Hence the latter is exclusive condition of all causality of 
reason in general. If it is cancelled, all causality, and 
hence also the causality to be self-sufficient, is canceUed. 
Hence everyone who wills the latter must also wül the 



THE MORA LIT Y OF OUR ACTIONS. 245 

former. Freedom is absolute condition of all morality, 
and without it no morality is at all possiljle. Tlius the 
altsolute prohibition of the moral law becomes confirmed, 
tiiat the freedom of the free being must under no con- 
dition, and under no pretext, be disturbed or cancelled. 
But tins leaves the contradiction unsolved, and we can 
say also •■ 1 desire, and can only desire, that the other 
should be free, on condition that he uses his freedom to 
promote the end of reason, and otherwise I cannot desire 
him free at all. In other words, while the freedom of 
tile other must on no account be disturbed, I must 
absolutely desire to cancel any use made of freedom 
to cancel the moral law, and unless I do so desire, the 
wish that the moral law should reign supreme, is not 
controlling me. 

Here likewise there arises the further question : What 
exercise of freedom is in violation of the moral law, and 
who can be the universally valid judge thereof ? If the, 
other asserts that he has acted in accordance with his 
best conviction, whilst / act under the same circumstances 
differently, he is as convinced that / act immorally, as I 
am convinced that he acts immorally. Whose conviction 
is now to be the rule ? Neither, so long as both are in 
dispute, for each is to act solely according to his con- 
viction, and therein consists the formal condition of all 
morality. Can we then separate, and allow each the 
other to pursue his own course ? Absolutely not, unless 
we criminally renounce all our interest for universal 
morality and the supreme rule of reason. Hence we must 
endeavour to make our judgment agree. Of course, so 
iOng as each one acts at all conscientiously, each one will 
presuppose that his own opinion is the correct one, for 
otherwise he must have acted immorally in following it, 
and hence each one will endeavour to convince the other, 
and not to be convinced by the other. But in doing this, 
since all reason is the same, they must finally after all 
'arrive at the same result; and until then it is the 



246 THE SCIENCE OE ETHICS. 

absolute duty of each to respect the eternal freedom of 
the other. Plich can and must only desire to deter- 
mine the conviction of the otlier, hut not to physically 
influence him. The first modo is the only permitted way 
by which free beings may exercise compulsion upon free 
beings. 

We shall examine this matter more carefully. 



III. 

A. The final moral end of each rational being is, as we 
have seen, the self-sufhciency of reason in general, and 
hence the morality of all rational beings. We must all 
act in the same manner. Hence Kant's proposition: 
" Act in such a manner, that the maxim of your will can 
be thought by you as the principle of a universal legis- 
lation." Still the following is to be observed in regard 
to Kant's standpoint: Kant speaks only of the idea of 
a harmony, but not of a real, actual harmony. We shall 
show, on our part, that this idea has real use, tliat we 
must try to realize it, and must in part act as if it were 
realized. Moreover, in Kant's shape, the proposition is 
merely heuristic, i.e., I can use it very well for the 
purpose of examining whether I have erred in judging 
my duty; but on no account is it constitutive. It is, in 
fact, not a principle which Kant enunciates, but merely 
the result of a true principle, namely, of the absolute 
self-sufficiency of reason. The inference does not stand 
in Kant: because something can be principle of a universal 
legislation, therefore it ought to be maxim of my will ; 
but the very contrary, namely, because something is to 
be a maxim of my will, therefore it can also be the 
principle of a universal legislation. The judgment proceeds 
from me, as is indeed clear in Kant's proposition ; for who 
judges whether something can be principle of a universal 
legislation? Doubtless I myself. But according to what 
principles do I form this judgment ? Undoubtedly accord- 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 247 

ing to those which my own reason holds. Kant's pro- 
position lias, however, a heuristic use, namely, a 
proposition, which results in an al)sur(lity, is false. Now 
it is absurd that I, X, ought to do tliat, wliicli I cannot 
think that all others ought likewise to do under the 
same circumstances ; and hence, if I cannot think this, I, 
X, ought certainly not to do it either, and have most 
certainly made a mistake in concluding that I ought to 
do it. 

B. Each one is to produce absolute harmony witli him- 
self in all others outside of him, for only on condition 
of this harmony is he himself free and independent. 
First of all, therefore, each one shall live in a community, 
for otherwise he cannot produce harmony with himself, 
as is absolutely commanded. Whosoever separates him- 
self from mankind, renounces his final end and aim, and 
liolds the extension of morality to be utterly indifferent. 
Whosoever wants to take care only of himself, even in a 
moral respect, docs not even take care of himself, for his 
end ought to be to take care of all mankind. His virtue 
is no virtue, but only perhaps a slavish merit-seeking 
egotism. It is not made our duty to seek or create our- 
selves society ; he, who was born in a desert, might 
perhaps remain there; but everyone who becomes ac- 
quainted with others is, through that very acquaintance, 
morally obliged to take care of them also. He becomes 
our neiglibour, and belongs to our world of reason, as the 
objects of our experience belong to our world of sense. 
Without becoming unconscientious we cannot abandon 
him. This does away at once with the opinion, whicli 
manifests itself amongst us yet in various ways, that the 
life of a recluse, a living apart from men, and indulgence 
in mere sublime thoughts and speculation, is enough for 
the requirement of duty, nay, is a more meritorious 
fulfilling of one's duty. Such conduct by no means 
satisfies duty. It is only through acting, and not through 



248 TtlE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

speculating, only through acting iu and for society, that 
we fulfil duty. 

It likewise follows, that each one will only aim to 
convince the other, and not to allow liiniKclf to be 
convinced. This is in the nature of the case. He 
must be certain in himself, .or he would be uncon- 
scientious in not only acting himself according to his 
uncertain principles, but also trying to persuade others 
to do so. 

C. This final end and aim is not the exclusive charac- 
teristic of an individual, but is common to all. Each 
one shall have this same end, and it is the duty of each, 
as sure as he desires to promote universal moral culture, 
to induce each other one to make this his end. Tliis 
unites men; each only tries to convince the otlier of liis 
opinion, and yet becomes himself, peiliaps, convinced 
in this dispute. Each one must be ready to open himself 
to this reciprocal influence. Whosoever flies from it, 
perhaps lest he should be disturbed in his belief, betrays 
a want of self-conviction, which ought absolutely to 
have no existence; and which makes it, therefore, all 
the more his duty to enter into such discussion in order 
to attain this conviction. 

This reciprocity amongst all rational beings for the 
purpose of producing common practical convictions, is 
only possible in so far as all start from connnon principles, 
such as necessarily exist in order to connect their further 
convictions to these principles. Such a reciprocity, which 
each one is bound to enter, is called a Church, an ethical 
commonwealth; and that about which they all agree, 
is called their symlol. Each one ought to be member 
of the Church. But the symhol must, unless the Church 
community is to be utterly fruitless, be constantly 
changed; for that, concerning which all agree, will 
necessarily increase as the minds continue to influence 
each other more and more. (The symbols of some 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 249 

Churches seem rather to contain that, concerning 
wliich all are at variance, and what not a single one 
believes in his heart, because not a single one can even 
think it.) 

D, The agreeing of all in the same practical convic- 
tions, and the uniformity of action resulting tlicrefrom, 
is therefore the necessary end of all virtuous men. 

We shall closely examine this important point, which 
is characteristic of our science, and which is doubtless 
exposed to many doubts. 

The Moral Law in me, as individual, has not me alone, 
but tmivcrsal reason for its object. It has me for its 
object solely in so far as I am one of the tools of its 
realization in the sensuous world. Hence all tliat it 
requires of me, as individual, and for which it holds 
me responsible, is that I shall become a fit tool. Con- 
cerning this culture of myself I am, therefore, referred 
solely to my own private convictions, and not to the 
common conviction. As individual, and as tool in 
relation to the Moral Law, I am possessed of a body 
and of understanding, I alone am responsible for their 
culture. The development of my understanding depends 
altogether upon my own conviction. I have absolute 
freedom of thinking. I must not deem it unconscientious, 
nor must the Church tell me it is unconscientious, to doubt 
everything, however holy it may appear, and to investi- 
gate it further. This investigation is absolute duty ; and 
it is a violation of duty to leave matters of tliis kind 
undecided. In regard to my body, I have absolute 
freedom to nourish, cultivate, and take care of it, as 
I may hope, according to my conviction, best to preserve 
it, keep it healthy, and make it a useful and good tool. 
It is not duty to act in this matter as others do; nay, 
it is immoral to let the preservation of my body depend 
upon the opinions of others without conviction of my 
own. 



2 so THE SCIENCE OE ETI f /CS. 

That wliicli is oulHido of my l)ody, and lioncc tlie 
wliolo ficnsuons world, in coiinnoii to all laiional iRMiigH, 
and the cultivation thereof accordinp; to th*; dictates 
of reason, is not only assigned to nie, l)nt to (dl lational 
beings. I am not alone responsible for it, and in taking 
part in this cultivation must not proceed according 
to my private conviction, for I cannot inihience this 
sensuous world without influencing other rational beings, 
and hence without infringing upon their freedom, if 
my influence does not suit their own will. That, which 
affects all, I positively must not do without tlie consent 
of all, and hence in accordance with principles which 
all have approved, and which arc conformal)le to their 
common conviction. But from- this it would seem to 
follow, that if such a common conviction and harmony 
of all, concerning the manner in which each may influence 
the sensuous world, is impossible, all acting is impossible, 
which is contradictory to the Moral Law. Still it is 
also against that Law to act otlierwise than according 
to such universal harmony. Hence it must be an 
absolute command of Clie Moral Law to produce such 
a harmony. This agreement of all men, as to how each 
one may influence the other, that is to say, the agreement 
of all concerning their common rights in the sensuous 
world, is called the State, Constitution, and the commvinity 
of men which have established such an agreement, is 
called the State. It is absolute moral duty to unite 
with others into a State. Wliosoever refuses to do so, 
is not to be tolerated at all in society, because no one 
can conscientiously enter into relation with him; he 
having refused to declare his will and his rights, is 
thus always exposing others to the risk of treating him 
against his will and his rights. 

Since men, therefore, cannot act before a State is 
erected, and it, nevertheless, being diflicult to obtain 
the express agreement of all, or of only a considerable 
portion, to a constitution ; the more cultured man is 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 251 

forced to take the silence of otliers to certain measures, 
and their suhniission to the same, for acquiescence. Nay. 
tliere will })robalily be at first many imperfections in tlie 
distribution of riglits, since some will not give their 
consent to a system of order \iidess they oljtain great 
advantages, while others will submit to all. In this 
manner arises, and has arisen, the compulsory need- 
state as the first condition of gradual progress to a 
legal and rational state. It is duty to submit un- 
conditionally to the laws of one's State, for these laws 
contain the presumptive common will, in violation of 
which no one has a right to influence the other. Each 
one attains moral permission to influence others only 
through their consent as expressed in the laws of a State. 

It is immoral to overthrow the State unless I am firmly 
convinced that the whole people desires such an over- 
throw, which can only be the case under circumstances 
we shall hereafter develop ; immoral to do so, even if I am 
convinced of the illegality and irrationality of the greatest 
number of its institutions, for in this matter I do not 
influence myself alone, but the whole commonwealth. 
My conviction, concerning the illegality of the constitu- 
tion, is, perhaps, very correct in itself, i.e., for pure reason, 
if we could obtain her in visible shape. Nevertheless, 
it is only my private conviction, but I must not act in 
matters relating to the whole commonwealth, according 
to my private conviction, as has been shown above. 

There is a contradiction here. I am inwardly convinced 
that the constitution is a violation of right and justice, 
and yet I help to maintain it, if only by my acquiescence. 
Nay, perhaps I even hold an office under this unrighteous 
constitution. Ought I not, at least, to resign the latter ? 
On the contrary, I ought to hold it and must not with- 
draw from the State, for it is better that the wise and 
just should govern than the unwise and unjust. "What 
Plato says about it is not correct; nay, contradictory. 
I am not allowed to withdraw from my country. Some 



2J2 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

one says: "But I, at least, will commit no injustice!" 
But this is a selfish spirit. Will you then let others 
commit it? If you see that wrong-doings occur, you 
ought to prevent them. 

" But in that case I act against my letter conviction." 
But is it not likewise your correct and moral conviction 
that in matters of common concern you should act only in 
conformity to the common will ? Hence, it is no injustice 
at all to treat another as he has expressed his will 
to be treated in the law; and you only act according 
to your conviction, if you so treat him. You ask how 
may this contradiction be reconciled? Easily enough, if we 
will only look at the different kinds of conviction spoken 
of in both cases. You speak of the conviction of what 
shall he, of a condition to be produced ; whereas I speak 
of the conviction of an actuality to which I belong myself 
as member of the State. Both must be united, and can 
easily be united. I must regard the present condition 
of our need-state as a means to produce the rational state, 
and must always act only with this view. I must not 
take my measures so as to let things remain as they 
are, but rather so as to let them get better. An acting in 
the State, which has not this object in view, may be 
materialitcr legal enough, namely, in so far as it neverthe- 
less promotes that object ; but formaliter it is immoral. 
But an acting, which has the opposite object in view, 
is certainly both materialitcr and formaliter, evil and 
unconscientious. If some men have, for a certain lencrth 
of time, acted in accordance with these principles, it 
may well happen that the common will becomes utterly 
opposed to the government of the State, and whenever 
this takes place, the longer continuation of that govern- 
ment becomes illegal tyranny and oppression. The need- 
state tumbles down of itself, and a rational form of govern- 
ment takes its place. Each honest man, who has hit 
convinced himself of the common will, may then quietly 
take it upon his conscience to completely overthrow it. 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 253 

(I append here a remark : Some men — I will not call 
them unconscientious, for tliis they must determine in 
their own conscience, but, at least, very stupid men — have, 
of late, raised a terrible cry, as if the belief in an 
unmeasured perfectil)ility were something very dangerous, 
very irrational, and the source of God only knows what 
wickedness. Let us set our investigation in the proper 
point of view, so as to put for ever a stop to this idle 
talk. Let us observe firstly, that it is not at all the 
next question, whether, from merely theoretical reasons, 
we must decide for or against this perfectibility. "We may 
put this question altogether aside. The infinitely ex- 
tending moral law commands absolutely to treat men 
as if they were, and always remained, capable of perfection, 
and positively prohibits treating them in a different 
manner. 

We cannot obey this command unless we believe in per- 
fectibility. Hence it is one of the first articles of faith, 
which we cannot doubt even without renouncing our whole 
moral nature. Hence, if it could be proven that the 
, human race, from the beginning of the world to the present 
day, has never progressed, but always retrogressed ; nay, 
even if, from the natural disposition of men, the mechanical 
law could be shown that they must necessarily retrograde 
(which is certainly far more than ever can be shown), we 
still ought not and could not give up that faith implanted 
ineradicably within us. Nor is there any contradiction 
in this, for this faith is based not upon natural disposition, 
but upon freedom. "What sort of people must there be, 
therefore, who would make us believe that it is foolishness 
to hold a faith which the moral law absolutely commands ? 
But this is certainly true, that nothing is more dangerous to 
the tyranny of despots and priests, and more calculated to 
shake their empire to itfj very foundations, than this faith. 
The only plausible reason which this tyranny can assign, 
and which it does not tire to plead, is that men can 
not be treated otherwise than it treats them ; that men 



254 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

are as they are and must ever so 'remain, and that 
their whole position, therefore, must always remain as 
it is. 



E. We repeat: all, necessarily, as sure as tlieir 
destination is dear to them, are desirous to infuse their 
convictions into all others, and the union of all for tliis 
purpose is called the Ckurck. Mutual conviction, liowever, 
is possible only if the disagreeing parties proceed from 
sometliing wherein they agree ; for, otherwise, both neitlier 
understand nor influence each other. Both remain 
isolated, each one speaking his part to himself without the 
other hearing him. Now, where there are only two 
or tliree who are to explain mutually to each other their 
opinions, it must be easy enough to unite on one common 
point, since tiiey all occupy the same standpoint of common 
sense. (In the science of philosojihy, which is to rise 
to the standpoint of transcendental consciousness, this 
is not always possible ; and in it it is quite possible tliat 
philosophizing individuals do not agree on a single point.) 
But, according to our demand, each one is to influence all 
who probably diverge consideral)ly in their individual 
opinions. How is he to discover what they all agree 
upon ? Certainly not by going around and asking them. 
Hence, there must be something which can be pre- 
supposed and which may be regarded as the confession 
of faith of all, or as their symlol. 

It is involved in the conception of such a symbol, that 
it should be not particularly determined, but very general 
in its statement, for it is precisely concerning the further 
determination of it that individuals disagree. But tlie 
conception likewise involves that this symbol should be 
proper for all, even the least cultured, and hence that 
it should not consist of abstract propositions, but of 
sensuous representations thereof. The sensuous repre- 
sentation is merely the hull ; the conception is the real 
symbol. That precisely this representation was a matter 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 255 

of necessity, since no common discussion was possible 
without an af^reement about something, and since it was 
not possible to make men agree about anything higher, 
they not yet being able to distinguish the hull, whicli 
the conception had accidentally revived amongst them, 
from the essence of the conception. In so far, indeed, 
every symljol is a symbol of necessity {Noth-Symbol), 
and will always remain so. 

I shall make this clearer through an example. The 
essential of every possible symbol is the proposition : 
there is something supcrsensual and elevated above all 
nature. Whosoever does not believe this in all serious- 
ness cannot be member of a Church, and is totally in- 
capable of all morality and moral culture. ]>ut what this 
supcrsensual, the true holy and sanctifying spirit, or 
the true moral way of thinking may be : tiiis is precisely 
what the Church seeks to determine, and to agree more 
and more upon, through reciprocal communication. Tliis 
is, for instance, likewise the purpose and content of 
our Christian Church symbol. But the same purpose 
had previously shaped itself already, as realized symbol 
in the sensuous world, and as confession of faith of an 
actual visible community amongst members of the Jewish 
nation, who had their own usages, modes of thinking, 
and images. It was very natural that they should shape 
that proposition according to these images. It was 
natural that they should have been able to communi- 
cate the supcrsensual to other nations, who, as nations — 
for we do not speak of their sages — were first elevated 
to a clear consciousness of the supcrsensual through the 
Jews, only in the same images in which they thought 
it themselves. Another author of a religion, j\Iohamed, 
gave to the same supcrsensual another form, more con- 
formable to his nation, and he did well to do so. 
Unhappily the nation of his faith met the misfortune 
of coming to a standstill from want of a learned public. 
Now what do these images say? Do they determine 



256 TUR SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

the snpcrsensnal in a universally valid manner ? By 
no means ; for what need were there otiierwiHe of a 
Church comnninity, which has no other object than 
further to (letcuininc the same ? As sure as this Church 
exists, and this Church exists as sure as man is finite 
but perfectil)le, so sure this supersensual is not deter- 
mined, but is to be determined, and througliout all 
eternity to be further determined. These enwrapping 
symbols are, therefore, solely the manner in which the 
Church community, under our presumption, gives ex- 
pression to the proposition : there is a supersensual. But 
since without agreement concerning something, tliere is 
not possible any reciprocal action for the production of 
common convictions, and since the latter as the condi- 
tioned, is absolutely commanded, so also is the condition. 
Hence it is absolute duty to fix at least something upon 
which at least the most agree, as symbol; or, in other 
words, to build up a visible Church community, as well 
as may be. Moreover, I cannot influence all without 
starting from what they all agree upon. But I shall 
influence them ; and hence I shall start from what they 
are all agreed upon, and not from what they are in 
dispute about. This is not merely a requirement of 
prudence, but it is conscientious duty. As sure as I 
will the end, I also will the only means. He who acts 
otherwise does not teach for the sake of moral culture, 
but perhaps in order to show off his learning, and makes 
himself a theoretical teacher, which is quite a different 
business. 

Let it be observed that I say : I shall start from it, 
as from something presupposed; but on no account: I 
shall try to arrive at it, as at something to be proven. 

And here, indeed, appears the objection which may be 
raised against this doctrine. For it, might be said : " Now 
if I am not convinced of the truth of those symbols from 
which I am to start, do I not then speak against my 
better conviction ; and how can I be allowed to do so ? " 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 2-^7 

Dut what is it really which runs against your octter 
conviction ? I hope not the conception of a supersensual, 
which lies at its l)asis. Hence it can only be this manner 
of characterizing it as a fi^^xd determination. But who 
says that it is an actual determination ? You, for your 
person, determine the supersensual otherwise ; but you 
cannot, and ought not, to start from this your determina- 
tion, since it is held in dispute. You are to start from 
what they can all agree upon with you; and this is, 
presumptively, the Church symbol. To raise them to 
your conviction is your end and aim ; but it can be done 
only gradually, and by always remaining in accord with 
them from the first starting-point. You will always be 
teaching conformalily to your conviction so long as you 
regard in your heart the symbol as a means to raise 
them to your conviction, precisely as our actions in the 
necessity -state must be regarded as means to conduce 
to the rational state. It is ignorance to insist that this 
hull shall be a determinedness. But against one's con- 
viction to it, an object to keep others in this belief is 
immoral, and the true priestcraft, precisely as the en- 
deavour to retain man in the need-state, is the true 
and real despotism. The symbol is the point of connec- 
tion. It is not taught — to teach it is priestcraft — for 
we start from it in teaching : it is our common pre- 
supposition. If it were not necessary to presuppose 
it, or if there were a higher point, nearer to my convic- 
tion, from which to start, I should be more satisfied ; 
but since there is none other I can only make use of 
this. 

Hence it is the conscientious duty of everyone who 
has to work for the spreading of a common conviction 
amongst a Church, to treat the symbol as the basis of 
his teachings ; not inwardly to have faith in them. We 
have already shown the very contrary. The symbol is 
changeable, and is constantly to be changed through good 
and proper teachings. 
S 



258 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

Let us remark here : this further pro^'resHion and tlni.s 
elevating of the symbol is precisely the Hj.irit of Pro- 
testantism, if this word has indeed any Hi;.'nilicance/it all 
The insisting upon the old, and the tending to bring 
universal reason to a standstill, is the spirit of Popery. 
The Protestant proceeds /7W?i the symbol into the inlinitc, 
Popery proceeds to the symbol as its ultimate. Who- 
soever does the latter is a Papist in form and spirit, even 
though the symbols which he proclaims as ultimates 
be genuinely Lutheran, Calvinistic, &c. 

F. I am not only allowed to have my private convictions 
respecting State government and Church system, but I 
am even in conscience bound to cultivate this my con- 
viction as much as I am able to do. 

But such a cultivation is possible — at least in the 
course of its progress — only through intercommunication 
with others. The ground is the following: There is 
absolutely no other criterion for the objective truth 
of my sensuous perceptions than the agreement of my 
experience with the experience of others. It is different 
— though not much — with respect to argument. I am a 
rational being only through being an individual. True, I 
argue according to universal laws of reason, but only 
through the powers of the individual. Xow, how can 
I be sure that the result has not been falsified through my 
individuality ? True, I assert and stand up for it that this 
is not so, likewise from a ground involved in my nature, 
But, nevertheless, the fact that I am, in the inmost depth 
of my soul, not quite sure of my matter, betrays itself in 
this : if one person after another, to whom I communicate 
my convictions, should reject it, I would not on tliat 
account immediately abandon my conviction, it is true, 
but I would at least become staggered and would 
investigate the subject again and again. How should 
I come to do so, if I had been before quite certain 
of the matter ? How could the other through his doubt, 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 259 

influence, and conduct, if I were quite self-suflicicnt? 
On the other hand I ain confirmed in my conviction 
by the honest agreement of others with it. An agree- 
ing, when I cannot presuppose internal conviction, 
does not satisfy me ; a proof that it is not the ex- 
ternal mere agreeing to my views about which I care. 
On the contrary, it annoys me, because it makes me 
Buspect this, the only criterion left to me to confirm 
my conviction. 

Deep in my spirit, even though I do not become 
clearly conscious of it, lies this doubt, whether or not 
my individuality may not have influenced my con- 
viction. To remove this doubt the agreement of all 
is not necessary. The sincere agreement of a single 
person may suffice me, and actually suffices me, 
for this reason : my fear was, that my individuality 
might have been the ground of my conviction. This 
fear is removed as soon as but a single other person 
agrees with me : for it would be very curious, if such an 
agreement between two individuals should happen by 
chance. Nor is agreement concerning evcrythiwj neces- 
sary. If we are only agreed concerning the first 
principles, or respecting a certain view of matters, I 
may well bear it if the other cannot follow me in all the 
conclusions which I draw. For these are guaranteed by 
general logic, which no rational man will doubt being 
universally valid. Let us take, for instance, philosophy. 
It is a state of mind, so utterly contrary to nature, that 
the first man who rose to it surely did not trust himself, 
until he observed the same elevation in others. 

Thus it is only through interconnnunication that 
I attain certainty and security respecting my con- 
victions. But if my convictions were really universally 
rational, and hence universally valid, the particular 
representation thereof remains, after all, always indi- 
vidual. The dress in which I clothe them is the best 
only for me ; but even in me it would better tit the 



26o THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

general and common conviction, as modified l)y all, 
if it had less of an individual form. Tliis it will obtain, 
if I communicate it to others, who enter ujton the 
subject and oppose their own reasons against it, and who, 
if the view is correct, tlirow off their individual mode 
of thinking. I correct my conviction, and tliereby make 
my own representation even more universally comprehen- 
sible for myself. The more extended this intercommu- 
nication is, the more does truth (objectively considered) 
gain, and 1 likewise. 

It is, therefore, exclusive condition of the further culti- 
vation of my particular convictions, that I shall be 
enabled to communicate them, and hence shall l)e allowed 
to start from them. 

But according to what we have said first, I am 
positively not to start in tlie Church community from my 
private conviction, but only from the common symbol, 
and so far as the State government is concerned, I am 
not only to obey its laws, but even, if it is the duty of 
my office, help to execute them. Hence, I am also not 
allowed to communicate my private convictions if tliey 
are opposed to the presupposed conviction of the people 
at large, because in doing so I would conspire to over- 
throw the State. But how am I then able to cultivate 
and correct my convictions through communication, since 
I am not allowed to communicate them ? 

When the conditioned is commanded, the condition 
also is commanded. The former cultivation of my con- 
viction is demanded of me, hence also its condition, 
communication. The communication of my private 
conviction is absolute duty. 

But we have just now seen that it is contrary to duty. 
How can this contradiction be solved T It is solved as 
soon as we observe, from what we have deduced the duty, 
to refrain from communicating private convictions re- 
specting Church affairs and State government. We 
deduce it from the presupposition that all had to bo 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 261 

iiilliienced, and from the impossibility to obtain knowledge 
of their convictions by asking everyone. 

Hence if we had not to intlnence all, but a determined, 
limited number, the convictions whereof it were quite 
possible to become acquainted with, because tliey also 
could communicate their views, it would no longer be 
prohibited to make them known, and to start from them. 
The synthetic link of union of the contradiction would 
be such a society. The conception of such a society 
involves the following: It is to be partly limited and 
determined, and hence not to embrace all, but a certain 
number chosen from amongst all, and in so far separated 
from them ; and partly it is to represent and externally to 
realize the freedom which each one has for himself and 
for his own consciousness, to doubt everything, and to 
investigate everything freely. Such a society is a forum 
of a common consciousness, before wliich everything 
possible can be thought and investigated with absolutely 
unlimited freedom. As each one is free for himself, so 
is he free on this sphere. Finally — which indeed follows 
from what we have said heretofore — each meml)er of this 
society must have thrown off the fetters of the Churcli 
symbols, and of the legal conceptions sanctioned by tlie 
State; not precisely materialiter, for he may consider 
much of what Church or State holds as final and highest 
determination of truth ; but, at least, formaliter, e.g., he 
must not ascribe to these symbols or conceptions any 
authority, must not hold them as true and correct because 
the Church teaches them, or the State exercises tiiem. 
For it is the very purpose and spirit of this society to 
investigate beyond these limits, but whosoever holds them 
to be limits does not investigate beyond them, and is, 
therefore, not member of such a society. We called such 
a society the learned public, or scholars. 

It is the duty of each one, who raises himself to 
absolute unbelief in the authority of the common con- 
viction of his age, to establish such a public of scholars. 



262 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

For havinpr repudiated that autliority, hucIi a man is 
without guidance. As sure as he thinks morally, it 
cannot be indifTerent to him whether he errs or not; 
but in respect to theoretical propositions, which always 
influence morality more or less, he can never attain 
perfect certainty, as we have shown above. Add to this, 
that it is his duty to communicate his convictions, and 
thus to make them of common use, but, at the same time, 
must not immediately communicate them to all. Hence 
lie must hunt up one of similar views, who like him has 
thrown off the belief in authority, and he cannot be 
quiet in his conscience until he has found this man, and 
has found in him a confirmation, and at the same time 
a means to deposit his convictions until he shall be 
enabled to make them useful to all. Others, who get 
into the same position, will find it their duty to join 
these two. They will soon' find each other, and through 
their union establish a public of scholars. It is moral 
duty, as appears from the above, to communicate to these 
scholars all new discoveries, all particular and dissenting 
convictions which lie beyond the sphere of common 
consciousness, and which each one may believe to 
entertain. 

The distinguishing characteristic of such a body is 
absolute freedom and independence in thinking, and the 
principle of its constitution is the rule to submit to 
positively no authority whatsoever, to base one's self in 
all matters purely upon one's own thinking, and to 
absolutely repudiate whatsoever is not confirmed by one's 
own thinking. The scholar distinguishes himself from 
the not-scholar in this ; the latter certainly believes also 
to have convinced himself through his own reflections, 
and he has, indeed, done so; but anyone who can look 
further, sees immediately, that his system concerning 
State and Church is the result of the current opinion 
of his age. All that he has himself convinced himself 
of is, that such are the opinions of his age ; his premises 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 263 

are formed by his age, witliout his knowing it and witliout 
his co-operation ; tlie results he may, jierhaps, have drawn 
himself. The scholar, on the other hand, is well aware 
of this. Hence he looks for tlie premises in himself, 
establislies consciously, and from free resolves, his reason 
for himself as the representative of reason in general. 

For the republic of scliolars there exist no possible 
symbols, no prescribed direction, no withholding. The 
members of this republic must be allowed to discuss 
cvcrytliiiig, wlieroof they ))elieve they have convinced 
themselves, precisely as they dare to think it for 
themselves. 

Universities are schools for the learned. Hence in 
universities also it must be permitted to discuss every- 
thing whereof one is convinced ; and there is no symbol 
for a university. Those err greatly who recommend 
precaution, and hold that one ought not to say everything 
in the university rooms ; but first consider well, whether 
it may be useful, or hurtful, or liable to misrepresentation. 
Whosoever is unable to investigate for himself, and 
incapable of learning to do so, should bear the guilt 
on his own shoulders^ for having obtruded into uni- 
versities. It is not the business of the others, for they 
act according to their perfect right and duty. The 
discussion in universities is distinguished from the 
discussion in learned books in nothing but in the form 
of the method. 

As the scholarly investigations are absolutely free, 
so must also the attendance at, those discussions be free 
to ever}'one. Whoever can no longer in his heart believe 
in authority, acts criminally in further believing in it, 
and it is his moral duty to join the scholars. No earthly 
power has a right to command in matters of conscience, 
and it is immoral to deny to anyone, whose mind fits him 
for it, admittance to investigation. 

The State and Church must tolerate the scholars ; for, 
otherwise, they would try to compel conscience, and no 



26; ' THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

one could any longer conacientiouHly live in sucli a Church 
or such a State ; for there would be no remedy for liiui 
if he should begin to doubt. Moreover, progress towards 
perfection would be impossible in such a State ; and yet 
it is possible. Hence Church and State must tolerate 
scholars, e.g., must tolerate tliat wliich constitutes their 
distinctive essence; absolute and uidiniited counnunication 
of thought. Everything, whereof each one believes to 
have convinced himself, must be an allowed subject of 
discussion, however dangerous and outrageous it may 
appear. For if anyone has entered upon errors, how 
are others to be prevented from straying into the same 
errors, if he is not permitted to communicate his errors ? 

I say : State and Church must tolerate scholarly culture 
as such. More indeed they cannot do for it, since both 
occupy utterly different spheres. The State as such 
cannot support or further scholarship as such ; this is 
only done through free investigation, and the State is 
not to investigate. Statesmen or State officials may, it 
is true, support scholarship as individuals; Ijut not 
the State. 

The republic of scholars is an absolute democracy, or 
more dcHnitely expressed, only the right of spiritual 
strength is valid in it. Each one does what he can 
do, and is in the right if he has the might to maintain 
this right. There is no other judge in it than time and 
the progress of culture. 

Teachers of religion and State officials are to work 
in the cause of the perfectibility of men, and hence they 
must be more advanced than the public at large, e.g., they 
must be scholars, and must have received a scholarly 
education. In so far tiie professional scholar is himself 
indirectly a State official, for he is the educator of tlie 
State's popular teachers and immediate officials. In so 
far alone can the scholar also receive a salary from and 
be under the supervision of the State. Of course the 
State cannot prescribe what he is to teach, for that were 



THE MORALITY OF OUR ACTIONS. 265 

contradictory; but the State can see to it, that he do 
really communicate in the best manner wliat lie believes 
to know. Scholarly schools are not auch wherein the 
future profession of the common school-tciicher, or of 
the State official, is tauglit. True, these professions must 
also be taught, but to teach it constitutes quite another 
order of teaching. The State official and public school- 
teacher is to be not only a professional man, but also 
a scholar. Hence he is both, but it is his duty, according 
to the above principles, to separate both in liis conduct. 
When he is public teacher or official he is not scholar, 
and when he is scholar he is not the former. It is an 
oppression of conscience to prohibit tlie greater from 
communicating his dissenting convictions in scholarly 
writings ; but it is quite in order to prohibit him from 
preaching them in the pulpit; nay, if he is only well 
aware of what he does, he will himself know that it 
is immoral» to do so. 

The State and the Church have the right to prohibit 
this to the scholar, and to prevent him from realizing his 
convictions in the sensuous world. If he does so, if 
he, for instance, violates the laws of his State, he is 
justly punished, whatever he may tliink in himself 
about these laws ; nay, he will necessarily reprove himself, 
for he has done an immoral action. 

Thus the idea of a public of scholars alone solves 
the contradiction which occurs between an established 
Church and State, and the absolute freedom of con- 
science of each individual. Hence the realization of 
this Idea in the sensuous world is commanded by the 
Moral Law. 

G. In conclusion, we state, in as few words as possible, 
the total end of man in so far as he is considered as 
individual. 

The final end of all his working in society is : men 
shall all agree ; but all men agree only about the purely 



266 THE SCIENCE OE ETHICS. 

rational, for it is that which is common to them all. 
Under the presupposition of sucli an a;^reonient tlie 
distinction between a learned and unlearned puljlic falls 
away, Church and State fall away. All have the same 
convictions, and the conviction of each is the conviction 
of all. The State falls away as a krjülatinfj and compulsorif 
power. The will of each is universal law in truth, 
because all others will the same, and no compulsion is 
needed, because each one wills of himself that whicli 
he ought to do. To this end, therefore, all our thinking,' 
and doing, and even our individual culture, ouj^ht to tend. 
Not we ourselves are the final end, but all are this end. 
Now if this end, although unattainable, were thought 
as attained, what would happen ? Each one would with 
all his individual power, and as well as he were able, 
modify nature for the use of reason, according to that 
common will. What each one did would thus be of 
equal advantage to all, and what all did would in reality 
turn to the advantage of each; since their end is the 
same in reality. 

It is so even now already; but only in Idea. Each 
one is to think in everything he does that it is for all ; 
and this is the very reason why he is not allowed to do 
many things, since he does nob know whether they will 
it also. But if this Idea were real, each one would be 
allowed to do everything he might will, since all would 
will the same. 



PART IL 
THE SCIENCE OF MORALS 



BOOK FIFTH. 

THE THEORY OF DUTIES. 

CHArTEK I. 
DECISION OF THE DOCTRINE OF DUTIES. 

A. We liave already indicated the definite separation 
between the purely rational of the rational l^eing and its 
individuality. The manifestation and representation of 
that pure reason in that being is the Moral Law, whereas 
the individuality is that through which each individual 
distinguishes himself from the others. The uniting link 
of both is this, that a rational being absolutely must 
be an individual, but not necessarily this or that indi- 
vidual ; which latter fact is purely accidental, and hence 
of empirical origin. The empirical is the will, the 
understanding (in the widest sense of the word, as 
equivalent to intelligence or general power of repre- 
sentation), and the hodij. The object of the :Moral Law, 
or that wherein it desires to have its end and aim 
represented, is absolutely nothing individual, liut Eeason 
in general; in a certain sense the Moral Law is its 
own end. This universal reason has been posited by 
me, as intelligence outside of me ; and the whole totality 
of rational beings outside of me is tlieir representation. 
Hence I have- posited universal reason outside of me, 
in virtue of the Moral Law, as theoretical principle. 
Now after this externalizing of pure reason has been 

•69 



270 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

achieved in iiie, only the empirical or individual E^'o 
is to be called Ego, or I, in tlie Science of I^Iorals. 
Hence, wlienever I hereafter use the word Ego, it always 
signifies person. 

(Our Science of IMorals is therefore very important 
for our whole system, since in it is shown up liow the 
empirical Ego arises out of the purely genctical Ego, and 
how the pure Ego is finally altogetlicr externalized from 
the individual person. From the present point of view 
the representation of the pure Ego is the totality of 
rational beings, or the communion of saints.) 

How do I, as person, relate myself to the ^Moral Law ? 
It is to me that this law addresses itself, and to wliom 
it assigns its execution; Ijut its end lies outside of me. 
I am, therefore, for myself, or for my own consciousness, 
only the instrument, the tool of the j\Ioral Law, and not 
its end. Impelled by the ]\Ioral .Law I forget myself 
in acting, I am only a tool in its hand. Whosoever looks 
to an end sees not himself; but the end lies outside of 
me. As in every contemplation, so the sul)ject loses 
itself here, vanishing in the contemplated, and in its 
contemplated end. For me, i.e., for my consciousness, 
the Moral Law addresses itself not to other beings, 
but has them for its end. All others are, and only I 
alone am not, embraced in its end. For my conscious- 
ness all others are not means, not tools, but final end 
and aim. 

Let us remove some difficulties which might be opposed 
to this proposition. 

Each vian is himself end, says Kant with universal 
approval. 

This proposition of Kant agrees well enough with 
mine, if mine is only carried out further. For all the 
other rational beings, to whom the Moral Law addresses 
itself equally as to me, using them as .tools, liold me 
as a member of the communion of rational beings, and 
hence I am to them end, as they are end to me. To 



THE THEORY OF DUTIES. rj\ 

each r.ation.il bciT)g, all others outside of him arc end ; 
but no one is his own end. The point of view from 
which all individuals, without exception, are final end, 
lies hcyoiul all individual consciousnriss, and is the ])oint 
of view from which tlie conHciousness of all rational 
beings is united, as object, into One; hence the jioint 
of view of God. For God, each rational being is absolute 
and final end. 

But no, it is said, each one is to be end expressly for 
himself; and this also may be admitted. lie is end as 
a means to r^^alize reason. This is the final aim of its 
existence, since for this alone he exists; and if it were 
not for this he need not to exist at all. This does not 
lower, but rather elevates the dignity of man. To each 
one is assigned, for his consciousness, the task of 
attaining the universal end of reason. The whole 
community of rational beings becomes dependent upon 
his care and his labour ; and he alone is independent 
of everything. Each one becomes like God, so far as 
he can become so ; i.e., in respecting the freedom of all 
individuals. Each one, precisely because his whole in- 
dividuality is annihilated and destroyed, becomes a pure 
representative of the Moral Law in the sensuous world ; 
becomes true pure Ego through free will, and self-deter- 
mination. 

It has already been sufficiently observed above, that 
this forgetting of self occurs only in actual acting in the 
sensuous world. Those who place perfection in pious 
meditations, and in devout brooding over their self, and 
who expect from such practices the annihilation of their 
individuality, and a flowing together with God, are much 
in error. Their virtue is and remains egotism ; they 
want to make perfect only themselves. True virtue 
consists in acting, in acting for the totality, in which 
acting each forgets himself utterly. I shall be compelled 
•to recur frequently to this important point. 



272 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

B. I can forfjct myself iii my lal)Onr only in so far as 
it stands unhindered, and as I am, iliercfore, truly means 
to accomplish the desired pnri)Ose. If it is checked, 
I am thcrel)y driven l)ack into myself and forced to 
retlect npon myself ; and I am in tliis manner made my 
own object by means of the resistance. 

The Moral Law addresses itself immediately to me, 
and makes me its object. I am to be means; but I 
am not means, because the check occurs; hence I am 
to make myself means. 

Let the condition here established be well remarked. 
In the moral state of mind, wherein I am to be always 
and uninterruptedly, I become object of reflection and 
of the commanded acting, solely in so far as I can 
not be means. The care for myself is conditioned 
by this, that I cannot carry out my end and aim 
outside of me. But when this condition occurs, then 
this care is duty. 

Thus there arises the conception of a duty — not exactly 
which I owe to myself, as is usually said ; for I always 
remain mere means for the end outside of me; but 
of a duty, which I must observe in regard to myself, 
of a moral acting, whereof I myself am the immediate 
object. I shall call these duties, therefore: not duties 
to ourselves, as is the usual phrase, but mediated and 
conditioned duties ; mediated because they have for their 
object the means of all our acting ; conditioned because 
they can only be deduced from the following proposition: 
If the INIoral Law desires the conditioned, the realization 
of the supreme rule of reason outside of me through me, 
it also desires the condition, namely, that I shall be fit 
and proper means for that purpose. 

Since for me there is no other means to realize the 
absolutely to be realized law of reason, than myself, there 
can be, strictly speaking, no other mediated duties than 
those towards myself. In opposition to them, the duties 
towards the Whole, as the highest and absolutely com- 



THE THEORY OF DUTIES. 273 

niandod dutios, arc to be culled ivimcdiate and imconditioncd 
duties. 



C. There is still another division of the duties from 
the following reason. The command to promote the inde- 
pendence of reason, so far as possible, is addressed to 
each individual. Now if each one does in this respect 
that which first occurs to him, or which appears to him 
pre-eminently necessary, many things will be done in 
a manifold manner, and many things will not l)c done 
at all. The effects of the acts of many will check and 
cancel each other, and the steady promotion of the final 
end of reason will not be achieved. But the Moral Law 
requires that it shall be achieved. Hence it is the duty 
of each one, who perceives this hindrance (and each one, 
who will but look close, must perceive it), to remedy it. 
This remedy, however, can only be effected, if many 
individuals divide amongst themselves the various things 
that must be done to promote the final aim of reason, 
each one accepting a certain part for all others, and in 
his turn surrendering to all others his part. This can 
only be accomplished by an agreement, through the 
uniting of many for the purpose of such a division. 
It is the duty of each one, who perceives this, to establish 
such an agreement. 

An agreement of this kind is an agreement concerning 
the various vocations of all individuals. There must be 
various vocations ; and it is the duty of each individual 
to labour for their establishment, and to choose a fixed 
vocation for himself when they are established. Each 
one, who chooses a vocation, chooses a peculiar manner of 
promoting the final end of reason. 

Some labours of this kind can be transferred to others, 
but some can not ; that which cannot be transferred, is 
general duty. That, which can be transferred, is j^ccriicular 
duty of him to whom it is transferred. Hence there is, 
moreover, a distinction between general and particular 
T 



C74 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

duties, and combining this division with the previous one 
we shall have to speak : 

Of the general conditioned duties. 

Of the particular conditioned duties. 

Of the general unconditioned or absolute duties. 

Of the particular unconditioned or absolute duties. 



CHAPTER IL 

CONCERNING THE GENERAL CONDITIONED DUTIES. 

I AM tool of the Moral Law in the sensuous world. But 
I am tool in the sensuous world solely on condition of 
a continuous reciprocal causality between me and tlie 
world, the way and manner of which is to be deter- 
mined through my will ; and since we speak here chiefly 
of a causality upon the world of rational beings, on 
condition of a continuous reciprocal causality Ijetween 
me and them. (This proposition has been proven in my 
Science of Rights, and as I would have merely to repeat 
that proof here, I refer to it as the proof of what is 
averred here. Nor will this mere reference infringe upon 
the clearness and completeness of our present science, 
for what this postulated reciprocal causality may signify, 
will appear clearly enough.) If I am to be this tool of 
the Moral Law, then the condition under which alone 
I can be it, must take place ; and if I think myself as 
under the rule of the Moral Law, I find myself com- 
manded to realize this its condition ; namely, the 
continued reciprocal causality between myself and the 
world of both rational and sensuous beings, so far as 
it is in my power to do so ; for the Moral Law can never 
require the impossible. Hence all we have to do is to 
analyse this conception, and to relate the Moral Law 
to its several parts, in order to arrive at the general duty, 
whereof we ourselves are the immediate object, or at the 
general conditioned duties. 

This reciprocal relation is to be continuous ; the Moral 
Law commands oxxi preservation as members of a sensuous 

975 



276 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

world. In the SrAcnce of liifjhts, which knows nothing 
of a I\Ioral Law and its commands, but estaUislies only 
the will of a free bein^^ as determined through natural 
necessity, we furnished the proof of the necessity to will 
our continuance in the following manner: I will some- 
thing (X) signifies: the existence of this object shall 
be given to me in experience. But as sure as I vnll it, 
it is not so given in present experience, and is possible 
only in future. Hence, as sure as I will this expenence, 
I also will, that I, the experiencing I, shall exist as tlie 
same identical I in a future moment. From this point 
of view respecting my will, I will my continuance only 
for the sake of a satisfaction, which I expect in the 
future. 

The will of a free being, as determined through the 
Moral Law, has not this ground to will the continuance 
of the individual. Under the direction of this law, I 
do not care at all that something may be given to me 
in a future experience. Under it, X is to be absolutely 
without any reference to myself; it is to be utterly 
indifferent to me, whether / experience something or not, 
provided it only becomes actual in general, and provided 
I may presuppose that it will thus sometime become actual 
The above demand of the natural man, that the object 
be given to him, is always the demand of an enjoyment. 
But from the standpoint of morality, enjoyment, as such, 
is never end. If I were told with more absolute certainty, 
that which you intend is certainly going to be realized, 
but you will never participate in it ; anniliilation is 
awaiting you before it will be realized ; I would, never- 
theless, be forced to work with the same exertion for its 
realization. The attainment of my true end would be 
assured to me ; and the enjoyment thereof ought never 
to be my end. Hence the continuance of my life, and 
its consequent preservation, is not a duty to me for the 
sake of experiencing the realization of my end and aim. 
How then may it become my dut^ ? 



THE THEORY OF DUTIES. 277 

Wliatsoever I may realize in the sensuous world is 
never tlie final end of morality, for that lies in the 
Infinitude, but only a means to draw nearer to this end. 
. Hence tlie first end of all my actions is a new acting 
in the future; but whoever is to act in the future must 
live in it; and if he is to act in pursuance of a plan 
traced out now already, he must be and remain the same 
as he now is : his future existence must regularly develop 
itself from the present. Inspired by moral sentiment, 
I consider myself solely as a tool of the Moral Law. 
Hence I have the will to continue, and to continue to 
exist solely for the sake of acting. It is for this reason 
that self-preservation is a duty. This duty of sdf- 
prcscrvation we now have to determine more closely. 
The preservation and regularly progressive development 
of the empirical self, which is regarded both as intelli- 
gence, or soul, and as body, is required. Hence both the 
health and regularly progressive development of soul and 
body considered in themselves, and the continuation of 
their unchecked mutual inÜuence upon each other, is 
object of the Moral Law. 

The requirement of the Moral Law in this respect is to 
be regarded, firstly, negatively, as a prohibition : Undertake 
nothing which, in your oion conscionsncss, might endanger 
the preservation of yourself in the stated meaning of the 
word ; and secondly, positively, as a command : Do what- 
ever aceording to your best conviction promotes this preser- 
vation of yourself 

I. The preservation and the well-being of our empirical 
self may be endangered, both internally, by checking 
the progress of natural development, and externally, 
through external force. So far as the former is con- 
cerned, our body is an organized product of nature, and 
its preservation is endangered, if checks are opposed to 
the regular progress of the organization. This would 
occur if the body were denied proper food through 
fasting, or, if the body were overfed through intemper- 



278 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

nncc, or if an opposite direction were given to the whole 
tendency of nature to preserve the macliine, through 
unchastity. All these dissipations arc in violation of tlie 
duty of self-preservation, more specially in re^'ard to the 
hody. They disturb the development of the mind, the 
welfare whereof depends upon the well-bein;; of the Ijody. 
]<\xstincr weakens and makes drowsy the body, in temper- 
ance, gluttony, and, above all, unchastity, sinks the body 
deep into matter, and takes away from it the ability to 
elevate itself. 

The development of the mind is directly disturbed 
through its inactivity ; for the mind is a power, which 
can be developed only through practice. It is likewise 
disturbed through too much exertion, with neglect of the 
l)ody, since it is the body which must support the mind. 
Likewise through an irregular occupation of the mind ; as 
a blind indulging in irregular fancies, a mere memorizing 
of the thoughts of others without my own judgment ; or 
a dry puzzling of the brain without living contemplation. 
The whole mind must be cultured in all directions, Ijut on 
no account one-sidedly. One-sided culture is no culture, 
but rather suppression of the mind. All that we have 
here mentioned is not merely imprudent and unwise {i.e., 
opposed to some arbitrary end), but is opposed to the 
absolute final end and aim of reason. It is absolutely 
immoral, for all who attain an insight into the end of 
their empirical existence, and this iusigiit all ought to 
acquire. So far as the latter is concerned, namely, danger 
from external causes, the prohibition of the moral law is 
as follows: do not unnecessarily endanger your health, 
body, and life. Exposition to such danger is unnecessary 
whenever the moral law does not require it. When that 
law does require it, I am absolutely obliged to do so, no 
matter how great the danger and risk may be ; for it is 
my absolute end to do what duty requires, and my self- 
preservation is only a means for this end. How such a 
command of duty to risk one's self-preservation may 



THE THEORY OE DUTIES. 279 

arise, this is not the i)ropcr place to exjilain. We shall 
ttake up the subject on this point in the doctrine con- 
cerning absolute duties. The investigation concerning 
the morality of suicide, belongs, however, to the subject 
in the present place ; and we shall settle it now. 

I am not unnecessarily, ix., not without the command 
of duty, to endanger my life ; it must, therefore, be still 
more prohibited' to destroy my life with my own jjower, 
and intentionally. Somebody nn'ght add, however: 
" Unless, indeed, duty requires such self-destruction of 
one's own life ; as it certainly docs require, according to 
your own presupposition, the exposure of one's life to 
danger ! " Hence the thorough solution of our problem 
rests on the answering of the following question : Is it 
possible that duty can ever require me to kill myself ? 

Let us first observe the great difterence between a 
requirement of duty to endanger one's life, and one to 
take away that life. The first command only requires 
me to forget myself, not to esteem my self-preservation 
as anything to counter! )alancc duty. Moreover, the 
absolutely commanded action, in which I am to forget 
myself, is directed upon something outside of me. Hence 
there is no immediate command : endanger thyself ! but 
only a mediated and conditioned command : do that 
which might endanger thyself ! But an act of suicide 
would immediately touch myself, and hence must be 
based upon an immediate and unconditioned command. 
We shall see at once whether such is possible. 

The decision rests upon the following : My life is the 
exclusive condition of the realization of the law through 
me. Now the command is addressed to me absolutely : 
to realize the law. Hence I am absolutely commanded 
to live, so far as this depends upon me. To destroy my 
life by my own hands is directly contradictory of this ; 
and hence is immoral. I cannot destroy my own life at 
all without withdrawing myself, so far as I am concerned, 
from the rule of the moral law ; but this that law can 



28o THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

never command, because it would in doin^ so contradict 
itself. If I am influenced by the moral law — and this I 
ouf];ht to be and must be considered as bcin;^', wlien ]iiy 
actions are judged of — then I will to live solely to do my 
duty. I will not live any longer, would, therefore signify : 
I will no longer do my duty. 

An objection could only be raised against the major 
of this syllogism. It might be said: IJut this present 
earthly life of ours, of which alone we are speaking, is 
for me not the only exclusive condition of my duty. I 
believe in a life after death, and hence, by killing myself, 
do not end my life in general, and thus do not withdraw 
myself from the rule of the moral law; I only cliange 
the manner of my life; proceed only from one place to 
another, as I often do, and am allowed to do, ia this 
earthly life. In replying to this objection, I shall adopt 
the simile, and ask : Does then the moral law permit you 
arbitrarily to change your position or place on earth, as 
if it were the same whether you did or did not do so ; 
or is such a step not rather always either your duty or 
against your duty ? Clearly the latter, for according to 
all our previous proofs the moral law leaves no play- 
ground for arbitrariness. Under its rule there are no 
indifferent actions at all; in each position of your life 
each act is either moral or immoral. Hence you will 
have to show up not merely a permission of that law to 
leave this life and pass into another one, but an explicit 
command. That this. is impossil)lc can, however, be 
strictly proven. For the moral law does never im- 
mediately command me to live for the sake of life, 
neither in this life, which alone I know, nor in any other 
possible life ; but the immediate object of its command is 
always a determined action ; and since I cannot act with- 
out living, it always commands me to live, (Considered 
as a natv,ral agent I loill to live not for the sake of life 
but for the sake of some determination of life ; considered 
as moral agent, / shall will to live not for the sake of Hfe, 



THE THEORY OF DUTIES. 281 

but of an action for whicli I need life.) Hcnco tlie 
transition to another life could not be commanded of me in 
an innncdiate, but only in a mediate manner, through the 
command of a determined act, which would tran.spire in 
another life. In other words : I could only be permitted 
to leave this life — and since there are no actions merely 
permitted, it can never be my duty to leave tliis life — 
unless I had a determined action to undertake in the 
life hereafter. This,' however, no rational being will be 
willing to assert. For we are forced by the laws of 
thinking to determine our duties througli what is already 
known to us ; and the state of life beyond the present is 
utterly unknown to us, and all our cognisable duties 
transpire in the present life. The moral law, therefore, 
far from referring me to another life, demands always, 
and in every hour of my present life, that I continue it, 
for in every such hour there is something for me to do, 
and the sphere, wherein I am to do it, is the present 
world. Hence it is not only actual suicide, but even the 
desire to live no longer, which is immoral, for such a 
desire is a wish to work no longer in the manner in wliich 
alone we can think our work ; it is an inclination utterly 
opposed to a moral mode of thinking, it is a tiredness 
and a weary disgustedness, which a moral man should 
never allow to move him. 

If the wish to leave this world signifies the mere 
readiness to leave life as soon as the ruler of the world, in 
whom we believe on this standpoint, shall so order, it 
is altogether a just wish, inseparable from a moral 
character, for life has no value in itself to such a 
character. But if it signifies an inclination to die, 
and to come into connection with beings of another 
world, then such a desire becomes an unwholesome indul- 
gence, which paints and determines the future world 
in advance. But such a determining has no basis, and 
the data for it can only be imaginary. Moreover, it is 
immoral, for how can a truly moral character have time 



282 THE SCIENCE OE ETHICS. 

left for viRJonary meditations? True virtue clnos every 
hour wliolly what it has to do in that hour, and leaves all 
the rest to the care of Iiini, whose care it is. 

To convince himself of the correctness of these views, 
let the reader examine all possible grounds of an act 
of suicide. The first motive, of which instances are said 
to have occurred, is a despair to get rid of and conquer 
certain vices, which have become a habit, and almost 
our own second nature. But this* very dcsjjair is an 
immoral feeling. If you only have the true will, there is 
no difliculty about the canning. What, indeed, could have 
compulsory power over our will ? Or what could put the 
power wherewith we sin, in motion, except our will ? 
Hence in this case the confession is clear that the suicide 
does not will his duty. He cannot tolerate life without 
vice, and rather would compromise with virtue by the 
easier means of death, than conform to its requirement of 
a guiltless life. 

Another possible motive is that a person should kill 
himself to escape suffering something infamous and 
vicious, becoming thus the object of 'another's vices, but 
in this case he does not kill himself to escape vice, for 
if he only suffers in the matter, i.e., if he cannot resist 
with the exertion of all his physical forces, that which he 
is made to undergo, then it is not any crime of his. He 
only escapes through death the injustice, violence, or 
divSgrace, inflicted upon him, but not sm, since he does 
not commit any sin himself. He kills himself, because 
an enjoyment is taken away from him, without which 
he cannot tolerate life. But in that case he has not 
denied himself, and has not, as he ought to have done, 
sacrificed all other considerations to virtue. 

Some men have accused suicides of cowardice, others 
have celebrated their courage. Both parties are in the 
right, as is usually the case in disputes of rational men. 
The matter has two sides, and both parties have only 
looked each at one. It is necessary to consider it from 



THE THEORY OF DUTIES. 283 

l)olli sides, for injustice must not be done even to what is 
most horrible, since thercl)y only contradiction is excited. 

The resolve to die is the purest representation of tlie 
superiority of thought over nature. In nature lies the 
ini})ulse to preserve itself, and the resolve to die is the 
exact opposite of this impulse. Each suicide, committed 
with cool considerateness — the most of suicides are com- 
mitted in a fit of senselessness, and concerning such 
a condition nothing can rationally be said — is an illustra- 
tion of this superiority, a proof of great strength of soul, 
and necessarily excites esteem, when reviewed from this 
side. It proceeds from the above-described blind impulse 
to be absolutely self-determined, and is only met with in 
an energetic character. Courage is resoluteness to meet 
an unknown future. Now, since the suicide annihilates 
all future for himself, we cannot ascribe true courage 
to him, unless indeed he assumes a life after death, and 
goes to meet this life with the firm resolve to fight or 
bear whatsoever that life shall have in store for him. 

But whatever strength of soul it may require to resolve 
to die, it requires far more courage to bear a life whicli 
can only have sorrow in store for us hereafter, which we 
esteem as worth nothing in itself, even though it could l)e 
made the most joyous life, and to bear it nevertheless 
merely so as not to do anything unworthy of ourself. If 
in the first instance we have superiority of the conception 
over nature, we have here superiority of the conception 
itself over the conception : autonomy and alisolute 
independence of thought. Whatsoever lies outside of 
the thought lies outside of myself, and is indifferent 
to me. If the former is the triumph of thought, this 
is the triumph of its law, the purest representation 
of morality ; for nothing higher can be asked of man than 
that he should continue to bear a life which has grown to 
be insupportable to him. This courage the suicide lacks, 
and in so far he can be called cowardly. In comparison 
with the virtuous man he is a coward ; but in comparison 



284 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

with the wicked, who suhmits to (Hsgrace and slavery 
merely so as to continue for a few more years the 
wretched feeling of his existence, he is a licro. 

2. The requirement of the moral law, wliicli relates 
to our self, has also, as we have seen, a posüive cliaraeter. 
In so far it requires of us that we should nourish our 
body, and promote its health and well-being in all possible 
manner — of course for no other purpose than to live aiid 
make it an able tool for the promotion of the great final 
end of reason. Moreover, if I am to nourish my Ijody 
and promote its welfare, I must be in possession of the 
means to do so. Hence I must take care of my posses- 
sions, be economical, and regulate my monetary affairs 
with prudence and order. It is not merely advisable and 
prudent to do so, but duty. He who, from a fault of his 
own, cannot provide his own means of living, is guilty. But 
the requirement is also addressed to the well-being of 
our mind, and in so far it is positive duty to occupy 
the mind continually but regularly, of course so far as the 
particular duties of each permit him to do so. To this 
belong oesthetical enjoyments and tlie fine arts, the 
moderate and proper use whereof cheers body and soul, 
and strengthens them for new exertions. In regard to 
the uninterrupted mutual influence of body and soul upon 
each other, we can do nothing directly. If each is only 
properly taken care of by itself, this mutual iutiueuce 
will result of itself. 

Kemark. 

All the above duties are only, as we have said, con- 
.ditioued duties. My empirical self is only a means for 
the attainment of the end and aim of reason, and is to 
be preserved and cultivated only as such means, and in 
80 far as it can be such means. Hence, if its preservation 
conflicts with this end, it must be abandoned. 

For me, for the forum of my conscience, nothing is 
opposed to the end of reason except my acting adverse to 



THE THEORY OE DUTIES. 285 

an unconditioned duty. Hence, tlie only case wherein 1 
can give up .self-preservation, is when I can retain life 
only through the violation of such a duty. I must not 
do anytliing immoral for the sake of life, since life is an 
end only for the sake of duty, and since the accomplish- 
ment of duty is the final end of reason. It might be, 
and sometimes is, o])jected: "But how if, by making just 
this once an exception from the severity of the law, I can 
save my life, and tlius preserve myself for tlie future 
achievement of nnich good which otherwise would be left 
undone ?" This is the same pretext whicii is made use 
of to defend the evil, for the good which is to result from 
it. But those who urge this oljjection forget that the 
choice of the good works which we would like to do, and 
of others which we would like to leave undone, is not left 
to our discretion. Each person is absolutely bound to do 
that, and notliing else, which his position, heart, and 
insight command him to do; and must leave undone wliat 
they forbid him to do. Now, if the moral law takes away 
from me its permission for me to live, before I can achieve 
certain future good actions, then those actions are 
assuredly not for me to achieve, for I shall no longer 
exist, at least under tlie conditions of this sensuous 
world. Nay, it is in itself clear enough, that to him who 
commits immoral acts for the sake of preserving his life, 
does not hold duty in general, nor the particular duties 
which he desires to do hereafter, to be the alisolute final 
end of reason; for, if duty alone were his end, if only 
the moral law ruled him, it would be impossible for him 
to act in violation of it, just as it is impossible for the 
moral law to contradict itself. It was life which was his 
final end and aim, and the pretext that he desired yet to 
accomplish good works hereafter, he has only invented 
afterwards, to excuse himself. But on the other hand, T 
must also not consider and permit my death as a means 
for a good end. It is my life, and not my death, which is 
means. I am tool of the law as active principle, not 



286 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

means thereof as a thing. We have already shown, in 
this respect, that I must not kill myself — as, for instance, 
the suicide of Lucretia might he considered as a means to 
liherate Rome — hut neither must I voluntarily permit my 
death if I can prevent it. Still less must 1 seek the 
■ opportunity to die, or excite others to kill jne, as is told of 
Codrus, though I might helieve that tlie salvation of the 
world would result therefrom. Such conduct is always a 
kind of suicide. Let the distinction he well ohserved. 
I am not only permitted, but commanded, to expose my 
life to danger whenever duty requires it ; tliat is to say, I 
must forget the care for my self-preservation. But I 
must absolutely never think my death as an end and aim. 



CHAPTER III. 

CONCERNING THE PARTICULAR CONDITIONED DUTIES. 

The particular duties arc the duties of the vocation, as 
has been stated above, when we deduced the necessity of 
vocations. The particular conditioned duties are those 
duties which have our empirical self for object, in so far 
as we belong to this or that particular vocation. In 
regard to tliese duties, it is to be observed : 

1. Wherever particular vocations have been established, 
it is absolute duty of every individual to have a vocation, 
i.e., to promote, in a particular manner, the final end of 
reason. This we prove as follows : 

If no vocations were established, it would be the duty 
of each who comprehended the necessity of establishing 
them as the exclusive condition of a complete and regu- 
lar promotion of the end of reason, to establish them. 
Hence, it is still more duty to choose a particular 
vocation where they have already been established, since, 
where this has been done, no one can do any general 
work without doing what others have already undertaken 
to do, and thus, without either hindering them and 
opposing the promotion of the final end of reason, or, at 
least, doing something superfluous and idle, which is 
equally immoral. Hence, he must select a particular 
vocation, and make this choice known to his fellow-men 
in a universally valid manner. 

2. It is duty to select a vocation, not according to 
inclination, but according to the best conviction that it is 
fittest for one's powers, culture, and other external con- 
ditions. For the end of our life is not to satisfy our 

287 



288 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

inclination, Vnit to promote the end of reason. Each 
force in the sensuous world is to be used for this end in 
the most advantageous maniier. It might be objected: 
" But the fewest men choose their own vocation, Init have 
it selected for them by their parents, circumstances, &c., 
or, if they do select them themselves, they do so in 
advance of the proper maturity of reason, and before 
they are disposed to serious meditation and susceptiljle 
to the moral law," I reply, that this sliould not be so, 
and that each one who sees that it should not be so 
ou<dit to work to make it otherwise. All men ought to 
be educated, and to educate themselves in the same 
manner, until humanity in general has become developed 
and ripe in them, and not till then ought they to choose a 
vocation. We do not deny that, if this is to be so, many 
other things in human afTairs must be different from what 
they are. But a science of morals establishes always the 
ideal, even though the ideal should not be realizal)le 
under all circumstances. This, indeed, it cannot be, for, 
if it could, it would itself be wavering and indefinite. 
But neither is it to fit itself according to circumstances. 
On the contrary, circumstances must begin to conform 
to it. 

Perhaps this is the place to add that the subordination 
and rank of vocations, although exclusively a civil 
institution, is also a necessary one. The manifold 
occupations of men are subordinated to each other as 
conditioned to the conditioning, as means to end; and 
in like manner those who carry them on must be sub- 
ordinated. From a moral point of view all occupations 
have the same value. In each one the end of reason is 
promoted, from the vocation which tills the soil for the 
production of those fruits from which the sensuous 
preservation of our race depends, to that of the scholar, 
who thinks the future ages and works for them, or of 
the legislator and wise regent, who realizes the thoughts 
of the scholar in -his institutions for the welfare of the 



THE THEORY OF DUTIES. 289 

remotest generations. If each one does from duty all 
tliat he can do, tliey are all of equal rank in the court 
of pure reason. 

3. But I cannot select a vocation witliout the conH(mt 
of all other men. For the end of reason must be followed 
completely and in steady progression ; and all the otliers 
having already divided amongst themselves the various 
labours necessary for it, it is necessary for me to inquire 
first whether there is still room for me, and whether my 
assistance is required where I intend to apply it. I liavc 
the right to proffer my services, and society has a right 
to reject them. If, however, no proper institution has 
yet been established for this purpose, I shall have to 
judge myself, according to my best conscience, whether 
my assistance is required. 

Hence the vocation of each individual is determined 
through his reciprocity with society, which reciprocity 
emanates, however, from the individual. It is he who 
has to proffer himself. 

4. It is duty to cultivate mind and body pre-eminently 
with a view to usefulness for the occupation chosen. 
The agriculturist needs, above all, strength and en- 
durance of body ; the artist dexterity and mobility of 
the same, and theoretical culture of mind is for their 
vocation only a means ; whereas the scholar has universal 
culture of the mind for his end, and to him the body 
is only means to support and maintain the mind in the 
sensuous world. In this respect the scholars seem to 
have had a pernicious influence on the opinion of 
the people. For them it is duty to study, and to 
systematically cultivate their understanding; for their 
vocation requires this. This, the duty of one vocation, 
many desire to make a general duty of mankind, and 
the meaning of their doctrines seems to be that all 
men ought to become scholars. Most visible this is 
still the case with the theologians, who seem to like 
to make all men as good theologians as they are them- 

u 



290 THE SCIENCE OF Er/ilCS. 

selves, and who consider their science as necessary for 
salvation. Hence it has chanced tliat far too lii^h value 
has heen put upon tlieoretical culture, even when it 
lacked other good qualities; and tliat in extreme cases 
persons have even asserted virtue and godliness to consist 
in solitary meditation and speculation. In the scholar 
this certainly is a virtue, but even in his case only in 
so far as his end is to communicate his studies. Other 
vocations "need of theoretical culture only sufficient to 
enable them to judge and understand what belongs to 
the labours of their vocation, and the perfecting of tlicir 
art ; but the chief point is, that they elevate themselves 
to moral acting; and for this, culture of the under- 
standing is not 80 much necessary as culture of the will. 



CHAPTER IV. 

concerning the general unconditioned duties. 

Preliminary. 

The final end of all actions of the morally good man, 
generally and particularly of all their external results, 
may be gathered into this formula : He desires that reason, 
ami only reason, should rule in the sensuous world. All 
physical power is to be subordinated to reason. 

Now reason can rule solely in and through rational 
beings. Hence moral acting relates itself always, even 
tiiough immediately it should be directed upon irrational 
nature, at least mediately to rational beings, and has only 
them in view. As there are no rights in regard to 
irrational nature, so are there no duties towards it. To 
act upon nature becomes duty solely for the sake of the 
rational beings. 

Hence the morally good man desires that reason and 
morality should rule in the community of rational 
beings. 

It is not merely the desire that the good and the 
rational should occur, but also that it should occur 
through freedom, in accordance with the Moral Law, 
or that true morality should rule. This is a chief point 
which is not to be overlooked, for the neglect of it 
has had a very pernicious and hurtful eü'ect upon the 
theory of morals, and thus also upon life, as we shall 
instance in the proper place. 

But no act is moral which is not the result of freedom. 

39t 



292 THE SCIENCE OE ETHICS. ^ 

Hence the formal freedom of all rational beings is tlis end 
of every morally good man, and we have, therefore, first 
of all things to speak : 

A. Conccrving our duties in relation to the formal 
freedom of others. 

All are to be formaliter free, without exception. But 
it may happen that someone may use his freedom, which 
belongs to himself, with the purpose of suppressing the 
freedom of others. Hence it will be our next task to 
investigate what duty may require in such a case, and 
we shall, therefore, have to speak : 

B. Concerning our duties in conßiets with the formal 
freedom of others. 

Finally, it is the will of the morally good man, that 
each one should exert his freedom to do his duty ; and it 
is his end and aim to promote morality amongst all 
rational beings. We shall therefore, in conclusion, have 
to speak : 

C. Concerning our duties in regard to the immediate 
promotion and extension of morality. 

A. The formal freedom of an individual consists in the 
continuous reciprocal relation between his body, as a tool 
and a sense, and the sensuous world, determined and 
determinable solely through the freely-created conception 
of the individual respecting the manner of this reciprocal 
relation. This freedom involves a twofold: i. The con- 
tinuation of the absolute freedom and inviolability of the 
body, so that it cannot be at all immediately influenced 
by physical power. . 2. The continuation of its free 
influence upon the whole sensuous world. (See the Science 
of Rights.) 

I. The regulation of the moral law respecting the 
bodies of rational beings outside of us may be regarded, 
firstly, negatively as a prohibition, and secondly, positively 
as a command. - 



THE THEORY OF DUTIES. 293 

The regulative principle of this judginont is as follows: 
Each human body is for the niorally-niinded man a tool 
to realize the moral law in the sensuous world. But 
such a tool it can only be on the condition that it remain 
utterly free, and dependent only upon the free will of 
the person. Immediately upon perceiving a human body, 
the command of the moral law, respecting this deter- 
mined body, is addressed to him. 

I do not add this without good reason, for someone 
might s*iy : " What matters it whether this or that body 
exist, the end and aim of reason will be realized anyhow ; 
and one body more or less makes no difference." I 
reply : This does not concern us in the least, and it is not 
at all permitted to us to think so. It suffices, that this 
single body exists also, and is likewise free ; and when 
we perceive him, the moral law commands us to regard 
him as such a one, who necessarily belongs to the com- 
munity of rational beings, and to the tools for the realiza- 
tion of the moral law. (Thus even here already do we 
catch a glimpse of the idea of a ruling of the moral law 
in the nature which exists independently of us, and of 
an adaptability of nature for the moral law ; an idea 
which finds its realization in the idea of a Godhead, but 
which we have not to discuss in this place.) 

{a) Considered negatively, this regulation is an absolute 
prohibition, never immediately to influence the body of 
another rational being. A human body is to depend 
solely upon the will of the person, and absolutely upon 
no external force. Mediately I am allowed to determine 
the body, i.e., I may determine the person, by means of 
rational argument, to cause his will to produce through 
his body these or those modifications in the sensuous 
world. 

But I must not use his body as a tool, as a means for 
my own will. I must not seek to influence his will 
through physical forces — blows, knocks, hunger, imprison- 
ment, or deprivation of freedom. I am permitted to 



294 THE SCIENCE OE ETHICS. 

influence him solely through rational grounds, and abso- 
lutely through no other means. 

Nor am I permitted to oppose in an immediate manner 
physical resistance to the causality of anotlier person 
upon the sensuous world. In what cases these general 
prohibitions cease we shall see hereafter. 

I am not allowed even to kill anyone intentionally: 
the death of a human being must never be the object of 
my action. The strict proof of this is as follows : The 
life of each man is a means for the realization of the 
moral law. Now I either hold it possible, in the case of 
a certain man, that he still may be or become such a 
means, or I do not consider it possible. If I do consider 
it possible, how can I, without refusing obedience to the 
moral law and making myself indifferent to its realiza- 
tion, annihilate the person who is, in my own conviction, 
destined to assist in its realization ? If I do not consider 
it possible, if I hold anyone to be an irredeemable villain, 
then my immorality consists precisely in ray thus holding 
him. For the moral law absolutely binds me to infuse 
moral culture into him, and to assist in making him 
better. Hence when I firmly resolve in my own mind 
that he is irreclaimable, I abandon a work assigned to 
me by that law. But this I must not do, and hence I 
also must not thus hold him. The moral law absolutely 
requires the faith that each man can be bettered. Now 
if this faith is necessary, then the first part of our argu- 
mentation again receives validity, and I cannot destroy 
a human life without abandoning my end and aim, and 
destroying the end of reason in him as much as lies in 
my power. Whosoever is to become moral must live. 

We have argued in this manner : it is absolutely 
required of me to promote morality in every individual. 
But this I cannot, without assuming the possibility of such 
morality. Hence, &c. 

The miiwr of this syllogism, which alone might need a 
proof, can be thus proven. I make something my 



THE THEORY OF DUTIES. 295 

end and object (here, for in.stance, the reform of an 
individual) signifies: I postulate the actuality of this 
reform in some future moment; but I postulate it 
signifies: I posit it as possible. Now the moral law 
absolutely requires me to have that end and object; 
lience it requires me to think everything involved in 
it. Precisely as we demonstrated above the necessity of 
faith in the perfectibility of the human race, so do we 
here prove the necessity of faith in the reform of every 
particular individual. 

Hence, as premeditated self-murder can on no con- 
dition co-exist with true morality, so can neither the 
premeditated murder of another, and for the very same 
reason. In another case a jiossible tool of the moral law 
is being annihilated. But it is very well possible that as 
it might become allowable to expose one's own life to 
danger, so it may also become a duty to expose the life of 
another to danger. We shall see in what cases. 

In my Science of Rights I have expressed myself 
concerning a pretended right of the State to take away 
the life of a criminal as follows : that the State, as iud^e. 
and as not a moral but merely a legal body, can only 
cancel the civil agreement between it and the criminal, 
thereby making the criminal an outlaw and a mere 
thing. Death may be the result of this annihilation 
of all the rights of the criminal, not however as a 
punishment, but as a means of security ; and hence it 
is not at all an act of the judicial, but simply of the 
police power. A single individual can and ought even to 
expose his own security for the sake of his duty : never to 
attack a human life; but Government has not the 
same right in regard to the security of all. In the same 
work I have also expressed myself concerning the killing 
of armed enemies in times of war, which may not only be 
lawful, but even a duty. The object of war is by no 
means to kill the citizens of the hostile State, but simply 
to drive them away or disarm them, thus renderino- 



296 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

the hostile State powerless, and compelling him to enter 
into a legal relation with our State. In hand-to-hand 
combat the single soldiers kill each other, not to kill each 
other but each to defend his own life; and this n.Tt 
by virtue of a right conferred l)y the State to kill, a right 
which the State cannot confer, but in virtue of his 
own right and duty to defend himself. 

(6) The disposition of the moral law in regard to 
the bodies of rational beings outside of us in its positive 
character, and as a command, involves the following : 

The health, strength, and preservation of the body and 
life of others is to be an end to us. We must not 
only oppose no obstacle to this preservation, but must 
promote it in the same degree as the welfare of our 
own bodies. The strict proof of this is as follows : 
Each human body is tool for the promotion of the final 
end of reason. Now, if the latter is indeed my highest 
final end, then the preservation and highest possible 
adaptability of the body for that end must be also 
my object; for I cannot desire the conditioned without 
desiring the condition. The preservation of each other 
person must be as dear to me as my own, since the ground 
why I desire either, is the same : I preserve and take care 
of myself solely as a tool of the moral law. But each 
body is also such tool. Hence I must have the same care 
for each body, if I really am impelled only by the 
moral law. 

Here we meet for the first time with the proposition : 
take as much care of the welfare of your fellow-men as of 
your own ; love thy neighbour as thyself ; a proposition 
which will hereafter be regulative in all positive duties 
against others. The ground of it has been stated : to wit, 
I can and am allowed to take care of myself solely in so 
far as I am tool of the moral law, but all others are so 
likewise. In this manner we receive at the same time an 
infallible criterion as to whether the care for ourself is 
a moral or merely a natural impiüse. If it is moral 



THE THEORY OF DUTIES. 297 

we sliall liave the same care for otliers ; if it is natural, it 
is exclusive, for the natural inipuLse refers only to us; and 
sympathy, which is also a natural impulse exciting fellow- 
feeling in the fate of others, is by far weaker in its efiects 
than the imn^ediate natural impulse of self-preservation. 
In sympathizing, we always first think of ourselves, and 
next of our neighbours. 

I am to have the same care for the welfare of others as 
for my own. Now according to the above I do not 
care for my own welfare, nor think, indeed, at all of my- 
self, until I am reminded of myself by a feeling of 
weakening and losing of strength, or through some danger 
threatening ray self-preservation. It is the same with 
the care for the preservation of others. It does not mean 
that I am to do nothing else than seek opportunities 
to save persons' health and life — unless, indeed, such is my 
special vocation. But as soon as anyone is in danger 
I am absolutely required to assist him, even at the risk of 
my own life, whether the danger comes from irrational 
physical power of Nature, or from the attacks of rational 
beinijs. 

I say, at the risk of my own life. There occurs here no 
collision of duties, as might be apprehended. My preser- 
vation is conditioned through that of the other, that 
of the other through mine. Both are indeed altogether 
equal, of the same value and from the same reason. It is 
not my intention that either of us should perish in it, but 
that both should be preserved. If nevertheless one of us 
perishes I am not responsible for it ; I have done my 
duty. 

(It is an idle plea to appeal to the duty of self-preser- 
vation when the other one is in danger ; self-preservation 
has ceased to be a duty. Correctly translated that plea 
means : we will save the other one if we are safe in doinfr 
it. This is certainly noble and great ! Not to wish 
to save a human life, where we could do so without any 
danger to ourselves, would bß evident murder.. Nor 



298 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS 

are we in such cases first to calculate, as some moralists 
hold, whose life might be of greatest value, and whose 
• preservation of most importance. Before the moral law, 
human life in general is of equal value, and when one 
human life is endangered all other human beings have no 
longer a right to be secure until the one is saved. It is 
truly a great and moral word, which the late Duke 
Leopold spoke, when he said, " Here a human life is at 
stake : what am I more here than you ? ") 

2. The formal freedom of an individual, which the 
moral law requires us to respect and promote, involves 
secondly, the continuation of his free influence upon the 
sensuous world. The act of the individual is to result in 
that which he had in view when he began to act, for only 
on this condition is he free. 

I. Such a causality is conditioned firstly by a correct 
understanding of that which the act of the individual 
has for its object. 1 cannot work on anything unless I 
have a knowledge of it, and the end I have in view is 
determined by this my knowledge of the actual being 
and independent quality of the thing. The end I have 
in view proceeds from the present quality of the thing, 
and governs itself according to the natural laws of the 
thing. If I have an incorrect conception of the object 
of my act, my act will result in quite a different end 
than that which I had in view, and hence I am not 
free in my causality. I must will the conditioned, the 
free causality of my fellow-men in the sensuous world, 
and hence I must also will the condition, that they shall 
have a correct cognition of the same, sufficient for their 
causality. This correctness of their practical cognition 
must be an object to me, precisely in the same measure 
as the correctness of my own practical cognition is an 
end to me. 

a. This disposition of the Moral Law considered 
negatively results in the prohibition, absolutely not to 
lead the other into error, not to lie to him, or deceive 



THE THEORY OF DUTIES. 2()() 

him, neither directly by categorically assorting what I 
myself do not consider true; nor indirectly by making 
anil)iguous statements which I intend shall deceive him. 
The latter is as much a lie as the former; for not tlie 
words which I use, but the intentions, constitute the lie. 
If I intend to deceive I am a liar, whether I tell the lie 
straightway, or merely induce the otlier to infer it. 
Of course, whether I actually have or have )iot the 
intention that he should thus infer it, or wliether the 
ambiguity of my statement may not result accidentally, I 
must decide before my own conscience. 

In short : I positively owe every man absolute frank- 
ness and truthfulness ; I must not speak anything against 
the truth. Whether and in how far I also owe all men 
openness, i.e., whether I must also say all the truth 
which I know, we shall see hereafter. 

The strict proof of our proposition is as follows : I 
have moral sentiment, I consider my fellow-man as a 
tool of the Moral Law, that is to say, as one who is 
always to choose after his own insight and from his own 
good will. Now if I produce in him an incorrect know- 
ledge, in accordance wherewith he acts, then that which 
resiilts has not been selected through himself, but he has 
been made a means for my end ; and this is immoral. 
If thereby I induce liim to commit an illegal act — which 
may be moral for him because he starts from incorrect 
presuppositions supplied by me — my guilt is evident. 
I had an immoral end in view, and have used the other 
— perhaps contrary to his own mode of thinking — as a 
tool. But apart even from this abuse ot the other, the 
guilt is as much my own as if I had committed the act 
in person, which I induced him to commit through 
misrepresentation. I am the true culprit. But even 
if I had really calculated upon a legal act, and had 
attamed it thus through means of the other, I should 
have acted immorally. The other is to do that which 
is right, not from error, but from love for the good. I 



300 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

am not at all permitted to intend mere legality; my 
end shonld be morality, and I cannot have the former 
alone in view without abandoning the other, and to do 
this is immoral. 

"But," objects a defendant of that immoral doctrine 
of morals, " 1 knew that the other could only be induced 
by this means to do the good deed," I reply : Tliis you 
can never know, and should not believe; for such a 
distrust of the other's rationality is immoral. ^Moreover, 
supposing even it had ha])pencd so, and that the other 
had not done the good deed which you claim to have had 
alone in view, unless you had made tlie misrepresentation 
in question— you would be utterly innocent in the matter. 
For it is not at all your moral duty to realize the good 
without regard to the means ; the good is to be realized 
through morality, and otherwise it is not good. Precisely 
by abandoning the form in which alone the essence of 
the good consists, and by having only the content in 
view, do you clearly show yourself to be actuated in 
that good deed, not by interest in the cause of morality, 
but by some advantage or another, for only the latter 
is satisfied by the content of the deed. 

These same arguments are to be applied to him who 
perhaps seeks to defend a lie by the plea that he intended 
to prevent an evil by it. He should hate and prevent 
a wrong, not for the sake of the act as such, but for 
the sake of its immorality. If anyone asks him for 
the truth of a matter with evil intentions, he must not 
tell a lie; he may tell the truth, and if he does and 
knows the evil intentions of the other, he ought, to 
convince the other of the wickedness of his intentions. 
He has not a right to suppose that these remonstrances 
will be of no avail, but even if they really do no benefit, 
physical resistance still remains open to him. Thus the 
pretext that the lie was for a good intention is for ever 
annulled ; the results of a lie are never good. 

The subject-matter of i^y statement may be either 



THE THEORY OF DUTIES. 301 

nature, to wliich in this rospcct the disposition of other 
free beings does also belong, or my own disposition. In 
the latter case I make a promise ; I must hold my promise, 
unless indeed I have promised an immoral act. 

"But," it might be objected, " I may change my opinion 
and my measures respecting that which I have promised." 
We reply : When I have promised and thus induced 
another one to shape his calculations in accordance witli 
my statement, I am no longer dependent merely upon 
myself, but likewise upon the other. In so far I am 
in his service, and I cannot withdraw my word witiiout 
destroying those actions of his which he has undertaken 
in view of my promise, and hence without annihilating 
his causality in the sensuous world. I may remonstrate 
with, and thus induce him to relieve me of my promise ; 
but only in so far as he thus releases me am I quit of my 
promise. He makes me a present of it. A good advice 
concerning the difficulties which arise from promises 
respecting matters about which one may apprehend a 
change of views, and which depend indeed upon future 
events, is this : not to make promises too easily. 

I said : I must keep my word unless I have promised 
an immoral action. This needs a more particular specifi- 
cation. For everything is immoral for me, which I know 
to be not the best, or concerning which I am merely 
indifferent; hence it would seem that I must do no 
promised action whenever I have changed my views 
resarding it, or become dubious as to whether I am 
able to fulfil it. The reply to this is as follows : whatso- 
ever does not absolutely contradict morality, and hence 
whatsoever lies on the road to the attainment of the 
final end of reason, I must do for the sake of the 
other, although I might do better for my own person. 
Only that which is absolutely opposed to morality must 
I positively not do. Hence I fulfil the promise for the 
other's sake, though I might do better so far as my own 
person is concerned. > * 



302 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

At tlie Bunio time we shall here reply to two other 
questions which force themselves upon us on tljis 
occasion. 

Firstly: how conies it that so many men, who wish 
to pass for honest and not unreasonable men, defend 
" necessary lies," and seek up all possible arguments to 
gloss them over ? It comes from this. In our age, tlie 
men who form their minds and their natural character 
in accordance with that age, are placed by this sort of 
culture — which, however, is not the culture through 
freedom — upon that standpoint which we have described 
more particularly above. Their empirical Ego is to rule 
the world without regard to the freedom of others ; they 
want to make happy, protect, and beatify this workl 
according to their individual conceptions of happiness, 
beatitude, and misery. This is their chief aim. But 
with the weakness which our age is not unjustly charged 
with, in their character they lack the strength of resolu- 
tion to realize their arbitrary ends by force, and hence 
they conclude to realize them through cunning, which 
necessarily leads to the so-called white lies. This, their 
internal mode of thinking, of course determines also their 
theoretical system, unless they are philosophers capable 
of starting from the absolutely highest principles. They 
start from the facts within them, from their impulse 
to lay down the law, and their lack of courage to do 
so by force, and from the basis of these facts they 
proceed logically enough. Why, nevertheless, some of 
them, when it comes to carrying the theory into action, 
depart from it, is explained by this : something else 
which lies also as a fact in them, but too deeply to 
influence their arguing ; namely, their feeling of honour 
prevents them from making use of their theory. 

Secondly : whence comes that internal shame for one's 
self, which manifests itself even stronger in the case 
of a lie than in the case of any other violation of 
conscience? The ground is as follows: The liar has 



THE THEORY OF DUTIES. 303 

the mode of thitikin;^ jibove described. He wanlB to 
subject the otlicr to his views and purposes. He does 
this by again deceivini^ly and for appearance'« sake 
subjecting himself to the purposes of the otlicr, Ity 
seemingly entering into the other's plans, approving his 
views, and pretending to promote them. He thus places 
himself in contradiction with himself, subjects himself 
to the man whom he does not trust himself openly 
to resist, and is a coward. The lie is always and in 
every case accompanied by cowardice. But nothing so 
much dishonours us before ourselves as want of courage. 

As for the rest, the defence of " white lies," or, indeed, 
of lies in general, no matter for what good purpose, is, 
doubtless, the most absurd and, at the same time, the 
most wicked arguing ever heard amongst men. It is 
the most absurd. You tell me you have convinced 
yourself that necessary lies are permitted. If I am to 
beheve you, I must at the same time also not believe 
you ; for I cannot know whether in saying so you are 
not prompted by some laudable purpose or another — for 
who can know all your purposes ? — and that you do not 
make use of your own maxim against me, and wliether 
your assurance, that you consider necessary lies allowable, 
is not itself a necessary lie. A person who really had 
such a maxim could neither desire to confess it, nor 
to make it the maxim of anyone else ; but only to 
carefully guard it for himself. For this maxim, by being 
communicated, annihilates itself. Of whomsoever it is 
known that he possess it, rationally no trust can be 
any more entertained by any man ; for no one can know 
that man's secret purposes, and judge whether he is not 
at the moment telling a necessary lie. But when no one 
has any longer confidence in him, he can no longer 
deceive anyone by lies. Now it is doubtless absurdity 
to demand belief in a maxim which, 'when believed in, 
cancels itself. 

But tlie defence of necessary lies is also the most 



304 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

wicked argument possiljlo amongst men, for the defender 
thereby discovers his thorouglily corrupted mode of 
thinking. The true seat of your wickedness is precisely 
that you could hut think of a lie as a possible means of 
escape in certain difficulties, .and that you can now 
consult whether it may not be allowable so to use it. 
Naturally there is no impulse in man to tell a lie; 
nature goes straightway towards enjoyment, and a moral 
mode of thinking knows not lying ; to think a lie it 
needs a positive evil, an intentional lookinr/-out for some 
crooked road, because we do not like to go the straight 
one before us. An honest man does not even think 
of such a means of escape, and if all men were honest, 
neither the conception of a lie would have entered into 
the system of human conceptions, nor an investigation 
concerning the morality of necessary lies in the Science 
of Morals. 

The customary illustration of the scliools can explain 
our thoughts. A man, pursued by his enemy with 
drawn sword, conceals himself in your presence. His 
enemy arrives and asks you, where he is. If you tell 
the truth an innocent person is murdered; hence, con- 
clude some, you must lie about it. How do those, 
who conclude thus, get over so many possible means 
which the straight way before them holds up to them, 
into the crooked path ? Firstly : why are you obliged 
to tell the questioner cither the truth or the liel Why 
not the third, which lies between, that you owe him 
no answer, that he seems to have an evil intention, that 
you advise him to desist from it kindly, and that, if 
he will not do so, you are resolved to take the ^mrt 
of the persecuted, - and to defend him at the risk of 
your own life, which latter is, after all, only your absolute 
duty? "But," you reply, "if I do so all his rage will 
turn against me ! " I pray you, how does it happen, that 
you only consider this case as possible, whereas the 
second case, that your opponent, struck by the justice and 



THE THJtORY OF DUTIES. 305 

boldness of your rosistmice, may desisb from the perse- 
cution of his enemy, may cool off and become tractable, 
docs also belong amongst the ])08sibilitics ? But let us 
assume even that he does attack yourself. Why do you 
absolutely wish to avoid that? It is anyhow your duty 
to defend the persecuted man at the risk of your own 
life, for as soon as human life is in danger you have no 
longer a right to think of the safety of your own life. This 
fact alone is enough to show that the first object of your 
lie was not to save the life of your neighbour, but merely 
to escape yourself with a whole skin ; and, moreover, in 
a case where your danger was not even real, but merely 
one of several possibilities. Hence you resolved to lie 
merely to escape the remote possibility of coming to 
grief! Therefore, let him attack you! Does then this 
mere attack of itself overwhelm you, as you seem again 
to assume without regard to all possible other cases ? He 
who was first persecuted has, as we have assumed, con- 
cealed himself within your proximity. At present you 
are in danger, and it is now his general duty, and, 
moreover, his particular duty as a matter of gratitude, 
to come to your assistance. Where do you get the 
decided presupposition that he will not do so ? But 
supposing he does not come to your assistance. In that 
case you have gained time for assistance, and others 
may happen to come to your assistance. But even 
assuming that all this should not occur, how can you 
be so very sure that you will be defeated ? Do you then 
count as nothing the power which fixed resolve to sufier 
no injustice, and the enthusiasm for your good cause, 
must infuse into your body ? nor the weakness wherewith 
confusion and consciousness of his injustice must over- 
whelm your opponent ? In the worst case you can die ; 
and after you are dead you are no longer obliged to 
protect the life of the attacked; not to mention that 
death saves you from the danger of a lie. Hence death 
precedes the lie, and a lie is never to be spoken. You 
X • 



3o6 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

cninmence with the lie because you have an eye only 
for the crooked path, and the straight path does not 
even exist for you. 

5. The proposition, that the correctness of the cog- 
nition of others must be our end and aim, wlien ai)plied 
positively, results in the command to promote the correct 
insight of others, and to actually communicate to them 
the truth, which we know. 

We only need to point out the ground of this command 
in order to see at once how far it extends, since it may be 
well foreseen that it can be valid only within limits. I 
am obliged to regard the other as a tool of the ]\Ioral 
Law. But a result corresponding to his conception can 
follow only in so far as he has a correct cognition of the 
object of his action. I am bound to promote his causality, 
and hence I am bound to communicate correct knowledge 
to him, even without his request. To do so is, indeed, 
necessary end for me in myself. But in how far? Of 
course, in so far as his cognition has immediate influence 
upon his acting, or in so far as it is immediately practical 
to him. Hence a distinction should be made between 
immediate practical cognitions and purely theoretical cog- 
nitions. But all theory relates to practice, as a thorough 
transcendental philosophy shows, and a theory is not at 
all possible without such relations. Hence the distinction 
first made is altogether relative. Certain things may be 
purely theoretical for one individual and for one age, 
which for another individual or for another age is prac- 
tical. Hence, to know what truth we owe to an indi- 
vidual, we must first be able to determine what truth is 
practical for such individual. How is this possible for us ? 

It follows immediately from the acting of each indi- 
vidual. The knowledge of the object of his acting is 
immediately practical to him, and nothing else. Hence, 
if I see my fellow-man act, and have reason to assume 
that he is not well cognizant of the state of circumstances 
respecting such act, or if I know for certain that he has 



THE THEORY OF DUTIES. 307 

an incorrect view of the same, it bei;omes my duty, 
without further ado, or without awaiting his rer^uest, to 
dispel his error; for he is in a sort of danger to do 
something which will not achieve his purpose, and it ih 
not indifferent to a moral mode of thinking whether this 
occurs or not. I cannot morally permit him to remain in 
error. 

I have always spoken of immediate practical truth, 
and have presupposed that it is precisely because I 
happen to be the tirst and nearest, why it should be 
my duty to communicate it. It is, of course, not to be 
understood here, as has already been remarked in regard 
to another duty, that we should hunt up opportunities to 
lead erring men into the riglit path. To do this we have 
not time, if we always do what first occurs to us ; and our 
virtue should, moreover, be natural — should always do 
what it is requested to do, and not, perhaps, go in search 
of adventures, for this is no truly virtuovs sentiment. 

To hunt up and make known truth, which is merely 
theoretical, either for the age in general or for most of 
the individuals of that age, is the duty of a particular 
vocation — of the vocation of a scholar. This theoretical 
truth is to become practical, but cannot become so 
immediately and all at once, for on the way to the 
perfectibility of the human race no step can be leaped 
over. This class of scholars works for the future ages, 
and stores up, as it were, treasures which can only be 
made use of in those future ages. Of the duties of these 
scholars we shall speak hereafter. 

3. The formal freedom of an individual involves, as 
we have seen (i), the absolute freedom of the body, and 
(2) the continuation of its free influence upon the whole 
sensuous world. The latter causality we have just seen 
to be conditioned by correctness of cognition, which gave 
us the moral duties, negatively, not to lie; positively, 
to correct errors of practical cognition. But the latter 
causality has yet another condition. 



3o8 TlfE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

If tlio rational ])(!ing is to be free in its causality, ix., if 
the causality is to result in that which the rational being 
had intended, then the state of all that, Avhich has 
reference to and which influences this causality, must 
continue to remain precisely as it was known to be and 
calculated upon in the purpose and intention of the 
rational being. For if it ciiangcs during the act of the 
individual, then the effect of that act also changes, and 
the result is not as had been intended. (For further 
proof of this, in itself, very evident proposition, I refer 
to my Science of liifjhts.) 

That, which thus relates to my acting, and which is, as 
it were, the premise of all my acting in the sensuous 
world, can only be as part of that sensuous world, if I 
live amongst other free beings. This determined part of 
the world, thus subjected to my purpose and intentions, 
is called, when recognized and guaranteed by society (and 
this recognition and guarantee is legally and morally 
necessary), my property. Without such recognition I 
could never be sure that my acting did not limit the 
freedom of others, and hence I could never act with good 
conscience. Only on the condition, that all recognize and 
guarantee for me a sphere for my free acting, and thus 
assure me that my acting within such sphere will not 
disturb their freedom, can I, with good conscience, act at 
all. This recognition occurs immediately through the 
state wherein I live. How it occurs mediately from the 
whole human race, has been shown in my Science of Eiyhts. 

It is, therefore, firstly, the duty of everyone, who has 
reached this insight, to introduce right of property, which 
indeed does not come of itself, but must be introduced 
intentionally, and according to a fixed conception. It is, 
moreover, the duty of each to acquire property, for it is 
his duty to act with freedom ; and this he cannot do, 
because he is not sure whether he may not disturb the 
freedom of others, unless he has property. This we say 
here preliminarily, as a closer determination of the pro- 



THE THEORY OF DUTIES. 309 

position already cstablislicd, tliat a state imist be erected, 
and that each individual must become a member of il. 
The freedom of each individual is to me an absolute 
end, commanded l»y the moral law. This freedom is 
conditioned by his having property and retaining it 
inviolable. Hence the latter, as the condition of my 
end, is also itself sucli end. 

a. Tliis disposition of tbe moral law, regarded negatively, 
results in the prohibition : never to injure or diminish %n 
any manner anyone s property, nor to render more di'ßcuU 
its utility to the proprietor. 

Firstly : I must not use his property for my own 
purposes, through robbery, theft, cheating, cunning, or 
overreaching — all of which acts are, indeed, prohibited 
for the very sake of their forms; the former, because 
they involve an attack upon the body and life of the 
other, and the latter because they presuppose falseness 
and lying. But at present we look merely to the content 
of these acts, namely, that they constitute a deprivation 
of the other's property. They are prohibited, because 
they interfere with the freedom of the person thus 
deprived of his property. He has calculated upon its 
continued i^ossession, and has taken his measures accord- 
ingly. If he is deprived of it altogether, his sphere of 
causality and the measure of his physical power is 
diminished ; if he has to acquire it again, he is at least 
retarded in the course of his activity, and is forced to do 
again what he had done already once before. 

That immoral doctrine of morals, which generally 
pretends good ends to excuse bad means, and which has 
been called Jesuitical morality (although we do not mean 
to say that all Jesuits hold to it, and that none but 
Jesuits hold to it), might object to the above proposition, 
and, in fact, does object to the following : " Provided the 
goods thus taken are not destroyed, but merely made 
temporary use of, the final promotion of the end of 
reason is not checked, nay, is perhaps aided; if for 



3IO THE SCIENCE OF ET/HCS. 

instance, the ]iarty wlio took the goods employs them 
better than the old proprietor would i)ave employed 
them. Supposing tiic one who takes them knows that 
the original pro])rietor is going to make a bad use of 
them, and himself intends a very laiulable use to the 
greater glory of God and greater service of his neiglibour : 
would he not act very morally, according to your own 
principles ?" 

I reply : To promote the good is a command addressed 
to me conditionally, namely, in so far as it comes within 
my sphere and stands within the power rightfully belong- 
ing to me ; but to interfere with the freedom of the other 
I am unconditionally prohibited. 

The reason why theft and tlie overreaching of the other 
for the sake of pretended good purposes, are not defended 
with the same obstinacy as " necessary lies," arises from 
the fact that our civil laws, which have the preservation 
of property at heart, above all other things, and have 
placed severe punishment on its violation, have differently 
formed our modes of thinking concerning this matter. 
The New Zealander, for whom civil laws have not done 
the same, doubtless steals for good purposes, as we live 
for good purposes. 

Secondly, I must not damage the pro^^erty of the other, 
neither intentionally, and with evil purpose in view, nor 
from carelessness ; and from the same reason, namely, 
because the free use of his property, and hence his 
freedom generally, is thereby checked. So far as inten- 
tional damage is concerned, not even a sophistry can be 
produced in its defence ; it is absolutely immoral. So 
far as damage through carelessness is concerned, it is my 
duty to take the same care to protect the other's property, 
which I take to preserve my own; for it is an end to me 
from the same reason as my own, namely, as a means to 
promote the rule of reason. 

Finally, it is prohibited to render more difficult the 
utilizing of his property to the owner. The ground of 



THE THEORY OF DUTIES. 311 

the prohi1)ition in clear. 'J'ho object of the property is, 
that the owner should freely use it to promote his ciiiIk, 
which I must assume {is tending to realize the rule of 
reason. To check the free use of his property is therefore 
equal to cancelling the end of all property, and is, there- 
fore, essentially the same as robbery. It is no excuse 
that I intended thereby to prevent an evil and injurious 
use of it. 

To restore what has been taken or damaged, is always 
duty. Without restoration there is no forgiveness, i.e., no 
reconciliation with myself. The strict proof is as 
follows: He who thinks morally does not desire to 
damage the other's property. But this damage continues 
in its consequences until the coznplete restoration has 
been accomplished. As sure as I therefore return to a 
moral mode of thinking, I desire to have the conse- 
quences cancelled, and thus the act annihilated ; and in 
obedience to this desire I must do all in my power to 
realize it. 

h. The 2^osüive application of the requirement of the 
moral law, that the property of the others shall be an end 
to me, because it is a condition of their formal lawful 
freedom, involves the following commands : 

Firstly: Each man who attains the use of his reason 
must have property. The proof has been furnished 
above. He must be able to act freely. 

Now the care to provide for everyone's property 
belongs, first of all, to the State. Strictly speaking, 
there is no rightful property at all in a State, where but 
a single individual lacks property; i.e., in the truest 
sense of the word, as signifying the exclusive sphere for 
free activity, and hence not merely objects, but likewise 
exclusive rights, to certain arts (professions). For each 
one owns his property only in so far as all others have 
recognized it ; but they cannot have thus recognized it 
unless he in return has recognized their property like- 
wise. Hence they must possess property. He who has 



312 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

none, has not relinquished his claim to that of the others, 
and therefore very justly claims it. This is the legal 
aspect of the case. Hence it is the first duty of anyone 
who has convinced himself of this truth, to do what is in 
his power to have it recognized and carried out in his 
State. 

But until this is done — and why sliould it not be done 
once ? — it is the duty of each one to give to him who has 
no property, some property ; or, in other words, it is his 
duty to be benevolent, l^enevolence, however, as everyone 
will perceive, is a conditioned duty; it would not need 
to act if the State did what it ought to do. 

Let it be well observed : Benevolence consists in pro- 
curing property for those who have none, or in securing to 
them a certain and continued livelihood. We should try 
and help one, or many, if possible, thoroughly, and for ail 
future time ; to obtain situations for those who have none, 
labour for the labourless ; give, or loan, to the needy so 
that they may again resume their work; educate, or assist 
in educating, orphans, &c., &c, ; in short, we should do 
wholly as many works of benevolence as possible, and not 
merely put a little patch here or there. Only thus is our 
benevolence ratio<ial and considerate. The proof lies in 
the conception of benevolence ; each one is to have 
property. 

The usual giving of alms is a very doubtful good work. 
He who gives an alms which does not alleviate altogether, 
can rationally only have in mind to say: I cannot help 
or will not help you; hunt up otliers to do it; and so 
that you may be able to make your living until then, I 
offer you this gift. The duty of almsgiving results from 
the duty to preserve the life of our fellow-men. 

The imploring of help from our fellow-men can have 
no other object than to find a vocation and property from 
individuals, since the State refused it to us. Xow that 
men should have no other end in begging alms, and should 
make begging a vocation, is positively not to be tolerated; 



THE THEORY OE DUTIES. 313 

nnd if the State tolerates it, it is the duty of each indi- 
vidual to do as much as possible to defeat this end, 
and by no means to promote it tlirough inconsiderate 
weak-heartedness and wrongly understood duty. It is 
understood that each one must be sure in his conscience 
that he does not refuse benevolence from avarice and 
natural hard-heartedncss, merely pretending that higher 
principle ; and whether this is so or not will easily appear 
by noticing whether such a person does carry out the 
prescribed works of a rational benevolence, whenever an 
opportunity offers. How far do those depart from reason 
and truth who make the giving of alms a religious exer- 
cise, and who tolerate and promote beggary, so that the 
faithful ones may not lack opportunity to do good works ! 
As if such opportunities could ever lack ! 

How far, then, does the duty of benevolence extend ? 
Is it sufficient to practise it so far as it does not become 
troublesome to us at all, and to give away only that 
which we cannot make use of ? By no means ; we must 
take away from ourselves, retrench our own expenses, 
Ijecome more economical, and labour more, in order to be 
able to do more charity; for he who is without property 
has a claim upon our property. 

Lest this may be turned around, and the conclusion 
drawn that the poor have therefore a right to compel 
support, I add the following. Those who are without 
property have certainly a right to compel it from the 
State, and it is the business of both poor and rich to 
labour and bring the State to a recognition and execution 
of this, its duty. But so far as individuals are concerned, 
the poor man can never know whether it is precisely this 
one's duty, or whether that one is in a position to extend 
charity to him, or whether higher duties may not restrain 
them. 

- Secondly. Each one must retain what is his, for other- 
wise his formal freedom is disturbed. Hence it is duty to 
protect the property of the other against every attack, 



314 TUE SCIENCE OE ETHTCS. 

and witliout waiting to be requested ; and so to defiMid it 
in the same measure as we would defend our own, for the 
defence of both is means to promote the rule of reason ; 
and whether the attack be made by irrational forces of 
Nature (fire and water), or by the injustice of rational 
beings, and by the latter through violence or cunning. 
Since the safety of his property is to bo as dear to me as 
my own, it is immediately evident that I must undertake 
the defence of his at the risk of my own. How far this 
extends, and in how far I am obliged to defend it at the 
risk even of my life, we shall see in the following. 

Thirdly : Property is an object of duty because it is a 
condition and tool of freedom. It is the end and aim of 
a morally-minded man, that others sliall have as much 
freedom — i.e., power and causality in the sensuous world 
— as possible, ;in order thus to promote the final end of 
reason. Hence it is also a duty to increase the utility 
of the property of others. To accomplish much, it is not 
80 much necessary to possess a large amount of means, as 
to have thorough control over those which we jiossess, so 
that we may effect by them all that we desire to effect. 
It is not a large, but a well-tiained body, completely 
under the domination of the will, which makes us free 
and independent; and, in like manner, it is not a large 
property, but a well-arranged property, which is easily 
handled, and immediately applicable for every puqDose, 
whereby we grow independent ; and as it is our duty to 
bring our property into this condition, so it is now our 
duty to have the same intention respecting the jjroj^erty 
of others. Thus we should be ready to give advice and 
assistance to others, though never forcing them ujDon 
others ; and also to allow to our neighbour that which 
will do him more good, in his position, than it would 
benefit us. In short, readiness to oblige is a duty ; its 
motive, however, must never be inconsiderate good- 
heartedness, but the clearly-thought intention to promote 
the causality of reason, as much as possible. It is a duty 



THE THEORY OF DUTIES. 315 

to refuse entreaties, the granting of wliich, according 
to our own l)est insight, would do our neighbour more 
injury than good ; but such refusal should be accom- 
panied by rational arguments to correct tlie ollier's 
conceptions, and induce him voluntarily to desist from 
his entreaties. 

Fourthly : The whole sensuous world is to be brouglit 
under tlie rule of reason, and to become its tool in the 
hands of rational beings. But in the present sensuo\is 
world all things are connected with each other, and 
hence no part thereof is wholly and unlimitcdly under 
the dominion of reason, unless all parts are so. Applying 
this here, it results in the command : That everything 
useful in the world must be put to use; and since it can 
be put to proper use only in becoming property, that 
everything must become property. It is the end of tlie 
morally good man to bring this about. As every man is 
to have a property, so shall also each object in this world 
be the property of some one man. 

Particularly through the practice of these third and 
fourth conmiandments, is the dominion of reason in the 
sensuous world put upon the most solid basis. Through 
the third, that each one should care, not only for the use 
of his own property, and for the attainment of his private 
ends, but likewise for the proper utilizing of the property 
of all : should work for, and promote their activity as 
they all should promote his : Eeason is united into one, 
and becomes one and the same will in the minds of all, 
however empirically different they may be. Through the 
fourth and last, all Nature is comprehended by, and 
gathered together under, this one will. Reason is a unit 
in itself, and the sensuous world is subordinated to it. 
This is the end proposed to us. 

B. There is no contiict between the freedom of rational 
beings m general, i.e., it is not a contradiction, that many 
beings in the same sensuous world should be free. There 



3i6 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

is only one case, whero the possibility of freedom for 
many, or the possibility of the co-existence of two 
rational individuals, is cancelled by Nature itself ; and of 
this case we shall speak hereafter. A conilict between 
determined free acts of ratioiml beings arises only wlien 
one person uses his freedom illegally or immorally for the 
suppression of the freedom of the other. All of which 
will appear hereafter. 

All shall be free. The use of freedom in many in- 
dividuals must not mutually check and contradict itself 
This is alsolute requirement of the moral law, and hence 
it is the duty of each to promote the co-existence of the 
freedom of all. But this co-existence is only possiljle 
through each person limiting with freedom — for each is 
to be and remain free — the use of his freedom to ;i 
certain sphere, which all others exclusively leave to him : 
and leaving on his part to the others all the rest for 
division amongst themselves. Thus in the same sensuous 
world each one is free in his part w'ithout checking the 
freedom of anyone else. This idea is realized in the 
State, which, moreover, since the good will of the in- 
dividual cannot be counted upon, keeps each individual 
within his limits. What each one's duty is in respect to 
the State we have already shown. The State thus keeps 
us by compulsion in the order which it has established 
amongst the individuals. Hence if a conflict arises 
amongst them respecting the use of their freedom, it is 
the duty of the State to settle such conflict ; and it is 
the duty of each individual to leave the settlement of 
such conflict to the State. Hence, for the present, it is 
not at all to be seen how individuals can have duties in 
conflicts of their freedom. It rather seems as if each 
one had fulfilled this duty, fully in advance, by assisting 
in the establishment of a State, and subjecting himself 
to its laws. But it happens often that the State cannot 
settle such conflicts immediately, and it is in such cases 
that the duties of the private individual arise again. 



THE THEORY OF DUTIES. 317 

Thus we have gained for the present this pro])ORition : all 
duties of which we shall speak at present can only arise 
in cases where the State cannot assist, and only in so far 
as the State cannot assist. What this may mean will 
appear in the separate instances. 

But we must preface another remark. It is all the 
same whether my own freedom, or tlie freedom of one of 
my fellow-men, is endangered througli tlie illegal use of 
freedom on the part of another; for, as has often been 
stated, the freedom of the other is entrusted to my care 
from the same ground as my own, and hence is end for 
me to the same degree. There is no distinction between 
the duty of self-defence and that of the defence of others; 
both are the same duty of the defence of freedom in 
general. 

Freedom is, as we have seen, conditioned by life, body, 
and property. True, tlie use of freedom also requires 
cognition of truth ; but there never can arise a conflict 
between the cognition of different persons, since truth is 
not divisible like bodies and goods, but is one and the 
same, common equally to all ; and since there is not for 
each individual a separate truth, as there is for each an 
own body and separate property : hence the following 
cases of possible conflicts arise : 

1. The preservation of the bodies and lives of difterent 
persons may be in conflict. 

2. The preservation of the property of different persons 
may be in conflict. 

3. The preservation of body and life, and the preserva- 
tion of property may be in conflict. 

I. Firstly. The preservation of my own life and the 
preservation of tlie, life of another^ it appears, in certain 
cases cannot co-exist together ; and this not through any 
injustice of my own or of the other, but simply through 
a disposition of Nature. Nature apparently withdraws 
the possibility of the co-existence of both. Instances I 
will not cite. In the Science of Rights^ the case has been 



3r8 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

tcratcd at length, and decided as follows : that in such a 
case the question of rights docs not occur at all, and 
since in that science only rights are taken cognizance of, 
the matter is left to the arbitrariness of each. 

lUit the moral law decides quite dilTercntly. I shall 
preserve my own life as tool of tlie moral law; but I 
shall likewise preserve the life of the other from the 
same ground. The moral law commands both equally 
unconditionally. We are both to be regarded as tools 
of the moral law, and simply, as such, objects of a duty. 
The natural impulse, of course, leads me to prefer myself ; 
but that impulse is not to be counted on at all, and, 
according to the moral law, neither of us has advantages, 
since in the face of this law we are both equally means 
of the same reason. I cannot fulfil the command of the 
moral law to preserve myself, except at the expense of 
the life of the other, according to our presupposition ; 
and this the moral law prohibits. I cannot save the life 
of the other, except at the expense of my own ; and this 
the moral law prohibits likewise. Each command of the 
moral law is in this case opposed by a prohiljition : hence 
both commands annihilate each other ; the law is utterly 
silent, and I, who am impelled only by it, must do 
nothing, but must quietly await the issue. 

In our proof this proposition occurs : we are both 
equally tools of the moral law. Tliis proposition has 
been attacked, and the theory established tliat it is proper 
to consider, who may be the best tool of the moral law, 
that the older one should sacrifice himself for the younger, 
the less talented for the more' talented, &c. I reply : It 
is absolutely impossible to judge from whose preservation 
the most good would result, for finite understanding has 
no possible way of deciding what may be of greatest 
advantage in connection with all other things. Hence 
this decision should be left to the world's government of 
reason, wherein upon this standpoint we have faith. The 
finite understanding knows only that it ought to do in 



THE THEORY OF DUTIES 3ty 

every moment of life, whcrcunto duty itnpei.,» without 
cari)ig how mncli, .'iiul in what manner, good may result 
from it. Whosoever is preserved, from his preservation 
it is certain that good will result, since the world is 
governed by the liighest wisdom and love. Whosoever 
perishes, to him no blame attaches ; he has done what ho 
could do, and for the rest the moral law which rules the 
world is responsiljle, if we can speak of responsibility in 
this connection. 

" But if we both wait quietly for the result, we both 
shall perish, whereas otherwise one of us might be saved." 
Let me tell you firstly, that this neither of us knows. 
Though we see no means of escape, such means may 
nevertheless appear. But secondly, supposing we both 
do perish, what then ? Our preservation is not end and 
object at all, but the fulfilment of the moral law is that 
object : hence, if we perish, such has been the will of the 
moral law. It is fulfilled, and our end is attained. 

Secondly. Cases may occur wherein many of my fellow- 
men are in danger of life and body. It is my duty to 
save ; but I cannot save all, or, at least, not all at once. 
How am I to select ? 

My object is, and must necessarily be, to save all, for 
all are tools of the moral law, and there is herein no 
distinction to be made. Now if 'I desire to save all, I 
will first of all render assistance to those who are in the 
most immediate danger, since they cannot preserve them- 
selves any longer without foreign assistance, whether 
their danger be thus most imminent from the state of 
matters, or from their own weakness and helplessness : as, 
for instance, children, sick, and old persons. If amongst 
them there are such, whose welfare is more specially 
entrusted to my individual care — who are mine own — 
then these must have the preference ; but let it be well 
observed, not from any natural pathognomonical affection, 
or from care for my own happiness — such motives are to 
be condemned — but because their preservation is my 



320 TPHE SCIENCE OF ETHICS 

particul.Tx ' duty, and because iiarticular duty always 
precedes general duty. 

If no such grounds of preference exist, then I must 
save whomsoever I can first save, whomsoever I see first. 
To consider the relative importance of this or that life is, 
in such a case, not allowable, for I cannot know anything 
respecting this point. 

Thirdly. Cases may arise of hostile and unjust possible 
attacks upon my life and body, or upon the body of some- 
one else; for that must be the same to me. Here the 
question arises : In how far may I endanger tlie life of 
the aggressor in defending my own ? It is absolute duty 
to defend the life of the attacked party, whether it be I 
or another; but this does not cancel the duty to spare 
and ])reserve the life of the aggressor. Hence my object 
can never be to kill the aggressor, but merely to render 
him harmless. I ought, therefore, to call for the help of 
others, if they are near, and thus of the State. I ought 
likewise only to repel the attack as well as I am able, 
without endangering the aggressor himself. If I cannot 
do this, I should rather maim or wound him ; anytliing 
' 80 that his death be not my object. If he does get killed, 
it results against my intention, though chance and I are 
not responsible for it. 

It might be objected, and many moralists have 
objected : " But still you have exposed the life of the 
aggressor to danger. Now, if the matter only concerns 
yourself, and if yourself are the attacked, why do you 
not rather die than expose the other to danger ? " In 
order to thoroughly and clearly refute this objection, I 
shall compare the presupposed case with the one just 
considered. In the latter it was my duty to preserve my 
life, and so it is in the supposed case ; but I was not to 
preserve it at the expense of the life of the other. Xow 
there is firstly this great distinction: In that case the 
conviction was before me that my self-preservation must 
entail the death of the other ; but in the supposed case it 



THE THEORY OE DUTIES. 321 

in not necessary, not proposed to kill him. In that case, 
moreover, the life of the other was in the iiands of 
Nature, and would surely, in my conviction, be taken 
from him the moment I preserve my own. liut in the 
supposed case this rests within my own power; a power 
which is controlled by my free will; and it is not my will 
to kill him, nor do I foresee and presuppose that he will 
be killed. But secondly, and which is the decisive point : 
the duty to act here in self-defence, is based not only 
upon the duty to preserve my own life, but at the same 
time upon the duty to prevent something evidently 
prohibited by the moral law, namely, murder. Wliut 
the moral law absolutely forbids, the moral man cannot 
allow to happen at any price ; for his will is the will of 
the moral law. Now this does not happen in the above 
case, where there is nothing immoral to be prevented. 

As soon as the aggressor is disarmed, my defence ceases. 
I have nothing else for him but rational arguments. If 
there is anything more to be done in his case, to promote 
general security, to establish an example for others, or to 
prevent himself from doing similar things, these are 
matters for the State to settle, into whose hands he is 
now transferred. The State is his judge, not I as an 
individual. 

2. The preservation of the property of different persons 
is in conflict, and seems mutually to cancel itself, jNIy 
property, and the property of another, is, at the same 
time, in danger. In that case the preservation of mine 
comes first, for I naturally first observe its danger, and 
thus first receive the command of the moral law to save 
It ; and whosoever has already a determined duty to fulfil, 
must not leave it for another. I also naturally suppose 
that the other will do the same in regard to his own 
property. Of course I must be sure, in my own con- 
science, that I thus prefer my own from reasons of duty, 
and not of selfishness. I must save mine not as mine, 
but as part of the common property of reason. Whether 
Y 



322 THE SCIENCE OF ETIITCS. 

I really do so regard it, will easily a])pear afterward from 
the fact whether I so ajjply it or not; whether I arii 
ready to serve and assist my other unfortunate neighhour 
with it, and to divide, so far as I am able to do so, with 
him, that which I have saved. 

The mere possihilihj that my property may get into 
danger, does not absolve me from the duty to save that of 
my neighbour which is actually in danger. For so long as 
the danger to mine is merely possible, I have nothing to 
do; but to do nothing and to rest, except where duty 
commands, is immoral. 

It is absolutely immoral to protect one's own property 
at the expense of the other's ; or to parry a danger whicii 
threatens our property, by putting it, in whole or in part, 
upon our neighbour's. If it had happened to him, he 
would have been forced to bear it, and we to help him to 
bear it ; but now, it has happened not to him, but to us. 
The moral man sees in this a dispensation of providence. 
He grapples with the danger as well as he can, but he 
does not try to make another one suffer what providence 
sent to him. 

Life is worth more than property ; for life is the condi- 
tion of property, and not property the condition of life. 
Hence we must save the lives of our fellow-men before 
saving their property, must prefer the safety of our and 
their lives to that of our and their property, whenever 
the danger to that property comes from irrational forces 
of Nature. How the relation may be changed, if the 
danger arises from the injustice of rational beings, we 
shall see directly. 

3. The preservation of body and life may conflict with 
the preservation of property. 

My property, or the property of the otlier, which ought 
to be the same to me, may be attacked by rational beings. 
For such a case it is not merely the property which is to 
be preserved, but an immoral and illegal action which is 
to be prevented. Now, the will of the moral law is the 



THE THEORY OF DUTIES. 323 

will of the moral man, and iience he cannot permit what 
the moral law does not suffer. It is, therefore, absolute 
duty to prevent robbery, in as much as it is absolutely ofjainst 
the moral law, and as each can categorically assert it thus 
to be. Let not this last clause be overlooked. An attack 
upon the property of the other is absolutely against the 
moral law, solely in so far as the aggressor has recognized 
it as property. Hence, in so far as he is a member of tlie 
State. It is, therefore, absolutely illegal and immoral 
when it is committed by one citizen of a State upon a 
fellow-citizen of the same State, or of a State at peace 
with his State ; but it is not absolutely illegal and 
immoral when committed by an avowed enemy. Eor 
in the latter case there is a law dispute between the 
States at war with each other, and it is problematical 
in law what side may be in the right ; hence, no one has 
the power to assume the decision of this point, since the 
other one does not recognize his authority. 

I must prevent robbery ; this is an absolute command. 
But what means may I use for the purpose, in how far 
may I use force, and in how far may I expose my own 
life, and the life of the other, to danger ? 

Firstly, the case may be of a nature which permits of 
a remedy on the part of the State — if not at once, at 
least hereafter. Ln such a case the State can annihilate 
the unjust act ; and it is, therefore, duty to do nothing im- 
mediately, and to expose neither myself nor the aggressor 
to danger, but to notify the State of the matter. This 
case arises when the property taken is of a nature that 
it can be known, and when the State has guaranteed its 
possession, or when the person of the aggressor is known 
to us. In the latter case, however, it is necessary, and 
hence duty, to provide proper proofs for the State. 

Secondly, the case may be of such a nature that if I 
do not resist on the spot, the unjust act becomes success- 
ful so far as I can foresee. In such a case it is duty to 
resist by force ; but with the same precaution enjoined in 



324 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

the defence of life and body. If the aggressor resists, it 
becomes a fight for life and death. My life is attacked, 
and the matter comes under the rules established for 
such a case. I no longer defend my property, but my 
life, and at the risk of my life. 

It might be objected to this tliat I have myself brought 
affairs to such a pass by offering resistance, and that I 
myself have changed a fight for mere property into one 
for body and life. I reply: Morally I was bound to 
resist the robbery of my property. I could not, and was 
not bound to assume that the aggressor would resist my 
attempt to drive him away, for I must always assume 
that the moral law will be followed, and not violated. It 
is, moreover, understood that I have attempted to dissuade 
him by rational arguments. It is altogether the fault of 
the aggressor that the affair has become one of life and 
death": he ought to have been deterred by my resistance. 
Thirdly, in cases of complaints preferred before the 
State— and not merely in the present instance, but 
generally— the moral law prescribes as follows : 

Whenever the State requires notification of such 
violence it is my duty to give it, since obedience to the 
State is duty. But when it is left to my free will, 
whether I choose to prefer such or not— and the State 
has its limits in this respect : for instance, in private 
aff'airs which happen in one's own house the rule is, where 
there is no plaintiff" there is no judge— the moral law 
requires that I should not prefer it at once. The ground 
is as follows : The State does not convince. Whether we 
acknowledge, or do not acknowledge, the justice of its 
decision, we still must submit to it, and it is carried out 
with physical force ; for the State treats man not as a 
rational being, but as a force of Nature which must be 
restricted to its limits ; and the State is right in doing 
so, since it was established for this purpose. Now, m 
vHvate affairs the State acts in my name when it does 
act, for it does not act unless I empower and call upon it 



THE THEORY OF DUTIES, 325 

to do so, and would not act if I did not do so, Ilcnce, 
what the State does is to be ascribed to me. But I am 
required to treat my fellow-man not as mere force of 
Nature, but as a rational being, if I can possibly thus 
arrange with him. I am therefore bound, before pre- 
ferring suit against him, to try argiunents, and see 
whether I cannot bring my opponent, through rational 
representations, to confess his injustice, and to resolve 
voluntarily to make it good. 

If these representations are of no avail, then it becomes 
duty to prefer suit ; for his unjust act must not succeed, 
but be defeated. It might be objected : " But from what 
point of time do I know for certain that they will be of 
no avail; and how can I ever know that they will be of no 
avail ? Does it not therefore remain my duty always to 
presuppose that they might be successful ? " I reply : 
The point here is to make restoration. This must be 
done within a certain time, hence I cannot fix a deter- 
mined time either for myself or him. If my suit before 
the courts force him to restore and make good the damage 
done, I shall still be able, and it will still remain my duty, 
to convince him, through remonstrances, that he ought to 
have done voluntarily what now he is comj)elled to do, 
and thus to subject his will to the law, as well as his 
external action has been so subjected through compulsion. 

Hence I must regard and treat, both pending and after 
the trial, my opponent as a rational and moral person. In 
the same manner I must likewise, as we have already 
seen, seek to preserve him as a possible tool of morality, 
even if I have become involved with him in a fight of life 
and death. This gives us occasion to speak, in the present 
place, about love towards our enemies, concerning which 
otherwise we should have nothing particular to say, since 
all that can be said about it is already involved in the 
previously established principles; and it is merely to 
remove some misunderstandings that I touch upon this 
point. 



326 THE SCIENCE OE ETHICS. 

rntliofrnnmnnical love, or a separate inclination towards 
this or that person, is not moral, but merely natural. It 
nnist never he the motive power of our acts. It is 
ptenerally ajj;ree(l that such love towards our enemies is 
not commanded by the moral law ; and if some say it 
is not so commanded simply because it is not possible, 
only the ground assi^nied is not correct. Wliy sliould it 
not be possible ? IMiglit we not feel a particular inclina- 
tion, arising from some natural ground, towards any 
person that perhaps hates and persecutes us, merely 
because this inclination is not reciprocated ? No ; this 
love is not commanded, simply because it is not a moral 
love ; is not something dependent upon our free will, but 
dependent upon a natural impulse. 

Yet, on the other hand, those are also mistaken wiio 
assert that this command requires not at all any internal 
affection, but merely an external act; and that it is sußl- 
cient to act, as if we did love our enemy, no matter how 
much we may hate him in point of fact. This assertion 
is false, because no act is moral which does not emanate 
from an internal disi)Osition; and ))ecause sucli a command 
would merely recpiire legality towards our enemy, which 
the moral law immediately never commands. 

The solution is as follows : From the standpoint of 
morality there is only one view from which to look upon 
our fellow-men, namely, I must regard them as tools of 
reason. But as such I must regard all without exception, 
no matter how much their present actions may lead me to 
conclude the contrary. Even if he is not such now, I 
must never abandon the hope tliat he may become sucli, 
as has been abundantly proved above. The same holds 
good of my enemy. I must love him : that is to say, 
must believe him capable of reforming ; and this love I 
must evince in deed : tliat is to say, I must assist with all 
my power in his reform. 

Moreover, which should be well observed, the moral man 
has no personal enemy, and recognizes none. Nothing, 



THE THEORY OF DUTIES. 327 

indeed, is hateful to liim, and he seeks to overthrow 
nothing except the evil, and this simply because it is 
evil. Whether such evil be directed against him or 
against anyone else, is all the same to him, for he holds 
himself as absolutely nothing more than anyone else, 
namely, as a mere tool of the moral law. Tiicre is no 
reason at all why he should think worse of the man who 
happens to stand in his way, and should sooner despair of 
him than of one who stands in the way of some good 
cause or another. Whoever feels an offence deeper 
because it has touched Mm, may be sure that he is an 
egotist, and is very far yet from true morality. 



Concluding Eemakk. 

Although the duty of truthfulness is not to be discussed 
here, since no collision can arise concerning it, something 
nevertheless results from it, to which we must refer in 
few words : Honour and good repute. 

Honour and good repute, in a moral sense, consist in 
this : That others should believe us to be possibly actuated 
in our actions generally, and particularly in our relations 
to them, by a regard only for tiie good and the just. This 
opinion each one sliould have of the other, as we have 
seen, for each one should consider the other as a possible 
tool of morality ; and should thus entertain it until the 
contrary is proved for the present, and even then he 
should not abandon the hope of future reform. This 
opinion which others entertain of us, conditions our in- 
fluence upon them, and hence it is our duty to retain and 
defend it. Decided indifference to all evil reports which 
may be scattered against us, is indifference to, and con- 
tempt of, the men upon whom we are to work, and to our 
own moral destination, and hence it is a very immoral 
mode of thinking. It needs no particular self-control to 
become, in a natural way, indifferent to the judgments 
of others. We only need to look a little closer at. the 



328 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

men as tlicy generally arc, to learn nf)t to place too ;,'reat 
a value upon their judgments. IJut a moral man should 
not let this indifference grow upon him ; he should always 
see in men rather that which they ^hall be, and become 
thus that which they actually are. 

Now, if anyone has attacked this our honour, and we 
can only defend it by communicating of him what must 
hurt his character, it is our duty to do so. It is, for 
instance, our duty to say and to prove that the other has 
told the untruth. The matter stands here in precisely 
the relation as when we defend our life and property 
against an unjust attack. We must defend it even at the 
risk of the aggressor. 

C. Hitherto we liave seen that it is our duty to spare and 
promote the formal freedom of our fellow-men, since we 
are morally bound to regard each one who bears a human 
face, as a tool of the moral law. All men outside of us 
generally, and their freedom in particular, are objects of 
duty to us solely, in so far as we presuppose that they are 
such tools ; for otherwise they would be merely irrational 
objects, to be treated according to our own pleasure, and 
to be subjected to our arbitrary ends. We are, therefore, 
bound, as sure as we act upon them, to treat them as 
moral beings ; and only this view of them determines our 
manner of acting in relation to them. From this, already 
it is evident that we should promote the general accepta- 
tion of this view, and should aid in having their freedom 
applied to the promotion of the ends of reason. It is 
indeed easy to prove this, even in an immediate manner. 
The will of the moral man is the will of the moral law 
itself. Now the moral law wills the morality of all 
rational beings, and hence the moral man must desire the 
same. But his will cannot be an impotent, powerless 
will, since he is a tool of the moral law, as an individual 
having power in the sensuous world. He will, therefore, 
necessarily seek to realize this, his necessary will, with all 



THE THEORY OF DUTIES. 329 

his power. The proof that it is absohite and general 
duty to promote and extend morality outside of iis, offers 
therefore no diHiculty. It is a little more dilTicult to 
state in what manner this may be possible. For that 
alone can be called moral which proceeds from our own 
free resolve without the least compulsion, and without 
the least external motive. It seems, therefore, impossible 
to connnunicate morality, or to furnish the least assist- 
ance in this comnmnication. The command to extend 
morality seems, therefore, completely empty and im- 
practicable, and nothing seems to remain to us but 
impotent wishes ; for how could we promote morality 
except through sensuous causality, and how can sensuous 
causality ever awaken freedom ? This is, indeed, un- 
deniably true in many respects, which we shall proceed 
to state. 

I. First of all, a morally-minded man can never think 
of bringing men to virtue by compulsory means— as threats 
of punishment, or promises of rewards, whether held out 
in the name of the State and some powerful ruler, or in 
the name of an Almighty Being. All acts, which are 
impelled by such motives, are absolutely devoid of 
morality. It being still customary to attempt to weaken 
and limit this proposition, and to hold up the system of 
a virtue of punishments and rewards by various pretexts, 
I shall prove my assertion with greatest strictness. 

All impulse after happiness is based upon the natural 
impulse. I desire this or that object because my nature 
has an impulse for it, and I do not desire it because there 
is in my nature an aversion against it. Now if this 
impulse is made use of, to induce me to commit certain 
acts, these acts thus become conditions of the satisfying 
of such impulse ; and in this manner the satisfying of 
my natural impulse evidently remains the ultimate end of 
my acts, and my acts themselves are merely the means, 
and are merely considered by me as means for such end. 
But therein consists precisely the essence of immorality, 



330 THE SCIENCE OF ETIflCS. 

tlint the satisfying of our Jiatural imjnilso i« the ultimate 
end of my acting, wlicreas the law rcquirt-s that I utterly 
subordinate this inipulso to a higher prompting. ]Jence, 
by inducing mc to these acta, I liave not been mude 
moral ; but have, on the contrary, been deplorably con- 
firmed in my immorality, since this my immorality has 
been authorized and cultivated through something which 
has been preached to me as a doctrine of morals, and 
which has been held up to me as the higlicst and holiest. 
All hope of morality has been thus anniliilatcjd, by sub- 
stituting immorality in its ])lace, and all inclination and 
presentiment of morality has been utterly rooted out. 
To treat men in this manner is to treat them as brutes. 
We make use of the brute's instincts to develop in it the 
qualities we have in view ; and, in like manner, we would 
train instead of cultivate man. 

Let us, therefore, avoid all those equally indefinite and 
'Bhallow,injurious,and all true morality-eradicating pretexts, 
as, "We do not want the rewards to be the only end of the 
virtuous, we merely want him to have it also in view"; 
or, " The reward is not to be the chief, but merely one of 
the ends." By no means. Reward is not to be an end 
at all. Every act done from hope of reward, or fear of 
punishment, is absolutely immoral. 

Let it not be said, " We only want to use this means in 
the beginning, until we have made men more open to pure 
morality." By the use of such means you do not at all 
begin true moral sentiment, but continue the old immoral 
disposition, which you thus, moreover, carefully preserve 
and cultivate. In fact, your whole pretext, that men are 
not fit for pure morality in certain states, is a pure in- 
vention, and your distinction between a pure and a not 
pure morality is downright absurd. There are no two 
moralities; there is simply one morality: and that morality 
which is not pure, which does not proceed altogether from 
the idea of duty, is no morality at all. Eor here we speak 
altogether of the moral disposition, and not of the com- 



THE THEORY OF DUTIES. 331 

plcteness or incompleteness of the external realization of 
this disposition in actual acting. 

2. Nor can morality be compelled through theoretical 
conviction. For, firstly, theoretical convictions them- 
selves cannot be compelled : a true proposition, which 
explains many phenomena in men, but which the pro- 
fessional philosophers rarely take to heart, Ijccause it 
would disturb them in their pliantasm, that they can 
improve or reform men through syllogisms. Xo one 
becomes convinced unless he penetrates into himself and 
internally feels the agreement of his self with the truth 
uttered ; which agreement is an effect of the heart, and 
on no account a conclusion drawn by the understanding. 
This attention to our self depends upon freedom, and 
hence conviction is always freely given, never forced. I 
do not mean to say that we can freely convince ourselves 
of anything we choose to, for we can only convince 
ourselves, and desire to convince ourselves, of truth ; but 
it is not necessary that we convince ourselves of the 
truth : this conviction depends upon our free will. Con- 
viction is an act of reason — reason subjecting herself, 
through an act of her self-activity, to truth — and is not 
a passivity of reason. To convince ourselves of propo- 
sitions which check our passions, presupposes a ruling 
good will, and hence that will cannot first be produced 
by our conviction. 

3. Since, nevertheless, we shall probably be compelled to 
exercise moral influence only through reasoning, which 
can only be done in the way of theoretical argumentation, 
we have, at least, gained so much for the present tliat 
this influence presupposes already the principle of good 
and evil in the subject to which it is addressed, and 
that thus all promotion of morality would be impossible, 
could we not everywhere confidently presuppose this 
principle. 

It can, indeed, be shown that there is something 
ineradicable in human nature, with which moral culture 



t 



332 r//E SCTENCE OF ETHICS. 

can always be connected. This is the sentiment of esteeni. 
This sentiment may lie undeveloped in the soul; but it 
can neither be eradicated, nor directed upon an ol)ject 
foreign to it. We may love, seek, and desire sensuous 
enjoyment, and may feel delight in experiencing it, 
but we can never hold it in esteem ; esteem docs not 
apply to it at .all ! Again, wherever this sentiment finds \ 

its application it results without fail : whatsoever is 
esteemable is sure to be esteemed. Hence, the first rule 
for the extension of morality will be as follows : Show to 
your fellow-men esteemable things, and in this respect 
we can scarcely show them anytliing more to the pur- 
pose than our own moral mode of thinking and moral 
behaviour. Thus there results the duty of a good 
example, to which we shall return hereafter, at present 
proceeding our logical way. The first step in moral 
culture is, therefore, the development of- esteem. 

4. As soon as man is forced to esteem something outside 
of himself, the desire to esteem himself awakens in him. 
This impulse of self-esteem, as soon as it has once been 
awakened through some external motive, is as ineradicable 
from human nature as self-love. No man can bear to 
coldly despise himself, and quietly to regard himself as a 
wicked and miserable wretch. But it is equally impos- 
sible that he should esteem himself, if he is contemptible. 

Of course, this does not improve the moral condition 
of man in the slightest degree, but often rather makes it 
considerably worse. For in order to escape the insuffer- 
able torture of self-contempt, man falls into two ways, 
and often into ])oth together. He seeks to escape himself, 
because he fears himself ; he takes care not to look into 
his inner soul, because this shows him nothing but terrific 
objects. In order to get rid of himself, he dissipates all 
the more in the object of the external world. He stupe- 
fies his conscience. But as this means is not a complete 
remedy, he seeks to get rid of the forced esteem of some- 
thing outside of himself, and the self-contempt which 



THE THEORY OF DUTIES. 333 

results thcrofrnm, hy trying to persuade Iiim.self that that 
esteem is all humbug and foolishness ; that there docs 
not exist anything that is esteemable, noble, and sublime ; 
that it is all only appearance and deception ; that no man 
is better than himself, and that human nature in general 
is no better. It is idle to try and refute this system by 
rational arguments, for its ground lies not in reason, but 
in the heart ; and it would be necessary first to root out 
this ground in the heart, or to relieve such a man from 
Iiis self-shame and self-fear. He is thus at variance witli 
all that is good, simply because he is in conflict with 
himself. Let us first try and reconcile him to himself ; 
let us show him that he himself is not so utterly devoid 
of all good, as he would himself believe ; let us first lead 
him back to the good principle in himself. 

Immorality is, therefore, either complete brutishness, 
and this must first be cultured by the above means of 
teaching man to esteem something outside of himself ; 
or it is despair of one's self: and this is to be cured 
by showing such a man that at least others do not despair 
of him, by showing him confidence and making him 
acquainted, on particular occasions, with the hidden good 
in himself. He, in whom others evince confidence, will 
soon also have some confidence in himself; but he, of 
whom all others despair, must certainly begin to despair 
of himself. 

Thus, in our theory, everything is connected, and each 
link attached to the other. We have already shown that 
it is absolutely immoral to despair internally of the 
reform of any man. That which we there showed to be 
an internal duty, and a regulative of our external acts, 
now again shows itself to be a means for the promotion 
of our ultimate end; and it becomes a duty to manifest 
this internal confidence likewise very decisively in 
external actions. 

The good principle which exists in all men, and which 
can be eradicated in none, is precisely the possibility to 



334 THE SCIENCE OE ETHTCS. 

be able to esteem something unsolfislily, and hence witli- 
out all regard to advantages; and thus al)solutely d 'priori 
and without any ground. It is also tlie impulse to desire 
one's self-esteem, and the impossibility to sink down to 
the infamy of being able quietly and coolly to despise 
one's self. Let men be led back to this principle. Let them 
be shown that it lies at the basis of all their beliaviour. 
Let it be said, for instance, to those who absolutely deny 
the possibility of an unselfish impulse in man, to men 
like Ilelvetius, &c. : " You say you have discovered that 
men are only impelled by selfish motives; that they 
deceive themselves if they report otherwise. Very well, 
this is a good thing for you ; make use of this discovery 
as much as you are able to do, and go your ways. But 
why do you communicate this matter to us? What do 
you gain, since all men, and you amongst them, can only 
act from selfish motives by communicating it to us ; or 
what danger do you thereby turn away from your heads ? 
If the deception to believe otherwise does produce any 
damage, it certainly causes none to you, since you assure 
us that you do not believe it. But as for our damage, wliat 
does that matter to you ? What do you care whether 
others suffer injury? Bather be glad, and draw as mucli 
gain from it as possible. Nay, it would seem as if it must 
be a positive advantage to you, if all remain in this error; 
and if you were logical you would do all in your power to 
keep up and extend this error. For it affords you a means 
to gain us over to your secret projects, under tlie pretext 
of virtue and unselfishness ; which it will not be so easy 
for you to do if you boldly announce your private adv an- 
tage as your ultimate end. In short, since you can gain 
nothing by communicating your discovery, your assertion 
contradicts itself. Nay, what is more, you not only 
communicate it to us, indifferent as to whether we 
accept it or not, but you make it your special business to 
convince us of it, and defend your proposition with all 
possible zeal. Whence may this interest arise which you 



THE THEORY OE DUTIES. 335 

manifest ? If that belief is really so contemptible as 
you assert it to be, why do you oppose it with so much 
warmth and energy ? Why not let it fall to pieces of 
itself? Your conduct is, therefore, absolutely incompre- 
hensible if you are only actuated by selfish motives. 
What, then, may be your motive ? It will not be difiicult 
to show it to you. You are so very concerned to convince 
us of your opinion, not that we may govern ourselves 
according to it in our actions — for such would be very 
inopportune for you — but that our conviction may assist 
in supporting your conviction. You are not yourself very 
sure of your assertions, and desire to complete, through 
our agreement, the conviction which you lack yourself. 
And now I ask you further : Why do you desire to be so 
very certain of your matter ? If mere selfishness is the 
motive of your acts, of what profit can this complete 
certainty be to you ? You are again illogical. You want 
to be certain of it, because otherwise you must despise 
yourself; must look upon yourself as worse than otlier 
men, as more wicked and infamous than you are naturally. 
Hence you wish to esteem yourself, and have a higlier 
principle upon which to act than mere selfishness; and 
you are better than you yourself think. 

Or you others, who are not in this case, who do not 
openly confess your heart's opinion, but carefully lock it 
up in your soul, pleading esteemable intentions, which 
you do not possess, for your acts, why do you do this ? 
If you merely intend to deceive your fellow-men by it, in 
order to be able all the more to use them for the promo- 
tion of your ends, you certainly recognize, through your 
acting, that there is a higher and nobler motive than 
selfishness, since you make use of it, calculate on it, and 
take your measures according to it. Here, again, your 
opinion that there is nothing higher in human nature 
than selfishness, contradicts your acting, which pre- 
supposes something higher, and fares well in such pre- 
supposition. Hence, in your acting at least — and the 



336 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

inner heart of man discovers itself most surely in his 
actions — you cannot refrain from recognizing a higiier 
principle in man, and this you certainly couid only have 
discovered in yourself, and in your own sentiments, there- 
from transferring it to others. Hence you also are not so 
empty of goodness as you have believed. 

In one word : there is no man of even the least culture 
— I do not speak here of the original natural man, whom 
we have dwelt upon elsewhere already — who does not 
at tim.es commit actions, which cannot be explained from 
the mere principle of self-love, or, from the presupposition 
of mere selfishness in others. Hence the necessity to call 
attention to such actions, and to the principle which lies 
at their liasis. 

In order that this proposition may not meet the 
objection which we have ourselves proved above, to wit : 
" that theoretical convictions cannot be compelled ; and 
that hence it is impossible to convince the other that 
there is still some goodness left in him"; I add the 
following: In the present case we can be sure of it, 
because the heart of the man to be convinced is inclined 
in favour of us from the very beginning. Each one 
would like to esteem himself, if it were but possible; 
this may be taken for certain. Hence we may be certain 
of his assent if we show him that at least his dispositions 
are worthy of esteem. Upon such a basis a moral 
character can be built up gradually. 

5. We return to the point which we touched above, when 
we said that in order to develop the sentiment of esteem 
in man, we must show him something esteemable ; and 
there being no better occasion for this thau our own 
example, we have the duty of a good example. 

This duty has often been viewed very incorrectly, as if 
we could be obliged to do this or that, which otherwise 
we would not have needed to do for the mere sake of a 
good example (as, for instance, going to church, taking 
the Lord's Supper, &c.). For it has been already shown, 



THE THEORY OF DUTIES. %yj 

that witliiti the si)liero of morality there arc no iii- 
(HfTerent actions; the moral law embraces and deter- 
mines absohitely all possible acts of freedom. That 
which I am commanded to do I must do absolutely for 
its own sake, witliout any regard to the example it may 
set ; and that which I am proliibitcd from doing I must 
absolutely leave undone, likewise, without any regard to 
the example. Something which is not duty necessarily 
sets a bad example ; no good can ever result from the 
immoral. But to do more than I am commanded to do 
is impossible, since duty disposes of all my strength and 
all my time. Hence there can lie no actions, the ultimate 
end whereof might be to establish a good example, and 
which ought to be done merely for such example's sake. 
The duty of setting a good example has no reference to 
the substa7icc of our acts, but only to the fui'm thereof. 

Namely : the moral law merely makes it my duty to 
do what is to be done, regardless whether publicly or 
privately, and whether with a statement of the principles 
upon which it is done or not. But if we look to the fact 
that we owe a good example — which truly neither can, 
nor is intended, to do any other good than to spread 
esteem for virtue — this is no longer a matter of in- 
difference to us. On the contrary, the highest ^publicity 
of our acts and principles is commanded of us. 

Firstly, as regards the internal character of this 
publicity. Its intention is to excite esteem for what is 
esteemable; but esteem can be neither compelled nor 
artistically produced, but manifests itself voluntarily and 
unobserved. Hence the virtuous must not suffer such an 
intention to be remarked in his acts ; and since he is to 
give frank expression to whatever is in his heart, and 
since others are moreover likely to remark such intention 
if it exists, he must not cherish this intention at all in 
reference to particulars. He allows the inmost depth of 
his heart to reveal itself externally, without doing any- 
thing else to attract attention to it. 



338 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. \ 

Sucli is the external cliaracter of the frank man. Ho 
pursues his path straightforward, talks and «acts .as his 
lieart prompts him, and as he considers it to be his duty, 
without looking to the right or left to see whetlier he 
is observed or not, and wiihout listening and inquiring 
what people may say to liis actions ; for lie has no time 
to do this ; his time is fully occupied by fulfdling his 
duty. But, for the very same reason, he does not conceal 
himself, for he has also no time to ponder over secrecy 
and concealment. So, likewise, if his conduct is sub- 
jected to criticism, does he reply to criticism — does he 
defend himself if he holds himself wronged. He does 
not try to smooth over his actions, if he has been con- 
victed of wrong. Perhaps there is no more beautifid 
trait in human cliaracter than frankness, and none more 
dangerous than secretiveness. frankness and openness 
at least lead to upriglitness, if tliey are it not; but lie 
who is secretive has a secret fear of trutli, has some deep 
fault, which he would not like to have discovered, and he 
is not willing to be reformed before he does not cast ofT 
"that fear of truth. 

A pretentious man intends to be ol)servcd. This 
character can easily be distinguished in others, or — wliicli 
ought to be the most important to us — in ourselves, from 
frankness, by the following marks. Tlie pretentious 
man usually indulges in preparations, which are not at 
all necessary for his purpose, and which hence can only 
be intended to call attention to his acts; whereas the 
frank man does no more than is needed for the attain- 
ment of his object. 

This publicity the frank man maintains both in his 
acts and principles. His ruling principle is, to do his 
duty merely for duty's sake ; and he makes no secret of 
this motive. To be ashamed of this subjection to soHie- 
thing higher and greater, as of a superstition, and to 
make oneself the God of the universe, is very con- 
temptible. It is just as contemptible to give another 



THE THEORY OF DUTIES. 339 

name to tluit whicli we have done merely for duty's 
sake, and thus to claim for it, for inntance, motives of 
particular affection and friendship, of generosity, &c. 
The same publicity the frank man, of course, asserts in 
his acts ; for principles are nothing unless realized in acts, 
and since we can convince no one that such principles 
are really ours except by realizing tliem in actions. 
Mere virtuous talking amounts to nothing ; and furnishes 
no good, but rather a bad example, since it confirms 
unbelief in virtue. In this respect the frank man shows 
himself particularly logical His acts are like his words. 



CHArTER V. 

CONCERNING THE PARTICÜLAK DUTIES. 

Preliminary. 

Concerning the relation of the particular to the general 
duties, the following is still to be said. 

To promote the end of reason is the only duty of all, 
and this duty embraces all otlier duties ; particular duties 
are duties only in so far as they relate to the attainment 
of that chief purpose. I am commanded to exercise the 
particular duties of my vocation and condition in life, 
not absolutely because I ought to do so, but for the reason 
that I thus best promote in my place the ultimate end of 
reason. I must regard the particular duty as a means to 
carry out the general duty of all men, but absolutely not 
as end in itself; and I do my duty in tlie fulfilment of 
my particular obligations, only in so far as I fulfil them 
for the sake of duti/ in general. The proposition that 
each one shall fulfil his duty through honestly fulfilling 
the obligations of his particular condition in life, is there- 
fore to be understood with this restriction : that he must 
carry out those obligations solely from duty, and for the 
sake of duty. For there might be other motives inducing 
man diligently to practise these duties, as, for instance, a 
natural predilection for his vocation, fear of blame or 
punishment, ambition, &c. Whosoever is impelled by 
such motives, does certainly what he ought to do, but 
does it now how he ought to do it ; he acts correctly, 
but not morally. Hence everyone can only decide before 
his own conscience whether he truly fulfils his duty in 

340 



CONCERNING THE PARTICULAR DUTIES. 341 

liis vocation. This remark relates to the necessary form 
of the will in the particular duties. 

We have to add another remark concerning the snh- 
stance thereof, which will, at the same time, furnish us 
with a criterion whereby each may recognize whether lie 
fulfils the duties of his condition in life from love of duty 
or not. For, if such condition or vocation is not absolutely 
end in itself, but merely means for tlic attainment of an 
end, then — it being contradictory to place the means 
higher than the end — it is not allowable, but ratlier 
positively immoral, to sacrifice virtue to one's condition 
and vocation. Namely, the duties prescribed hy such 
vocation, and the rights which may condition their possi- 
bility, can frequently be in opposition to the ultimate end 
of reason. Now the man to whom his vocation is his 
ultimate end, and who therefore fulfils its obligations 
from another motive than love of duty, will carry out 
those obligations, even if they are opposed to the ultimate 
end of reason, because he knows no higher standpoint 
than the obligations of his vocation. But the man who 
regards his vocation merely as a means, will, in such case, 
most assuredly not carry them out, because they no 
longer promote, but rather oppose, the ultimate end of 
reason. In the course of our present investigation, I 
shall apply this general remark to the duties of the 
various particular vocations, thereby placing it, at the 
same time, in a clearer light. 

So far as the division of the particular duties is con- 
cerned, which must base itself upon a division of the 
various human relations, which we have called vocations, 
we can divide these relations into natural i;elations, w'hich 
rest upon our arrangement of Nature, and artificial 
relations, which are based upon an accidental and free 
determination of the will. The former relations we may 
subsume under the general name of the natural condi- 
tion of man ; and the second under the name of the 
vocation of man. • 



342 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 



A. 

We shall speak here of the duties of man in regard 
to his particular natural condition. 

There are only two natural conditions amongst those 
rational, sensuous beings whom we call men, which are 
based upon the arrangement made by Nature for the 
propagation of the race : 

1st. The relation of husband and wife. 
2nd. The relation of parents and children. 

We have treated both relations extensively in our 
Science of Birjlits. At present we condense what we ha^■e 
there said, and refer the reader to that work for further 
detail. 

I. The relation of husband and wife. 

This relation is based, as we have said, on an arrange- 
ment of Nature to propagate the race in two different 
sexes. The means made use of by Nature here, as every- 
where, to attain its object in free beings, is a natural 
impulse; and the relation of this impulse to freedom is 
that of all other natural impulses, sufficiently descriljed 
above. The impulse itself can neither be generated nor 
annihilated through freedom; it is given. Only— and 
■this rule has stricter application to the natural impulse 
for 'the union of the sexes than to any other natural 
impulse — only in so far as the act of the free being is 
immediately produced by the impulse, is the object of 
Nature attained. The conception can only prevent or 
permit the impulse to become an act; but to eradicate 
or put itself in its place— as if the act were immediately 
grounded in the conception of the end, and not simply 



CONCERNING THE PARTICULAR DUTIES. 343 

tliiouf^h its mediation in tlic iin])ulsc — this the coiicoptiou 
can not do. The human race is not propagated according 
to conceptions and free resolves of the will. 

Hence it would seem, at the first glance, as if we could 
say of the satisfying of the impulse nothing more than 
we have said concerning the satisfying of natural impulses 
in general. The impulse must really exist, and must not 
be artificially produced by the imagination. We must 
permit ourselves its satisfaction solely as a means for the 
end, which end is here the propagation of our race. This 
end, again, we should relate to our highest ultimate end, 
namely, the supremacy of reason. But we shall touch 
upon quite another much less physical aspect of this 
impvdse ; and hence the conunand to permit ourselves 
its satisfaction, solely as means to propagate the race, is 
even at this point to be restricted by the consideration 
that it must at least not be our fault if that end is not 
attained tliereby. 

Our investigation would be at an end, and there would 
be no marriage relation and no duties of such relation, 
if the end of Nature in the sexual union required merely 
activity of two persons. It is well known, and has just 
now been restated, inider what conditions it is permitted 
to act upon an impulse of Nature; and there is just as 
little difhculty in thinking a free, reciprocal action of two 
persons permissible, provided both have consented to it. 

This, however, is not the case here. The peculiar 
arrangement of Nature is this, that in the union of the 
sexes for the propagation of the race only the one sex 
should be active and the other altogether passive. (See 
my Science of Rights.) This simple ground gives rise to 
the most delicate relations amongst men. 

It is impossible that in a rational being there should 
be an impulse to keep ■purely passive, to merely surrender 
itself to an external influence as the mere object of its 
use. Mere passivity utterly contradicts reason, and 
annuls it. As sure, therefore, as reason rules in woman, 



344 THE SCIENCE OF ETflTCS. I 

and has had influence in the development of her character, 

the sexual impulse cannot appear as an impulse to be 

])urely passive, but must change itself into an impulse | 

to be likewise active. If the above arrangement of Nature " < 

is to co-exist with such an impulse, the latter can be only 

an impulse in woman to satisfy a man, and not herself; 

to surrender herself, not for her own sake, but for the 

sake of the other. Such an impulse is called love. Love \ 

is Nature and lleason in their most original union. ij 

It is not proper to say that it is woman's duty to love, \ 

for love is mixed with a natural impulse which does ;j 

not depend upon freedom ; but it is proper to say that, j| 

wherever there is but the least inclination for morality, ;! 

the natural impulse can appear only under the form of !■ 

love. The sexual impulse of woman in its mere brutish- 'I 

ness is the most repulsive and repugnant of everything I 

in Nature ; and, at the same time, indicates the absolute j 

absence of all morality. The unchastity of the heart in I' 

a woman — which shows itself in this, that the sexual ■ '; 

impulse manifests itself in her in an immediate manner i; 

— is the basis of all vices (even though from other reasons ! 

she may never allow that impulse to break out in acts) ; 
whereas, on the other liaud, womanly purity and chastity 
— which consists in this, that the sexual impulse shows 
itself never as such impulse, but always in the form of ' 

love — is the source of all that is noble and great in 
woman. Eor woman, chastity is the principle of all 
morality. 

When a woman surrenders herself to a man from love, 
the morally necessary result is a marriage. 

Firstly, on the part of the woman. By giving herself, ; 

she gives herself wholly, with all that is hers, with her j 

strength, her will, and, in short, with her whole empirical 
Ego ; moreover, she gives herself for ever. She givt.-s 
herself wholly : for she gives her personality ; and if she ' 

excepted anything from her submission, this excepted 
something would seem to have more value in her eyes 



CONCERNING THE PARTICULAR DUTIES. 345 

than her own person, wliich ccrt.'iinly would con.sliLute 
the utnio>st derogiition and contempt of her person, .such 
as could not co-exist with a moral mode of thinking. 
She gives herself for ever. For only on the presupposition 
that she has given herself without any reservation, and 
that she has lost her life and her will in the l>elovcd, 
and that she can not be otherwise than his, can her 8ul> 
mission arise from love, and co-exist with a moral way 
of thinking. But if in the hour of submission she could 
think herself at any future time as not his, she would 
not feel herself thus impelled to surrender herself, which 
contradicts the presupposition and annuls morality. 

The mere conception of love involves that of marriage 
in the explained significance of the word ; and to say 
that a moral woman can give herself up only to love is 
the same as to .say that she can give her.self only on the 
presupposition of a marriage. 

Secondly, on the part of the man. The whole moral 
character of woman rests upon the above conditions. 
Now no man has a right to demand the sacrifice of a 
human character. The man can therefore accept the 
submission of the woman only on these conditions, on 
which alone woman can nudce the surrender ; for other- 
wise man would treat woman not as a moral being, but 
as a mere thing. Even if a woman should voluntarily 
oiler herself on other conditions, man could not accept 
her submission ; and the rule of law volenti non Jit 
injuria has here no application whatever. AYe cannot 
make use of another one's immorality — and in the present 
case it would be absolute corruption — without making 
ourselves guilty of it. 

From these premises it appears that the satisfaction 
of the sexual impulse is permitted only in marriage, in 
the stated significance of the word ; and that outside of 
marriage it involves in woman utter disregard of her 
moral character, and in man participation in this crime 
and the making use of an animal inclination. Between 



346 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

persons of dinercnt sexes there is no union for the satis- 
faction of their impulse possil)le except the union of a 
perfect and indissohible marriage. In marriage, more- 
over, the sexual union, which in itself bears the impress 
of coarse brutishness, receives quite another cliaracter 
worthy of a rational being. It becomes the utter melting 
together of two rational individuals into one ; uncon- 
ditioned surrendering on the part of the woman ; pledges 
of intensest tenderness and generosity on the part of the 
man. Womanly purity remains inviolate even in mar- 
riage, and only in marriage. Woman surrenders herself 
always only to love, and even in man the natural impulse 
— which man, however, may well enough confess to 
himself — receives quite another form, and becomes love 
returned. 

This relation of husband and wife extends throughout 
all their mutual affairs, and its intensity grows with the 
continuation of the maiTiage. The wife can never cease 
to utterly cling to her husband, and to be lost in him 
without reservation ; for, if she did, she would have to 
give up, in her own eyes, her dignity, and would be forced 
to believe that her own sexual impulse, instead of love, 
had led her to surrender herself. On the other hand, 
the husband cannot cease to return to her everything 
and more than she has given to him, and to be esteemable 
and noble; for it is not only the temporal fate of the 
wife, but the confidence which she has in her own 
character, which depends upon the husband's behaviour. 
Moral commandments cannot be specified regarding the 
marriage relation. If that relation is as it should be, 
it is a commandment to itself ; if it is not so, it is one 
connected crime, utterly incapable of reform through 
moral rules. There is only one result, which I shall 
point out. 

It is the absolute destination of each individual of 
both sexes to marry. Physical man is neither man nor 
woman, but both ; and it is the same with the moral man. 



CONCERNING THE PARTICULAR DUTIES. 347 

There arc trails of the huniaii character, and n»orcovcr 
the very noblest, which can be cultivated only in mar- 
riage, such as the surrendering love of the wife; the all- 
to-his-wife sacrificing generosity of the husband ; the 
necessity to be venerable, if not for his own, at least 
for the wife's sake ; the true friendship between both — 
friendship is possible only in marriage, and there it results 
necessarily ; the parental emotions, &c., &c. The original 
tendency of mankind is egotistic; in marriage even Nature 
leads man to forget himself in the other; and the marriage 
union of both sexes is the only way in whicli man can 
be ennobled through Nature. An unmarried person is 
only half a man. 

True we cannot say to any woman. You sliall love ; nor 
to any man. You shall be loved, and shall love in return ; 
for this does not depend altogether upon freedom. But 
this absolute command can be established: it must not 
be knowingly our own fault if we remain unmarried. 
The clearly-resolved intention never to marry is absolutely 
immoral. To remain unmarried without one's own fault 
is a great misfortune; but purposely to remain so is a 
great guilt. It is not allowable to sacrifico this end to 
other ends ; as, for instance, to the service of the State 
or of the Church, or to family • considerations, or to the 
quiet of a speculative life ; for the end, to be a complete 
and whole man, is higher than any other end. 



348 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS, 

B. 

THE RELATION OF PATIENTS AND CIIILDItEN TO EACH OTHER, 
AND THE EDUCATION OF CHILDREN. 

Wc Uo not speak here of the mutual duties of parents 
in general towards children, as uneducated and inex- 
perienced rational beings. Much might, it is true, be 
said on this subject ; but what wc have to investigate at 
present is the relation between parents and their ovjii 
children in regard to their mutual duties. Tliis relation 
between them does not result from any freely -created 
conception, but is based upon an arrangement of Nature, 
which it is necessary to show up, in order thereby to 
develop this moral relation. 

Between father and child there is absolutely no con- 
scious and freely-directed natural connection. The act 
of generation, from which some philosophers attempt to 
deduce rights and duties, occurs, as such, without freedom 
and consciousness ; and there does not arise from it any 
cognition of the generated child. But there does exist 
such a natural connection, accompanied by consciousness, 
between mother and child. In her womb the fruit 
generates itself, and the preservation of her own life is 
connected with the preservation and health of the child ; 
and she is conscious of this. She knows upon- what 
object she wastes this continuous, ever returning, care, 
and thus becomes accustomed to consider its life as part 
of her own life. The child is borne by the mother at the 
risk of her life, and under great pain. Its birth is, for 
the mother, at the same time, an end to her pain ; neces- 
sarily a sight to gladden her heart. The animal union of 
both continues even for some time after the birth ; and in 
the mother is prepared the food of the child, which the 
fonner feels as much need to give as the latter to receive. 
The mother preserves her child because she needs it ; and 
it is so even in regard to animals. 

Now, it is absolutely against the dignity of a rational 



CONCERNING THE PARTICULAR DUTIES. 349 

bcincj that it should, in any case, be driven by a mere 
natural instinct. True, this instinct neither can, nor 
should, be eradicated; but when united to reason and 
freedom it will appear, as we saw above in tlic case of 
woman's sexual impulse, in another form. What may 
this form be ? According to the mere arrangement of 
Nature, the need of the child was also a physical need 
of the mother. But if we assume it to be a being with 
consciousness and freedom, the mere impulse of Nature 
will change into sentiment and af'iection ; the physical now 
will be replaced by a need of the heart on the part of the 
mother freely to make the preservation of the child her 
own. This affection is the sentiment of fity and 
sympathy. It is just as improper to say of a mother's 
pity, that it is her duty, as it is to say so of a wife's love ; 
it is rather the necessary result of the original union of 
the natural impulse and reason. But it is proper to say 
of both, that they condition the possibility of morality. 
Of a woman who is not capable of feeling motherly 
tenderness, it may doubtless be said that she does not 
rise above brutishness. It is only after the affection has 
manifested itself that freedom enters, and is accompanied 
by a command of duty. The mother is in duty bound to 
give herself up to these sentiments, to nourish them 
within her, and to suppress whatsoever might tend to 
deaden them. 

The love of the father for his child, on the other hand. 
— deducting everything which is the result of our civil 
legislation, of public opinion, or of imagination — is only 
a mediated love. It arises from the father's love of the 
mother. His tenderness towards his wife makes it a 
joy and a duty to him to share her feelings, and tlius 
there arise within him love for his child and care for ils 
preservation. 

The first duty of both parents towards their child is 
care for its preservation. In saying this, I speak as to 
how matters would be if we were, and could be, truer to 



1 



350 THE SCIENCE OE ETHICS. 

Nature — namely, if huHband and wife would always live 
and work tof,'cther ; and if, tlicrcforc, the child would 
always be under their eyes, and live together with them. 
Ill this case the parents — since man is but too much \ 

inclined to transfer reason and freedom to everything 
outside of him* — would transfer their own conceptions 
to the child, and would treat it accordingly. And hence 
it could not fail that traces of the reason assumed in the 
child, and demanded of it by this reciprocal causality, 
between itself and its parents, would soon exhibit them- 
selves. 

According to the necessary conceptions of free beings, 
freedom belongs to our welfare in the same way that 
reason is attached to it ; and since the parents love their 
child, and desire its welfare, they cannot wish to deprive 
it altogether of freedom. But since, at the same time, 
they watch over its preservation, as over an end demanded 
both by Nature and duty, they can favour and admit this 
freedom only in so far as it is possible to co-exist with 
the preservation of the child. 

Such is the first conception of education, or, as this 
first part of it might be named separately, of the training 
of children. It is the duty of parents to preserve their 
child ; it is also their duty to spare and favour its freedom; 
hence, in so far as the latter might hurt the former, it is 
their duty to subordinate the use of the child's freedom 
to their highest end in the child, namely to its preser- 
vation. In other words, it is a duty to train children. 

• But soon the duty of a higher education — of an edu- 
cation for morality — is manifested. This for the following 
reason : The parents have discovered the freedom — for the 
present only the formal freedom — of the child ; but every 
free being is capable of morality, and ought to be educated 

* That is, to consider liis own reason, when icflectefl from sonic 
external thing, to be the property of that externality itself — for instance, 
to assume reason in plants, brutes — nay, the whole world itself. — 
Tranilalor, 



CONCERNING THE PARTICULAR DUTIES. 351 

to become a moral being ; lieiice, also, the cliild. Now, 
for the sake of the physical preservation of the child, it 
is necessary tliat the child should at first live together 
with the parents; and hence the parents alone can edu- 
cate the child into a moral being. This duty of a moral 
education involves the following: Firstly, tlie duty to 
develop properly the faculties of the child, with a view 
to enable it to become a good tool for the promotion of 
tlie ultimate end of reason, and hence the duty to produce 
ability on the part of the child. This is, indeed — we say 
this merely in passing, since it cannot be our purpose 
here to exhaust the theory of education — the true end of 
education, in so far as it depends upon art and rules — 
namely, to develop and cultivate the free faculties of the 
child. Next comes the duty to give to this thus culti- 
vated freedom of the child a moral direction, which can 
be done only in the general manner previously indicated 
— namely, by leading it to work" for the promotion of 
morality outside of itself. 

Now let us ask, What is the relation of parents and 
children to each other in this education ? 

It is often the duty of parents to restrict the freedom 
of their children, partly for the sake of their preservation 
— for they cannot allow a use of freedom which would 
be injurious to the life and health — and partly for the 
sake of developing their abilities. In the latter respect 
they must cause the cliildren to do what will promote 
this development, and prevent them from doing whatever 
might retard it, or, at least, whatever docs not promote 
it, since all this would only occasion a loss of time and 
strength. But they must not restrict their children's 
freedom for the sake of morality. For actions are moral 
only in so far as they are done or left undone with 
freedom. 

It is scarcely possible that a question should arise 
concerning the right of parents to restrict the freedom 
of their children. I respect the formal freedom of every 



352 THE SCIENCE OE ETHICS. 

man, Ijccnusc I nmst rc^^ard him as a morally cultivated 
being, and must look upon his freedom as a means to 
promote the end of reason. I cannot be his judge, since 
he is on an equality with me. ]>ut my ciiild I do not 
regard as a morally cultivated being. I rather regard it 
as a being which still has to be so cultivated ; and pre- 
cisely as such a being it is given to me through the duty 
to educate it. Hence, to accomplish the same end, for 
which I must respect the freedom of these who are my 
equals, must I restrict the freedom of the child. 

It is the duty of the parents to restrict the freedom of 
the children, in so far as its use might be injurio\is to 
their education ; but no further. Every other restriction 
is immoral, for it is opposed to the end of such restriction. 
It is their freedom which is to be cultivated ; hence they 
must hoave freedom to make this culture possible. Parents 
must not prohibit anything to their children from mere 
obstinacy, or for the purpose of breaking their wdll, as 
the saying goes. Only that will, which runs in opposition 
to the end of education, should be broken. Will in 
general, the children ought to have; for they are to 
become free beings, and not will-less machines for the 
use of the first-comer who chooses to take possession of 
them. Concerning this, however, the parents are the 
only judges, and have to settle the matter with their 
own conscience. If no other means can be found to 
subject children to the end of education than compulsion, 
the parents have the right of compulsion ; and in that 
case it becomes their duty to force the children, since the 
moral end of their education can be attained in no other 
manner. If the child is forced, it is, and remains, a mere 
object of the action of its parents. It has freedom only 
within the sphere where the compuls-ion ceases ; and this 
■freedom is to be considered as the result of the action 
of the parents. The acts of the children within this 
sphere have, therefore, no morality, being, as they are, 
compulsory. . 



CONCERNING THE PARTICULAR DUTIES. 353 

Nevertheless, morality is to be developed in the child. 
Hence something must remain in the child as the result 
of its own freedom ; and this something is voluntary 
obedience. This voluntary obedience cojisists in this — 
tlmt the child does voluntarily, without compulsion, or 
fear of compulsion, what the parents command, and leaves, 
in the same manner, undone what the parents prohibit; 
and all this merely because its parents have commanded 
or prohibited it. For if the children themselves arc 
.convinced of the goodness and propriety of what lias 
been commanded, and so much convinced that their own 
inclination prompts them to do it, then it is no longer 
obedience, but insight, which impels them to do it. 
Obedience is based, not upon a particular insight into 
the wisdom' of what has been commanded, but upon 
childish faith in the higher wisdom and goodness generally 
of the parents. 

It is as improper to say that this childish obedience is 
a duty, as to say that the love or sympathy of the wife is 
a duty. This obedience results from a moral disposition 
generally, and will manifest itself always under a correct 
treatment of children ; for it is based only upon respect 
for, and submission to, the not clearly comprehended, but 
dimly felt, superiority of reason and of morality, joined 
to a love for the same, and a desire to participate in it 
likewise. This is the source of obedience ; and if any- 
thing proves that goodness is inherent in human nature, 
it is this obedience. 

When the obedience has once taken root, it may be 
strengthened and increased by freedom ; the child may, 
with predilection, surrender itself to the considerations 
and sentiments which heighten it ; and then, and in this 
respect only, does obedience become a dut?/ which children 
owe to their parents. It is the only duty of children, 
and develops itself in advance of all other moral feelings, 
since it is the root of all morality. Even afterwards, 
when morality has become possible within the sphere 
2 A 



354 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

set upart by the parents for the cliild'a fro.cdom, it still 
remains tlie higliest duty. Beyond that sphere the cliild 
should not insist on being free. 

Obedience on the part of the child gives direction lo 
its whole moral mode of thinking. Hence it is all- 
important. For as the cultured man is related to the 
moral law in general, and to its executor— God, so the 
child is related to the commands of its parents and to 
those parents themselves. It is an absolute duty to do 
what the moral law comniands, without speculating about 
the consequences. But in order to be able to do so, wc 
must necessarily assume that these results will be turned 
to a good account in the hands of God. In the same 
way the child is related to the commands of its parents. 
In the Christian religion God is represented under the 
image of the Father. This is excellent. But we should 
not content ourselves simply with ever and ever talking 
about this goodness. We should also consider our moral 
obedience to Him, and the childish resignation to His 
will, without speculation and doubt, which we owe Him 
and which we ought to exhibit, not in mere sentimentality 
and self-comforting, but particularly in courageous execu- 
tion of our duty, no matter what results our short- 
sightedness would appear to discover in that duty. The 
cultivation of this obedience is the only means through 
which the parents can call forth a moral disposition on 
the part of their children ; lience it is most emphatically 
their duty to teach their chiLdren obedience. It is a very 
false maxim, which, like various other evils, we owe to a 
prevailing cndacmonism, that we should make our children 
do our behests through rational argument and according 
to their own insight. Besides other reasons of its wrong- 
ness it involves, moreover, the absurdity of assuming 
that the child has a good deal more reason than we have 
ourselves; since even grown persons act mostly from 
inclinations and not from rational grounds. 

The question still remains to be answered: How far 



CONCERNING THE PARTICULAR DUTIES. 355 

may the conditioned obedience on the part of the children, 
and its requirements on the part of the parents, extend ? 
(Every obedience is uyicondilioncd and also blind; for 
otherwise it is not obedience. It is blind for the 
particular. A blind obedience in general is not possible ; 
for it is necessarily based upon our conviction of the 
higher wisdom and goodness of the person we obey.) 

This question may signify a twofold. We may ask for 
the extension of obedience so far as relates to the sphere 
of acts, within which the child owes obedience to its 
parents ; or, in other words, we may ask, how far does 
the child owe obedience ? Secondly, we may ask for the 
2Jrotension of this obedience ; or, Jiow long does the child 
owe obedience to its parents ? Is there not a point iu 
time when the child becomes free ? And where is this 
point ? 

So far as the first question is concerned, it may be 
raised either by the parents or by the children. The 
child must not raise this question — and this is, indeed, 
the solution of the problem — for the child ought to be 
obedient, and its very obedience consists in that it should 
not wish to be free beyond the sphere fixed by the 
parents. Only the parents can be the judges concerning 
tlie necessary limit of this obedience; and the child 
cannot be the judge, since it obediently submits to them. 
The phrase, " A child ought to obey in all things that are 
fair," is a complete self-contradiction. He who obeys 
only in " fair " things, does not obey at all ; for it involves 
that he should have a view in the matter as to what is 
fair. If he does only what is fair, as such, he does it 
from his own insight, and not from obedience. AVhether 
it is proper in particular cases to insist upon obedience or 
not, the parents must settle with their own conscience; but 
they cannot allow themselves to be placed before the judg- 
ment-seat of their own children. " But how if the parents 
should command the child to do an improper action ? " 
I reply : The immorality of the command can only 



356 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

appear either after a careful investigation, or, imine'liatcly 
at the first glance. The first case cannot occur lierc, 
since the ol)cdient child does not presuppose that its 
parents will enjoin an immoral action. If the second 
case occurs, the ground of tiie child's obedience, namely, 
its faith in the higher morality of the parents, falls away, 
and further obedience would be immoral. It is the same 
in regard to cases where the existing immorality and 
wickedness of behaviour on the part of parents becomes 
immediately manifest lo the children. In Buch cases, 
obedience of the children, and education through their 
parents, are impossible. 

If, as is fairer, the parents raise the above question, 
then the answer is this : Give no commands whereof you 
are not convinced before your own conscience, that they 
will promote, according to your best conviction, the end 
of education. You have no internal moral right to 
require further obedience. 

If the second question is asked, namely, How long does 
the duty of obedience last ? the answer is as follows : 

Firstly, obedience is required for the sake of education ; 
but education is means to an end ; and the means ceases 
when the end is attained. The end of education is: 
utility of the child's faculties for the promotion of the 
ultimate end of reason in some specific branch and for 
some special department. Whether this end has been 
attained, the child itself cannot decide; for it acknow- 
ledges better insight on the part of the parents. Either 
\X\^ -parmts themselves decide, therefore, that the end is 
attained, and voluntarily allow full freedom to the child ; 
or the result itself decides, that the end of education- 
utility— is attained. Externally the State is a competent 
judge in this matter. Hence, if the State confers an 
office upon a son, &c., it thereby pronounces that son's 
education completed; and this judgment of the State 
binds the parents both legally and morally— for the 
parents must submit themselves to the State for the sake 



CONCERNING THE PARTICULAR DUTIES. 357 

of duty. Or, finally, the education of the child is no 
lon^^er possible ; and this occurs throu;^h marringc. The 
daughter submits herself to her husljand, upo)i whose 
will she depends, and can, therefore, no longer depend 
upon the will of tiie parents. The son undertakes to 
care for the fate of his wife wholly in accordance with 
her wishes, and hence he can no longer allow himself to 
be determined by the wishes of his parents. 

But even after children have been set free, a peculiar 
moral relation continues between them and their parents. 
The parents — if, as we have been presupposing, they were 
also the educators of the children — know their whole 
character, for they have seen it arise under their very 
eyes, and have helped to cultivate it. They know the 
child's character better than the child itself. Hence they 
remain the child's best advisers ; and for this reason it 
remains the duty of the parent inc-miincntly and before 
all other men — this is the important point — for otherwise 
this would be no particular relation, but merely the 
general relation (which makes it a duty to give good 
advice to all men) — to give advice to their children ; and 
it is the duty of the children to listen more attentively 
to the advice of their parents than to that of other 
persons, and to consider it more maturely. True, 
obedience is no longer a duty to them ; they are released 
from it, and can act now according to their own con- 
victions ; but it is their duty to attentively consider and 
weigh such advice. The parents retain the duty to care 
for their children ; the children the duty to venerate their 
parents. (Veneration consists precisely in this, that we 
presuppose higher wisdom in the other, and take pains 
to find wisdom and goodness in all his counsels. Lack 
of veneration consists in rejecting, without examination, 
what the other says.) 

Finally, there remains between parents and children 
the particular duty to assist and support each other. 
The children thus preserve in their parents their guides 



358 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

and advisora ; and the parents prcsorve in thoir childron 
their own work, which thoy have cultivated for the world 
in order to fulfil their duties to the world, even after their 
death. 

We shall now speak, in conclusion, of the duties of man 
in his particular vocation. 

It has already been explained what vocation generally 
means. The promotion of the ultimate end of reason 
involves many things; and tliat part of this end, the 
promotion whereof a single individual assumes in par- 
ticular, is his vocation. It has also been stated what 
maxim should govern us in selecting our vocation; not 
inclination, but duty. 

The true object of reason is always the community of 
rational beings. Our actions may either be directed 
upon them immediately, or upon Nature for their sake. 
An acting upon Nature, merely for the sake of Nature, 
does not exist; the ultimate end of all acting is always 
mankind. Upon this the chief division of all possible 
human vocation is based. We miglit call the former the 
higher vocation, and the latter the lower ; and we might 
thus divide all mankind into a hierher and lower class. 

First of all : In how many ways is it possible to act 
directly upon man as a rational being ? 

The first and highest, although not the noblest, in man, 
and the primary substance of his whole spiritual life, is 
cognition or intellect. Through it are his actions directed; 
and the best intentions, though they retain their moral 
value, do not conduce to a realization of the end of reason, 
unless the cognition is correct. Hence the community of 
human beings may be acted upon, firstly, for the sake 
of cultivating their theoretical insight. This is the voca- 
tion of the scholar ; and we shall therefore have to speak 
firstly : Concernincf the duties of the scholar. 

Nevertheless, insight is, and remains, only means for an 
end. Without a good will it has no internal value, and 



THE THEORY OF DUTTES. 359 

does little good to the community of rational l)cinf^H. 
lliit itself docs not produce necessarily a good will; this 
most important proposition we have established most 
clearly above. Thus there remains the particular task 
of working immediately for the improvement of the will 
in the community of men. This task is the proljlcm of 
the Church, which is itself this very community of 
rational beings, through its servants, the so-called clergy- 
men, who should rather be called, and be, the moral 
instructors of the people. We shall, therefore, have to 
speak secondly : Concerning the duties of the instructors of 
the fco'ph. 

Between both the scholar, whose duty it is to cultivate 
the intellect, and the popular instructor, whose duty it is 
to cultivate the will, there stands the fcsthetical artist, 
whose duty is to cultivate the resthetical sense, which 
serves man as a point of union for the intellect and 
the will. We shall, therefore, add a few words; Con- 
ccrning the duties of the ccsthetical artist. 

As soon as men come together under a reciprocal 
influence, their legal relation must, above all, be secured. 
This is the condition of all society. The institution 
which achieves this object is called the State. We sliall, 
therefore, have to speak : Concerning the dtUics of State 
officials. 

So far concerning the higher class of mankind. 

The life of man, and his causality in the sensuous 
world, is conditioned by certain connections of his with 
coarse matter. If men are to cultivate themselves into 
morality, they must live, and the conditions of this life, 
in material Nature, must be produced, so far as they are 
under the control of man. In this manner is the most 
unseeming occupation, usually held to be the very lowest, 
connected with the promotion of the ultimate end of 
reason. It relates itself to the preservation and free 
activity of moral beings, and is thereby sanctified the 
same as the highest occupation. 



36o THE SCIENCE OF ETiriCS. 

In tl,e prmluction of tl.ut wl.icl. servos to our no„n.|,- 
nicn covonnc, and to tools of our activity, Nature cithei 
n uy be directed and assiste.l. which furnishes the vocation 
of the agncuUurists, vvlio direct organic life, and whose 
vocation, looked at fron, this standpoint, is a sublime one 
or Nature n.ay l>e left to herself, teaching n.en n,er ly to 
.gather and hunt up her self-produced products, whic^ 
^jnnshes the vocation of the nnne, fisher, hunter. Z. 
11 ese severa classes might be embraced with the agri- 
cu Ituns s under the general name of: The vroäucino cL. 
Bu the raw products of Nature must also, to a certain 
extent, be remoulded for the purposes of mein; and t 
they become products of art. This furnishes the vocation 
of professional men, manufacturers, artists, &c. ; all of 

t?e'i; '''''' '^'%^^^ P^-«^»^^ works of art, I should like . 
to call art^sts; distinguishing them, however, from the 
aesthetical artist. 

Moreover, there must be amongst men an exchange of 
the various things which they need. It will be verv 
expedient to establish a particular vocation of men who 
exc usively carry on this exchange. This furnishes the 
vocation of merchants. 

But the duties of these various branches of the lower 
class are nearly the same, and hence we have to speak, in 

Z: Z' ' "'"""^^ """^"'-^"'^^ ''' cluiiL/tKe 



I. Concerning the duties of the Scholar. 

bound to regard them morally, and as what they are 
gradually to become in actuality, namely, as a single 
family, it may well be assumed that, for this family, there 
exists also only one system of cognition, expandu . and 
perfec ing itself from age to age. Like the' indiWdual. 
the whole race grows wiser in the course of years and 
develops itself through experience. ' 



THE THEORY OF DUTIES. 361 

The knowledge of every age is to increase and mount 
higher; und to eflect this is the duty of tlie scholars. 

The scholars are, first of all, the depositaries, or, as it 
were, the archives of the culture of an age; and tliis 
they are not like the others, with reference to the mere 
results, but they are, at the same time, possessed of the 
principles. They not only know that something is as it 
is, but, at the same time, how man arrived at this know- 
ledge, and how it is connected with his other knowledge. 
This is necessary for them, because they are to develop 
sucii cognition to a higher degree, which involves its 
correction ; and tliis correction is impossible unless the 
principles are known from which that cognition is 
derived. From this there results, firstly, that a scholar 
should know the progress of science to his own day, and 
should historically know the principles it has made use of. 

Again, the scholar is to further and raise this spirit of 
his age, either through correcting it, which is also an 
expansion of knowledge, since he, who has been relieved 
of an error, has had his knowledge increased ; or through 
further conclusions from what is already known. 

The scholar investigates, corrects, and invents, not 
merely for himself, but for the whole community ; and 
it is only thus that his labour becomes a moral labour, 
and that he fulfils a duty ; being the servant of the 
community in his vocation. His immediate sphere of 
labour is the republic of scholars ; and from them do the 
results of his investigation spread over the community in 
the well-known way. 

It is scarcely necessary to add expressly, that his mode 
of thinking can be called moral in its form only, if lie 
pursues science truly from love of duty, and with the 
insight that, in doing so, he satisfies a duty to the human 
race. At present we only ask : WJiat ought he to do ? 
This is to be answered by what we have already stated. 
He is partly to know, and partly to further, the object of 
the culture of his age. He must really try to further it, 



302 THE SCIENCE OE ET I TICS. 

for only tlins docs he acquire a true value of his own. 
Should he, however, not be al^le to do so, the fault must, 
at least, not be his; he must have had the fixed will, and 
the zeal, and energy, to do it. Only thus has his existence 
not been an idle one — has he, at least, kept alive science 
in his age, and has been a link in the chain of the transfer 
of culture. To bring life into the spirit of investigation 
is also a true and im])ortant science. 

Strict love of truth is the real virtue of the scholar. 
He should actually increase the knowledge of the human 
race, and not merely play with it. He should, like every 
virtuous person, forget himself in his object. What 
service can, indeed, be accomplished by propounding 
glittering paradoxes, or asserting and defining errors, 
which have escaped his lips ? To do so would be merely 
to support his egotism. But this the moral law utterly 
condemns ; and prudence likewise should condenni it, for 
only the true and good remains amongst mankind; and 
the false, however it may glitter at first, perishes. 

2. Concerning the duties of the Moral Instructor 
of the People. 

All men together constitute a single moral community. 
It is the moral disposition of each one to diffuse morality 
outside of himself, as well as he is able, and knows how to 
do it ; or, in other words, to make all others of the same 
disposition as himself, since each one necessarily holds 
his own to be the best ; for otherwise it were immoral to 
retain it. But each other one also holds his conflicting 
opinion to be the best, and for the same reason. Thus 
there results, as the collective object of the whole moral 
community, to produce harmony respecting moral objects. 
This is the final end of all reciprocal activity amongst 
moral beings. In so far as society is regarded from this 
standpoint, we call it a Chureh. The Church, therefore, is 
not a separate society, as is often represented, but merely 



THE THEORY OE DUTIES. 363 

a pociiliar view taken of the same one great human 
society. All helong to the Church, in so far as they have 
the correct moral disposition, and all ought to belong to it. 

This general duty of all, to inlluence each other morally, 
may be transferred, and is transferred to a particulnr 
vocation. Not as if this transfer relieves anyone from 
the duty to work for the reform of others, if an oppor- 
tunity offers ; but merely that he no longer needs to make, 
tills his particular end in life. Those wlio assume this 
vocation are, in so far, oflicials, or servants, of the Church. 
All are to influence all; and hence those to whom this 
duty is transferred, educate in the name of all. They 
must start from what all are agreed upon, namely, the 
symbol, which we have already discussed when we showed 
its necessity from another reason. They must proceed in 
their teaching towards that end, concerning which all 
shall be agreed. The moral teacher must therefore see 
further than the others — he must possess the best and 
surest results of the moral culture of his age, and must 
lead them to it. He is therefore, and ouglit to be, a 
scholar in this particular branch of science. All are 
to become agreed, but they are also to remain united 
during their progress ; and hence he must advance so that 
all can follow him. True, he is to rise higher as soon as 
possible, but not sooner than it is possible to carry along 
all with him. Whenever, in his teachings, he advances 
beyond the culture of all, he no longer addresses them 
all, and speaks no longer in their name, but rather in his 
own name. Now, this latter, he is certainly allowed to 
do as a private person, or as a member of the republic of 
scholars, wherein he also speaks in his own name, and 
propounds the results of his own reason; but where he 
speaks as a servant of the Church, he represents not his 
own body, but the community. 

Morality develops itself alone, and of itself, in the heart 
of man, with freedom, and through the mere rational 
education of sociable communion. It cannot be jDroduced 



364 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

artificially, throuj^di theoretical conviction, as wc have 
clearly .seen above. Inclination for morality i.s pre- 
supposed in those public institutes of moral education ; 
und the clergyman must necessarily presuppose it, since 
it alone makes his ollice possible, and has given rise to it. 
Innnoral men have no Church, and no representative in 
regard to their duties to the Church. It follows from 
this, that it cannot be at all the intention of those public 
religious institutions to propound theoretical proofs, and 
to establish a system of morals ; or, indeed, to speculate 
about first principles. The Church does not establish 
these proofs, because it believes them already, as sure as 
it is a Church. This faith of the Church is a fact ; and 
it is the business altogether of the scholars (not of the 
Church) to develop that faith d 'priori from principles. 
The object of these pul)lic moral teaciiings can, therefore, 
be none other than to enliven and strengthen that already 
existing general inclination for morality ; and to remove 
whatsoever might make it internally wavering, or prevent 
it externally from manifesting itself in acts. But there 
is nothing of this kind, except the doubt whether it is 
really possible to promote the ultimate end of morality, 
and whether there is really a progress in goodness, or 
whether this whole sentiment is not rather a phantasm ; 
nor is there anything which can enliven and strengthen 
this moral disposition beyond the first faith that the 
promotion of the end of reason is possible, and that there 
necessarily results a progress in goodness. This faith, 
however, when more closely investigated, shows itself to 
be a faith in God and immortality. The promotion of 
the good does not progress regularly, unless there is a 
God ; for it is involved neither in the laws of Xature, 
which has no relation at all to freedom, nor is it within 
the power of finite beings ; and from the same reason — 
namely, because finite beings can work only with forces 
of Nature. To say that progression occurs necessarily, 
and in regular order, is to say there is a God. Again, to 



TFfE THEORY OF DUTIES. 365 

pay that, we projfrcss in ref^ular order towards our ultimate 
end, is to say we are immortal ; for our ultimate end can 
be reached in no time. 

The moral instructor treats, therefore, more particularly 
of the articles of faith. He does not deduce them d 'priori, 
for this faith follows immediately from a moral dis- 
position, and he presupposes the one, as well as the 
other; but he puts life into them precisely by pre- 
supposing them as well known, and thus referring men 
to God and eternity. It is a great advantage of these 
men, who have an external Church, that they become 
accustomed to relate their lowest occupations to the most 
sublime thoughts which man can think — to God and 
eternity. 

In like manner it is the duty of the moral instructor 
to give the community instruction concerning the deter- 
mined application of the conception of duty — the love 
whereof he very justly presupposes in them. They all 
would like well enough to lead a rational and moral life ; 
but they only do not know well how they have to proceed 
to do it. Such is the presupposition from which the 
instructor starts ; and he speaks in the name of all of 
them, as they all would speak if they could be united 
into one person. How must we proceed to bring our- 
selves into this or that disposition which duty requires 
of us ? Such and similar questions he ought to answer. 
His instruction, indeed, is altogether practical, and cal- 
culated for immediate contemplation. 

In short — and these are his chief rules — lie neither 
•proves nor polemizes; for he presupposes the articles of 
faith as well known and generally accepted, and a good 
moral disposition as already existing. To denounce 
infidels in the meeting of the faithful, to terrify obstinate 
sinners, or to address the Church as a herd of wicked 
men — such is utterly opposed to the end he has in view. 
It ought to be assumed that such people will not come 
to the meeting, and that everyone who appears in it does 



366 THE SCIENCE OF ET//ICS. 

thereby already make public confession of his faith and 
good will. Again, since the teacher speaks in the name 
of the community, and in their name — but by no means 
in God's name, for he is as much under God as they, and 
is before Him but a miserable sinner like the others — he 
ought to speak precisely as they speak; as an adviser, 
not as a lawgiver; from experience, and not from 
arguments. 

So far as decided unbelievers are concerned, or men 
who do not recognize and respect duty, the moral in- 
structor has nothing to do with them in public meeting, 
as has already been said. His duty with them is of a 
particular and private nature. The manner how to deal 
with such ciiaracters has been stated above. Let him 
lead them back into themselves, and teach them to 
esteem themselves more than they may have done 
before. There is always a secret self-contempt and 
'despair of oneself at the basis of unbelief. Tliese are 
to be rooted out, and with them falls what is built upon 
them. In sucli a manner should the moral instructor 
deal with the particular moral requirements of individuals. 
He should always be ready to give advice on all these 
matters. He should hunt up even those who do not 
hunt him up, but — which is the chief point— always 
with modesty and with respect for the dignity and self- 
determination of every man. To give advice in particulnr 
cases of conscience is only required when he is specially 
appealed to. He has no right to force himself upon 
others. 

The essential and characteristic duty of the moral 
instructor is the duty of a good example. This he sets 
not only for himself, but for the whole community, whose 
representative he is. The faith of this community rests 
to the greatest extent upon his, and it is — when strictly 
taken — not much more than a faith in his faith. To 
them he is not this determined individual, but he is to 
them in truth the representative of the whole community 



THE THEORY OF DUTIES. 367 

of men, or of the wliole Church. Tluit which he pro- 
pounds he is to propound not as something whicli ho has 
committed to memory or invented through H]»eculation, 
but ns something discovered in his own internal ex- 
perience ; and it is precisely in this that they have faith, 
because everything in tliis field is oidy result of ex- 
perience. Now if his life contradicts his statements, 
they do not believe in liis experience; and as they can 
only have faith in it, since ho neither can, nor ought to, 
add theoretical reasoning, they do not believe in point of 
fact anytliitig he may say. 



3. Concerning the duties of the yEsthetical Artist. 

Since I have spoken of the relation of tlie scliolar and 
of the moral instructor to tlie culture of mankind, it is 
partly on my way to speak also of the OBsthetical artist, 
who has an influence upon tliat culture equally great, 
though not so immediately perceptible ; and partly it is 
a need of our age that everyone should do wliat is in 
liis power to do to efiect a thorough discussion of this 
matter. 

The fine arts do not cultivate the head like scholarship, 
nor the heart like moral instruction ; they cultivate the 
whole united man. They appeal neither to the under- 
standing nor to the heart, but to the whole soul of man 
in the union of all its faculties : to a third, composed both 
of heart and understanding. Perhaps the best way to 
express the manner in which the fine arts operate, is to 
say : they make the transcendental point of view the common 
point of vieio. The philosopher elevates himself and 
others to this standpoint laboriously, and after a fixed 
rule. But the soul of the artist occupies that standpoint 
without determinedly thinking it; it knows no other 
standpoint, and elevates those who give themselves up 
to his influence, to it in so imperceptible a manner, 
that they do not become conscious of the transition. 



368 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

I iiifiko Tiiysolf clearer. From the transcendental point 
of view we make the world ; from the common point of 
view the world is given to us; from the fcsthetical point 
of view the world is also given to us, l)ut only according 
to the view in which it is made. The world, the act\ially 
given world, Nature in short — for I only speak of her — 
has two sides ; she is both product of our limitation, and 
she is product of our free, of course, ideal acting (by iw 
means of an actual causality). From the first point of 
view Nature herself is everywhere limited; from the 
second point of view everywhere free. The first view 
is common ; the second aBsthetical. Every form in space, 
for instance, can be regarded as a limitation through 
the adjoining bodies ; but it can also be looked upon 
as manifestation of its own internal fulness of power. 
Whosoever follows the first view sees only caricatures, 
oppressed and frightened forms ; whereas he, who follows 
the second view, sees everywhere energetic fulness of 
Nature, life and growth ; in short, beauty. It is the 
same with the highest. The moral law commands abso- 
lutely, and suppresses all inclinations of Nature. He 
who holds this view is related to the moral law as its 
slave. But the moral law is, at the same time, the Ego 
itself ; it comes from out of the inmost depth of our own 
being, and when we obey it we, after all, only obey our- 
selves. He who looks at it thus, looks at it jesthetically. 
The artist regards every thing, from its beautiful side; he 
sees everything free and full of life. I do not speak here 
of the grace and cheerfulness which this view gives to our 
whole life. I here call attention only to the cultivating 
and ennobling effect which it has upon our ultimate end. 

But where is the world of the artist ? It is internally 
in mankind, and nowhere else. The fine arts, therefore, 
lead man back into himself, and make him at home with 
himself. They tear him loose from given Nature, and 
place him self-sufficient upon his own feet. And self- 
sufficiency of reason is our ultimate end. 



TI/E THEORY OF DUTIES. 369 

iRsthctical sen.so is not virtue, for tho moral law 
requires self-suflicicncy obtained through thought, whereas 
the resthetical sense conies to us of its own accord ; hub 
It is a preparation for virtue, and predisposes the soul * 
for virtue, so that wlien the morality ejiters, half of its 
work, namely, our liberation from sensuousness, is already 
achieved. 

yEsthetical culture has, tlierefore, a very effective 
relation to the promotion of the end of reason; and in 
this respect duties may be prescriljed to it. We cannot 
make it anyone's duty to take care of the justhetical 
culture of the human race, for we have seen that the 
resthetical sense does not depend upon freedom, and 
cannot be formed through conceptions, but must come 
■ altogether of itself. But we can enjoin on everyone, in 
the name of morality, not to check this culture, and not 
to help to make it impossible by spreading a vitiated 
taste. For everyone can have taste. Taste can be 
cultivated through freedom, and hence everyone can 
know what is a violation of taste. By spreading a 
vitiated taste for resthetic beauty, we do not leave men 
in that indifference wherein they await their future 
culture, but we misdirect their culture. Two rules can 
be established in reference to this subject. 

Firstly, for all men : Do not make yourself an artist 
against the will of Nature ; and you always do so against 
Nature if you do it without a special natural impulse, 
and do it simply by the compulsion of some arbitrarily- 
conceived notion. It is absolutely true that the artist 
is born. Eules keep genius in bounds, but do not them- 
selves produce genius, precisely because tiiey are rules, 
and, therefore, have limitation, and not freedom in view. 

Secondly, for the true artist: Take care not to fawn 
upon the coiTupted taste of your age from selfish 
motives, or desire for present glory. Eather strive to 
represent the ideal which floats before your mind, and 
forget everything else. The artist should inspire himself 
2 B 



:i7o THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

by the sanctity of his vocation, and .should Icain that by 
applying his talents, he docs not serve man, but duty. If 
he docs so, he will soon look upon his art with quite 
other eyes ; he will ])ecomG a better man, and at the 
same time a better artist. There is a plirase injurious 
both to art and morality : That lohich pleases us is bcauli/ul. 
It is very true that that which pleases the completely- 
cultivated mankind is beautiful, and alone is beautiful; 
but until mankind is so cultivated — and when will it 
ever be ? — the most tasteless works may please, because 
they are in fashion, and the greatest work of art may not 
find favour, because the age wherein it was made has not 
yet developed the sense wherewith to seize it. 

4. Concerning the duties of State Officials. 



According to the above, a State constitution is to be 
regarded as the result of the common will manifested in 
an expressly created, or in a tacitly-understood, compact. 
The tacit submission to, and acceptation of, established 
institutions, is equal to express consent, as we have shown. 
Whatsoever the State permits within the common sphere 
of the freedom of all citizens, each one may conscientiously 
do, since all other citizens have agreed so far to restrict 
their own freedom. Unless the State had given this 
permission, we should have to fear, at every free act within 
that common sphere, that it would interfere with the 
freedom of the others. 

The State oflicials — I speak here chiefly of the higher 
order, who participate in the legislative department, and 
from whom there is no appeal — are nothing but the 
administrators of this common will. They are elected by 
all citizens, and have not the right to alter the constitu- 
tion one-sidedly. It is their duty to consider themselves 
as thus the representatives of all, for it is only within 
the sphere of this form that they can act with a good 
conscience. If they arbitrarily alter the constitution in 



THE THEORY OF DUTIES. 371 

sucli a manner as to induce opposition to this alteration, 
tliey oppress the consciences of all citizens, and cause 
them to doubt whether they ought to obey tlie State, or 
obey the duty which they owe to the 'freedom of all 
others. 

Now there exists an a friori rule of law. The positive 
law of the State, which officials may be appointed to 
administer, may be opposed to this d iiriori law, may l^c 
harsh or unfair. How has the State official to conduct 
Jiimsclf under such a case? Eor the greatest part we 
have already answered this question. 

Firstly, the official may very well undertake the 
administration of this positive law and constitution, 
although, in his conviction, it is not perfectly conform- 
able to reason ; nay, if it is his vocation, it is duty to 
administer it. For there must be some sort of law and 
constitution, since otherwise there would be no State, 
and no progress ; for sake whereof the State exists. 
Now, the present existing constitution is presumptively 
conformable to the will of all ; and each one has, more- 
over, the privilege to desist from the rights conferred 
upon him by law, if he so chooses. 

Secondly, reason demands, and Nature, at the same 
time, has made provision, that these State governments 
shall, in course of time, approach more and more to 
the only form of government conformable to reason. 
Hence the State officials, who govern a State, must know 
this latter form. Those who rise from common ex- 
periences to conceptions, are called scholars, according 
to the above ; and hence the State official must be a 
scholar in his profession. Plato says: No prince can 
govern who is not possessed of the ideas ; and this is 
precisely what we say. He must, therefore, necessarily 
know, firstly, the constitution which he is chosen to 
administer, and the express, or tacit, compacts whereupon 
it rests; secondly, the State constitution, as it ought to 
be, or the ideal; and, thirdly, the way which mankind 



372 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

in pcnoral, and particularly his people, muBt proceed to 
attain the latter. 

Tliirdly, the manner of administering government may 
be concisely stated as follows : Let the ofTicials carry out 
absolutely, and without mildness or tenderness, tliat 
which absolute right, or natural law, demands ; Ijut tliat 
which only the written positive law requires, let them 
carry out only in so far as it may be considered tlie 
continuing result of the will on the part of the interested 
parties. 

I shall endeavour to make this clearer. It is a very 
false proposition that government is instituted for the 
benefit of the governed; or, in other words, that solus 
•poimli suprcma lex est. Law is, because it is ; it is 
absolute; it must be carried out, and if no one were 
benefited by it. {Fiat justitia et pereat mundus.) Again, 
it is not unlawful for anyone to desist from his right? 
for the benefit of another one. (Volenti non fit injuria.) 
But it is absolutely illegal to compel him thus to desist. 
Hence, if an unjust law exists, which could only be 
just if approved unanimously ; and if against this law 
opposition manifests itself, then it is the absolute duty 
of the lawgivers to repeal such law, no matter how 
much those who derive advantage from injustice may 
cry about violation of contract. If no objection is raised, 
the officials can carry it out conscientiously. 

(Since these principles are liable to misinterpretation, 
I propose to determine them more specifically. In a 
State, for instance, where the nobility is in the exclusive 
possession of the highest State offices, and of all landed 
property, the nolnlity hold sucli title almost altogether 
by virtue of a tacit understanding with tlie other citizens; 
for those other citizens agree to leave those offices and 
lands to the nobility, and to select for themselves other 
vocations. In this manner things remain in order ; and 
a regent who should one-sidedly, and without request, 
abroc^ate such an arrangement, would act utterly illegally 



THE T//EORY OF DUTIES. 373 

and despotically. He is sworn to cany it out, and ilie 
nobility has suhmittcd to him only on condition of .such 
promise on his j.art. If a sincrle citizen, iiavin- 
previously, thron^di his conduct, approved of such a 
State government, makes an attack upon these pre- 
sumptive rights of noljility, he becomes liable to punish- 
ment, and is justly punished according to the 'poütivc. 
law, which he has hitherto tacitly recognized; and by 
no means according to the natural law, since he ought 
to have appealed to this law in advance of his act, and 
not^ afterwards. Previously he took advantage of the 
positive laws ; hoAv can he now appeal to a law opposed 
to them ? But if a single citizen applies to the Govern- 
ment for his natural rights, he, by tliis very application, 
abrogates his compact with the nobility; nay, even with' 
his own class of citizens, since they have entered into 
that compact with the nobility. He thus withdraws 
altogether from the State compact, and must be satisfied 
to lose all the advantages which previously it ^conferred 
upon him ; as, for instance, the right to carry \m trade, 
&c. At the same time, that which he, in point of fact, 
demands by making his application, namely, to be 
admitted into the class of the nobility, must not be 
denied to him. It must be permitted to the single 
individuals, who prefer complaint about the injustice 
of such an arrangement, to cliange their class, for tliis 
is the only means to make good to them the injustice 
about which they complain ; and every State which does 
not grant tliis permission to change class, is absolutely 
illegal. Serfdom {glcha: aclscri2Jtio), and the prohibiting 
certain classes of people from attending school, are 
absolutely illegal. But when the whole class of citizens 
arises, or, at least, a decided majority thereof, and re- 
claims its natural rights, then it becomes the absolute 
duty of the Government to alter the constitution upon 
this point, whether the nobility would be willing to 
consent or not. If the favoured class of nobles were 



374 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS, 

wise they would not await this general reclamation, but 
would, of their own accord, gradually give up their 
privileges.) 

Fourthly, the continuation of such compacts has its 
basis in the ignorance and awkwardness of the oppressed 
classes ; their ignorance of their rights, and their 
awkwardness how to exercise those rights. As culture 
increases and expands, these privileges cease. Both 
Nature and reason demand that they should cease, and 
that a complete equality as to hirtli — for only in this 
respect can equality exist, the vocation chosen in after 
life establishing a distinction again — should be estal)- 
lished amongst all men. It is, therefore, duty to promote 
' culture. Culture is the foundation of all reform; aiid it is, 
therefore, absolutely illegal and immoral to place obstacles 
in its way, or cause it to be checked by the classes who 
derive advantage from the ignorance of the masses. 

Fifthly, one of the chief requirements of the rational 
form of government is that government should be re- 
sponsible to the people ; and it is precisely in this that 
most of the actual States deviate from the ideal of reason, 
lacking, as they do, this responsibility. It is true that 
the regent of such a State, who governs according to ideas, 
cannot actually acquit himself of this responsiljility, there 
being no one to whom he can deliver this responsibility ; 
but it is his duty to govern as t/he were held responsible, 
and could always give an account of his acts, whenever 
required. 

All that we have here said is valid only for the highest 
power of government, whether it be in the hands of one 
person, or conferred upon many. The subordinate oliicial 
is strictly bound to the letter of the law. There is 
nothing so injurious to a State as when the sub-official 
assumes to be the interpreter of the law. This always 
results in injustice, for the losing party is thus con- 
demned by an ex post facto law — by a law which the 
judge creates only after the fact, through his interpre- 



THE T//EORY OF DUTIES. yjs 

t.ition of the l.'iw. It is true that laws should nob he 
written so as to be capalile of various interpretations; 
the indefiniteness of laws is, indeed, a great evil for the 
State. If objections are raised to the positive law from 
reasons derived from natural law, the sub-official should, 
it is true, not execute the former; but neither sliould he 
himself do anything at all in such a case. He ouglit 
to refer the whole matter to the highest authority, tlie 
legislative power. 

In fine, every form of government is legal, and may be 
administered with good conscience, which does not make 
impossible progress, as well for the whole as for the 
individuals. Only that form of government is totally 
illegal which proposes to maintain everything precisely 
as it is at present. 

5. Concerning the duties of the Lower Classes. 

The lower classes have the vocation, as we have already 
seen, to work directly upon irrational Nature for the sake 
of the rational beings, in order to prepare it for the ends 
of the latter. According to my presupposiLion, I have 
not to deal here witli those classes immediately, but witli 
those who have to elevate them. Hence, I describe only 
the disposition which is to be awakened in them. 

The dignity of every man — his self-esteem, and with it 
his morality — depends mainly upon whether lie relates 
his occupation to the ultimate end of reason, or — which 
is the same — to the end which God has in view with 
man ; and whether he is able to say to himself. It is the 
will of God which I do. This the lower classes of the 
people can say to themselves with the greatest justice. 
For if they are not the highest of empirical mankind, 
they are, at least, its support. How can the scholar 
investigate, the instructor teach, the State ofKcial govern, 
unless all of them can first of all live ? 
„ The dignity of these vocations increases when we con- 



376 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

sidcr tliat upon tlicni always Ims (Icpcndcd, and always 
will depend, the progress and improvement of mankind. 
For if mankind is to improve considci-ably, as little time 
and force must be wasted in mechanical lal)Our as possible. 
Nature must become mild, matter plial)lc, and everything 
SO that it needs little exertion for men to obtain what 
they need, and that it need no longer be the most im- 
portant business of man to fight Nature. 

For this reason is it the absolute duty of the lower 
classes to perfect their profession, because the progress of 
the human race is conditioned thereby. It is the duty 
of each individual in these classes, at least, to attempt 
to satisfy this requirement. Only thus can he pay his 
position in the ranks of rational beings, whilst otherwise 
he is merely a link in the chain of the history of his 
trade. 

(Some authors have asserted that the inventor of the 
plough has much greater merit than, for instance, the 
inventor of a purely theoretical proposition in geometry. 
Recently, much opposition has been manifested against 
this proposition; but unjustly, as appears to me. In 
doing so, the opponents have shown tiiemselves rather 
scholars than men. Both parties are equally in the right 
and in the wrong. Neither of the two inventions, or to 
what they belong — mechanical labour and science — have 
absolute value ; their value is altogether relative, as related 
to the ultimate end of reason. Both inventions are, 
therefore, of about equal value ; and so far as the in- 
ventors are concerned, their value is determined, not by 
the success, but by the sentiments, which actuated them.) 

But the lower classes cannot well fulfil their duty — to 
raise their professions — unless they are directed by the 
higher classes ; and hence it is their duty to respect the 
mcjnhcrs of the higher classes. 

I do not speak here of the submission which they owe 
to the administrators of the law, nor of the faith and 
obedience which they owe to their moral instructors as 



THE THEORY OE DUTIES. 377 

such — for these are general duties; but of a respect 
whicli they ought to cherish for tlic scholar and artist 
generally, as men of hvjhcr culture, and even outside of 
their oilices. This respect consists, not in external shows 
of honour, nor in a dumb and slavish veneration, Init in 
the presupposition that these men understand more, and 
see further, than they do; and that the advice and 
suggestions of these men respecting the improvement of 
this or that profession, of education, of family life, &c., 
are probably based upon insight. It consists, not in a 
blind faith or dumb obedience, but in the mere attention 
to, and preliminary acceptance of, their counsels as 
probably rational, and at least worthy of furtlier examina- 
tion. In short, it is tlie same sentiment, only in u less 
degree, which \\q have above described as proper in 
grown-up children towards tlieir parents. This venera- 
tion depends upon free conviction and reflection, and can, 
therefore, not be made a direct duty; although the 
thinking over it, which prompts this sentiment, is 
certainly a duty. It is very evident that if the lower 
classes reject, at the first notice, all propositions for 
reform which the higher classes suggest, they will never 
make great advances. Nevertheless, it is to be well 
considered that this reverence is denied to the higher 
classes almost exclusively from their own fault ; and that 
it depends largely upon the reverence which the higher 
classes, on their part, evince for the lower. Let the 
higher classes respect the freedom of the others, since, 
after all, they cannot command, but only advise them, 
not being their lawgivers. Let them show respect for 
their occupation, and not seem unaware of its dignity. 
To influence them, the higher classes should lower them- 
selves. There is no vanity so improper for its purpose 
as the desire to appear learned before the unlearned. 
They do not know how to value it. The rule of conduct 
in all conversation with them is the same which is the 
rule of all popular addresses — not to start from first 



37» THE SCIEACE OF ETHICS. 

principles, for these they do not understand, and cannot 
follow ; but to lead back everything to their own ex- 
perience. 

The true relation between the higher and lower classes 
is, indeed, the true basis upon whicli tlie improvement 
of the human race rests. The higher classes are the 
spirit of the one great, whole mankind, tlie othei-s are 
its members ; the former are the thinking and projecting, 
the latter the executing part. 

That body is a healthy body wherein the determination 
of the will immediately results in its intended movement ; 
and it remains healthy in so far as the understandijig 
always takes the same care for the preservation of all 
members. It is the same in tlic community of men. If 
that relation between the higher and lower classes is only 
as it should be, the relation between these various separate 
classes will soon become correct of itself. If the lower 
classes make proper progress in their culture, as they 
must do if they listen to the advice of the higher classes, 
, then the statesmen will no longer look down upon the 
scholar as upon an idle dreamer, for he himself will be 
driven, by the progress of the age, to realize the ideas of 
the scholar, and to find them confirmed in experience; 
nor will the scholar any longer look with contempt upon 
the statesman, as thoughtlessly empirical. Xor will 
scholars and the so-called clergymen be in conflict; 
neither in various, nor in one and the same person, for 
the common man will always become more able to keep 
pace with the culture of the ages. 

I could not conclude this book well, with anything 
more to the purpose than this indication of tlie chief 
point upon which the improvement of our race, which is 
the ultimate end of a Science of Morals, is based. 



APPENDIX TO THE SCIENCE OF iMOEALS 
ASCETISM, OR PRACTICAL MURAL CULTURE. 

1. rUELIMINARY CONCErXION OK ASCKTISM. 

Every pure Science considers its object solely in regard 
to its ä jiriori conception, without giving attention to the 
accidental distinctions, which are based either upon the 
original differences of the separate individuals, involved in 
the conception of the object, or upon the use and abuse of 
freedom on the part of those individuals, -vvhich latter uses 
and abuses may have been caused by certain inclinations or 
habits. The Science of INIorality must proceed in the same 
manner, and our science has done so. It posits a man in 
general ; that is, a rational being with a natural impulse acting 
upon it; and to this man it relates the Moral Law without 
assigning to him any particular disposition towards this morality, 
whether it be a favourable or averse disposition. Morality in 
the Science of ]\Iorality, posits man as coming purely from 
the hands of Nature. 

In the same manner — to use an illustration, which is most 
apt to explain my conception — the Science of RUjhts proceeds. 
That Science assumes men to be generally mere natural beings, 
and asks how it is possible that they, in their relation to each 
other, should be able to exercise freedom. In propounding 
this question that Science takes no account of previous 
agreements, or existing institutions amongst men; and this 
is the reason why there arises that oft-noticed gap between 
theory and practice ; or between theory and its immediate 
application in life. Pure Science — when we try to apply 
ii — does not fit into life ; life does not fit into its theoretical 
propositions ; and thus pure Science appears to be impractical. 

379 



38o THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

Now this is not in any manner derogatory to Scionco; and 
only puro unreason, which knows not what theory is, and 
what practice is, and which, indeed, knows nothing at all, 
can make this a reproach to Science. It is very true that 
Science does not fit into what Science did not take into 
calculation, and which it must not take into calculation as 
sure as it is Science. The theoretical teacher replies very 
correctly to those who complain that his results do not 
fit the world : " I never spoke of you and your world ; for 
you and your world are not worth much any way. You 
want everything to bo as it is, and to go its way as it best 
may; and if this is what you want, why let things go 
their way, and do not bother philosophers with your questions. 
Keep your science as a means to sharpen your wits. Since 
in your eyes it cannot after all serve any other use." 

Nevertheless it is the desire of the true philosopher, that 
science should be introduced into life, and, moreover, since 
a pure life of Nature is perhaps nowhere to be found now — 
into some determined empirical condition of life. Hence 
it becomes a problem for the philosopher to show how 
the requirements of reason can be realized in a determined 
empirical given connection of presuppositions ; and the science, 
which solves this problem, stands midway between pure science 
and mere experience or history. It is this science which 
fills the gap between theory and practice, in so far as it can 
be filled scientifirally. I am careful in stipulating this latter 
condition. For that mediating science — in so far as it must. 
retain the character of a science, and must therefore have a 
determined object, which its form can exhaust — can pay 
no attention to the accidental and the undeterminable. There 
is always a large field remaining open for the judgment of the 
practical man, whom this mediating science only guides, show- 
ing him only the bridge which leads from the world of theory 
to that of practice. But the gap always remaining, the prac- 
titioner must always rely on his sound judgment after all to 
promote culture, which artistically is precisely the problem of 
the theoretical and mediating science. 

The science which mediates between the pure Science of 
Rights and existing State institutions, is called the Science of 



APPENDIX TO THE SCIENCE OE MORALS. 381 

Politics or of Statesmanship; and tho science wliich mediates 
l)otvveen the Science of Morality and tho empirical c})aracter 
of tho individual — in so fiir as this is possible — is called tho 
Science of Ascetisni. I say, in so far as this is pos.siblo ; 
for there is a great distinction between tho problem, wliich 
the Science of Politics has to solve, and that which may bo 
* attributed to tho Science of Ascetism ; and it is by clearly 
establishing this distinction, that we shall best explain our 
conception of tho latter science. 

The problem of tho Science of Politics is to show how it is 
possible to eil'ect tho transition from a given determined State 
organization to that form of government which alone is rational 
and lawful. In the same way it would seem to be the 
problem of Ascetism to show how it is possible to lead a 
given individual character towards a moral disposition. 

But here appears a great difference. For the art of states- 
manship has to do, vol with tho really free will of man, but 
with this will as it may be impelled by natural motives ; in 
other words, in so far as this will i?, as it were, a link in the 
chain of natural mechanism. 

If we presuppose merely that rational self-love, without 
which man is not capable even of living amongst otherc«, and 
can certainly not be tolerated amongst them — the art of 
statesmanship has sufficient means in its hands — such as direct 
compulsion, or providing injurious results for illegal acts, &c., 
— whereby to control the will of men. For it does not matter 
at all, from what motive a citizen acts according to law, 
provided he does act according to it. The art of politics 
seeks to establish only legality and not at all morality. 
There being thus possible a legal compulsion, it is also possible 
to calculate the means to be used in effecting it. 

Quite different is it with the object of the Science of 
Morality. Morality has freedom as such for its object. The 
good is to be done absolutely for its own sake, and from no 
other cause whatever. Now this resolve is something 
absolutely Primary, and cannot be connected with anything, 
as an effect is connected with a cause. It must proceed 
of itself from the soul of man, and cannot be produced 
in it by external means ; as we certainly can produce through 



382 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

threats of puni.slirnent the resolve to do wliat tlio law rcquire8 . 
or, not to do what tho law forbidn. Neither can man hiraeclt" 
produce it within hiinsolf according to a fixed rule, prcci.sely 
hecauso it is absolutely primary. Nay, man docs not oven 
know this moral resolve until he possesses it, and until then 
it does not oven exist for him. Ifcnco there is no straight 
line at all proceeding from previous conditions to a moral 
disposition ; that" disposition is attained only through a leap 
into an absolutely other sphere, utterly opposed to our natural 
disposition. In that sense, therefore, a Science of Ascetism 
would seem to be impossible. 

]\[oreover, there is between the legally Right and the morally 
Right this great difference, that the former is a manifold and a 
progression from a not quite just, but rather altogether unjust, 
to a more just form of government, and from the latter to a 
still more just form; whereas the morally just is absolutely 
one, within which there is no distinction of a more and less 
just. Tho latter assertion needs no proof, after what has been 
established in our Science of Morality. To make more clear 
the former, I append the following remark : 

Absolutely unlawful, in the legal sense, we can call only a 
state of things wherein there is no form of government what- 
soever; and, I will add — in order to be very strict, although it 
has no connection here — a state of things wherein men are 
deprived of all their rights from no fault of their own, i.e., 
from no commission of crime. Hence the very first require- 
ment is, that some sort of government must be established. 
Under such government the law exists at least in form ; even 
though, so far as conscience, such law may be the very reverse 
of just law. Hence the worst form of government is better than 
none at all; and it becomes the duty of men then to approxi- 
mate it as much as possible to the only rational form of 
government. But this prugiession towards the better mu-o 
never be carried on in such a manner, as to risk the overllirow 
of the existing government. In other words, it is legally just, 
that the present unjust form of government should remain. 

But it is not thus in the Science of Alorality. In that 
science there is no permission to do the worse where we know 
the better. Either we must be altogether moral, or \se are nut 



APPENDIX TO THE SCIENCE OF MORALS. 383 

moral at all. Thoro is liero no progression from tlie good to tho 
better ; and licnco oven in this respect a Science of Ascetiem 
would eoom to bo impossible. 

But what then remains for such a science, if wo still consider 
it as related to Morality, similarly as the Science of Politics is 
related to tho Science of Rights'? 

The question: How shall we elevate others to a moral dis- 
position] has no meaning at all, if that moral disposition i« 
looked upon as a product of our acting. Xevertheless we can 
give others assistance in attaining it; that K^, wo «an inlluenco 
them to determine themselves to rise to that moral standpoint. 
This we do, for instance, when wo cause their fci-ling of rever- 
ence and esteem to turn upon themselves. Cut all this belongs 
to a [icdagogical science, and not to a Science of Ascctism, and 
whatsoever is to be said on tliis point wo have already stated at 
length in our Science of Morality. 

The other question, which might constitute the problem of 
Ascetism : How can I elevate myself to a moral disposition? 
has also no meaning ; and from the very same reason. He 
who propounds that question to himself, has already raised 
himself to that disposition. 

But the following consideration remains, and furnishes 
an important and honouiable place leading to iho Science of 
Ascetism. 

Whosoever fulfils his duty in life for the mere sake of duty, 
were it but once, in that one fulfilment necessarily resolves to 
remain true to duty for all his future existence. If he resolve 
never to do his duty only this time, he would not have the 
ie.-olve this time, nor would he do his duty. His act could 
not be moral, though it might be legal. 

For this reason : the motive of duty is not an empirical 
ground, standing under conditions of time like other sensuous 
motives, but is valid absolutely without relation to time. 
Whosoever subjects him-self to duty, as such, necessarily 
subjects himself to duty for ever. 

Nevertheless it may happen : not, that in future he should 
resolve tho opposite, namely, to rebel against duty and act 
against it — this resolve, which characterizes only the ideal of 
evil, or the devil, is absolutely impossible to reason, as we have 



384 THE SCIENCE OE ET/ilCS. 

Been — but, that ho may forgot this resolve in his future acts to 
a greater or less degree, and that his old merely empirical 
character, which is impelled only by sensuous motivep, may 
again usurp the place of his moral character. 

Whatsoever man is serious in the resolve to uninterruptedly 
fulfil his duty, and knows this danger from a knowledge of the 
empirical human character or from his own previous experience, 
must necessarily propound to himself the problem to remedy 
this evil ; and the solution of this problem is the task of the 
Science of Ascetism, which we have proposed to establish. 

That science will be, therefore : ^4 sydematic establishment 
of the means lohich may tend to Iceej} awake in us at all times 
the thought of Duty. 

II. MORE DEFINITE DESCRIPTION OF THE CONCEPTION OF 

ASCETISM. 

There can in reality be only two reasons why with the firm 
resolve to do our duty we nevertheless may neglect it ; namely, 
we may either in an immoral act not think of our duty at all, 
may forget that resolve altogether; or we may have that 
resolve in mind, but only in such a casual and unenergetic 
way, that the resolve does not become a deed, or does not 
prevent the immoral act. 

Concerning the first case, little is to be said. A conception, 
which does not arise, can also not be effective ; it can have no 
result; and hence the empirical motive, namely, the natural 
impulse, becomes the power, which determines the act. 

But the second case must be explained ; and we can 
definitely reorganize it only by seizing it from the trans- 
cendental point of view. From that standpoint, it is very 
true that we do not think of our duty ; we only take hold of 
our duty with our imagination ; only half-way as in a dream ; 
for we always float in opposite directions. It is a cold, dead, 
powerless sentiment. It is an impotent thinking ; but it never 
turns into willing ; and hence the natural impulse always 
decides, since it is the only determining impulse. 

Now, how can this state of things be remedied"? The reply 
to this question will also solve the question, how the first case 
18 to be remedied. 



APPENDIX TO THE SCIENCE OE MORALS. 385 

First of all : every man can know, whether or not, it was 
lii.s imagination which took hold of the conception of duty. 
For whenever ho decides himself and acts carelessly, without 
determined and full conviction, and without the previously 
described feeling of conviction, he may bo certain that it was 
his imagination which took hold of the conception of duty. 
Moreover, it is altogether a matter of freedom to elevate this 
conception at all times to full clearness, and to refrain from 
acting until that conviction has arisen, which manifests itself 
through the above described feeling. Hence wo not only 
ought to, but can in each particular case, elevate the conception 
of duty to decided and energetic consciousness ; and it may, 
therefore, be said, that it is our dnhj to do it. 

It appears, therefore, that the final ground of such immorality 
is the same in both cases. In both cases we forget to do our 
duty ; we forget, either the thought of our duty, or to raise 
the indistinct thought of a determined duty, as it floati in 
imagination, to full and clear consciousness. 

It would, therefore, be the more determined problem of a 
Science of Ascetism io find means by wldch ice may ahcays 
remember our duty. 

Now, it is to be remembered, that in either case it is not a 
mattet of natural mechanism, but of freedom, whether we thus 
definitely remember and cause ourselves to be determined by 
our conception of duty. If we think the intelligible man 
under time conditions, as should not be done, but as hero 
we may well do, then each moral resolve must be something 
altogether new and primary ; not the link of a chain, but the 
beginning of a new one. Hence no external means will be 
sufiicient to make sure that such a resolve is determined upon ; 
for this resolve is something absolute, absolutely entering the 
world of time from the world of reason, as sufficiently explained 
in the previous section. Hence the Science of Ascetism cannot 
claim to furnish such a theory, and in so far that science is still 
unexplained. 

But the good will is always presupposed ; it has arisen once 
forever together with the first moral resolve ; and if it could 
vanish there would be no natural means whereby to restore it. 
All that is requisite is, therefore, that we should be reminded. 

2 C 



386 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

of this moral resolve. It is not tlio resolutiuii to do our «liity 
and to do nothing bcforo wo havo clearly inve.sti;,'atcd Avhothcr 
it is our duty or not, which is to ho produced by the f:cicnce 
wo seek, but merely tho ranemhrance of that resolution. 
AVhen we have boon so reminded, it still depends upon our 
freedom to make use of this remembranco or not. 

Hence tho question, whether a Science of Ascetism is 
l)ossible, stands now thus : Are these means viechanimlhj 
operative (we speak hero of a mechanism of reason, or of 
compulsory tonsequence) wJiich can effect the return of a 
determined conception acconlinrj to an internal rule 7 

I reply, there is certainly such a law, equal to that of a 
mechanism, and this law is the law of the association oj 
ideas. 

I shall explain myself. There aro laws of synthesis, of the 
necessary connection of representations. Tho laws of the 
association of ideas are dilferent from these, and occupy a 
middle ground between necessity and freedom. They belong 
to tho power of memory. Wo need not necessarily remember 
that which we have perceived at the same time, but we may so 
remember it, if we choose. jNIemory depends upon freedom, 
and hence upon practice. That which makes possible this 
memory avo call the law of the association of ideas. 

Hence the chief principle of a Science of A.scetism would 
be as follows : Connect in advance with your representation of 
your future acts the representation of moral acting. 

By means of this rule there would arise between the 
conception of an acting and the thought of duty, precisely 
that connection which consists in the manifold of our 
representations when we have cultivated our memory. 

But the purpose is not that man should be enabled 
arbitrarily to remember the conception of duty when reflecting 
upon some previous action, as suffices in the memory of repre- 
sentations. On the contrary, if he merely wished to recall 
that conception to memory, he would already have remembered 
It, and all jueajis of assistance would be superfluous. The 
intention is, rather, that together with the conception of the 
act to be done, there should arise in man the conception of 
duty in general, and fill him with living power. 



APPENDIX TO THE SCIENCE OF MORALS. ^Hj 

J^-^lr,)' """ ""'""■ " '" ''" ""'-'^ ""' --Ption: I will 
»ct, and tho conception : I „ill „|„aj,„ „,t „„„, ' 

■.separably „„,tc<l, a, ayntholical conceptions Ire in Ld 
■. «ys nnUoJ. If thi, is attainc.1 in any „ne pcln ' 

pono.;,!''! ," "'°. °''J'"' "'■■'^1^ "- Science of Ascetism 
proposes to achieve m man. 

But the operation of the association of ideas is not of a 
mechanical nature ; we ?ua;/ hnf w„ i ! 

r.-niorahor ot fl 7- •'^' "^ "^^ "^^ necessarily 

Th « o • r™' ''^''' •'^ ^"■^"^'^ connection of thoughts 

Th,H association depends upon no determined law but Snon 
i-edom and practice, and hence upon something whim" 
exist to a greater or less degree, and which for tha"t very e"on 
can e increased. Hence it is possible only to c^Z^:2 
hat described condition, wherein both of the above oncep ion 
are synthetically united. Hence it will remain the duty o 
man to evermore increase the efficiency of that conception ' 

Asce'tm i^T f"""'^' ''^ P^^'^^'" '' '^^ «--- of 
Asceti m is therefore, to associate in advance and forever the 

concepüon of d^ty ,vük the conception of our actions 

i,ut the rule of association is, that one conception can only 
be connected with another determined one, and not wfth an 
undetermined conception. Determinations reproduce tl'l.: 
only mutually. Hence it would be of no value whatever 
a person were to resolve to discover a means whereby to 

al>s ad. This generally we never think, and by this 
generally we never remember anythinr. f ^ 

of durwfth';?'"'' 1" ""'""^ ''^"^^""^^^ *^- *^°-^Pt-n 
with IT f -7^'^^ acts. Of course, we would conn ct it 

mrtt, h f " '' '^ "'"' "^ ^"«"^ ^^^^ - them we arc 
particularly exposed to forget the conception of duty Ou 

of Th.\?T'"' n """"' "^ "^ ''''' '''"^'^ *° ^-'. -nee they 

But on 1. ^ .' '''"^''' '"'^ '"^^ ^^« ^°^ "^^"-^ «very day. 
But on less important occasions there is this danger 

Hence there would seem to be necessary: a general 
examination of our own character, to discover where we a" 
most exposed to danger; and a ürm and strong resoluln" 



388 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

tliiiik of oiuflclvo-t on precisely such occasions. It will also Le 
well to adopt 11x0(1 i)rincii)lc3 for certnin cases, rules of folf- 
oxtiiuination, &c. kc. A "man of principles" will tlien bo 
callecl a man who has developed within himself this juilgmont 
and who allows it alono to control the acts of his freedom. 

But the association of ideas does not o^jcrato mechanically, 
and henco it always remains possible that we may forgot tho 
very best resolve, when the moment of action approaches. If 
this state of things continues, tho man, who was already good, 
again becomes wholly corrupt. Ilonco tho necessity arises to 
examine ourselves repeatedly, and see wliether we have 
conformed to our good resolutions ; and if not, what was tho 
reason, and. what measures will bo best suited to prevent a 
recurrence of such a danger. 

Such a self-examination is necessary, indeed, at all times, for 
we always get into new condit'ons, and, moreover, advance in 
cog)iition and in perfection of moral acting, whereby we arc 
compelled to make higher demands upon ourselves. 

Tho moral man will be much aggrieved to iind that he gets 
no better, in spite of his firm resolutions. Let him surrender 
himself to such regrets and reproaches, for nothing stirs up 
memory so well as pain. Such continued sell-examinations 
bring man always nearer to the end assigned to him. lie does 
not become holy, for he is not infinite, and his natural impulse 
will always continue to move him ; but he will become good. 

r.ut this determination, which provides a very worthy 
reality for Ascetism, as an art to bo practised by every 
individual, seems again to annul tljo conception of it a^ a 
science. For how can it be d iniori ascertained to what extent 
anyone is in moral danger, and through what means he can 
protect himself? This each one must decide for himself. 
Ascetism would, therefore, consist only of those three rules, 
and it must be left to each individual to apply them to himself 
through his own morally inspired judgment. 

Nevertheless, l»-iero are certain general dangers, which 
threaten the resolve to do our duty, and certain general 
reasons why we forget our duty. These wo can at least 
establish, and assign the principle through which we can 
protect ourselves. 



APPENDIX TO THE SCIENCE OE MORALS. 5S9 

This I propose to do. I shall niontion not the ordinary 
dangers to moral acting, whicli may threaten very coarao and 
uncultured pernnns, but only tl)oso dangers whieh threaten the 
more cultured class. Of cour.se, Ascetism thus loses the rank 
of a systematic Science, since we cannot .'^tart from a common 
principle, and becomes a more aggregate of psychological 
remarks. Otherwise, indeed, it cannot bo treated. 



III. SKKTCn OF THE ESSE.NTIAL OF AfeCETISM. 

Above all things, it is our task now to look up more 
deßnitely the origin of those inclinations, whicli put us in 
danger of forgetting our duty, since we can fmd out no 
remedy for an evil until we know its precise origin. I deduce 
inclinations, affections, passions, &c., in the following manner: 

Xature produces in man a determined tendency, such as in 
the plants and in the animals has causality. iJut in man, as 
sure as man is free — i.e., as sure as he has that freedom which 
in our system we have hitherto called formal freedom, and the 
neglect to distinguish which has produced so much evil in 
practical philosophy — it remains only a tendency. IJcfore 
man is man (or free), (for instance, as an unconscious child, 
or an idiot, cretin, &c.) this natural tendency has causality, 
precisely as in animals and plants, and it has this causality until 
the natural impulse has been hvokeii through the individual 
or through freedom. But the moment man elevates himself to 
consciousness, he tears himself loose from the chain of natural 
mechanism and organism : that which he does thereafter he 
must do altogether himself. jNIan as such, i.e., as free, as 
consciousness, has no natural inclinations, alfections, or pa-ssions 
at all. He depends altogether upon his freedom. An important 
proposition ! 

It is known to my readers what a synthetical connection 
in reason is. That which the synthesis involves, is not in 
itself developed into consciousness ; we can elevate it to 
clearness only through analysis. Hence it is possible, that 
man, through the application, or non-application of freedom, 
may produce a connection amongst the manifold objects of 
freedom in himself very like that synthetical connection in 



390 TUR SCIENCE OF ET J / /CS. 

reason ; and tliis eynllicsia really does occur : for iriHtanc, 
Iho roprcRcntation x involvns in man a wliolo manifold of 
otl)or reprcsentation.s, «, /', c, as a Buccessivo serif;.", each of 
•\vliicli i.=!, in tliis connection, in itself dependent upon freedom, 
and did actually depend upon freedom in this j)ariicular in- 
dividual at first, but has now through repeated realization of 
the same syntliesis become connected with x in a manner equol 
to the synthetical connection in reason. 

For instance : when you write, you certainly do not con- 
sider every stroke of your pen and every letter separately and 
definitely, determining yourself to i)roduce it thu?. You 
merely think the word and at the saino time you write it. 
But when you first began to write you had maturely to con- 
sider every pen-stroke and every letter, and to determine 
yourself to produce it tlius. 

This connection we have called an association of ideas, and 
shall hereafter so Cidl it. Xow such a connection is certainly 
not synthetical, for it is accidental, changeable, and individual ; 
but neitlier is it a product of conscious freedom : it is associa- 
tion. We can illustrate it likewise by the theory of dim 
conceptions. Such conceptions are dim, bccau.se they are 
unconscious premises of our judgments; and ihey are con- 
ceptions because they are universal, and can be elevated to 
conscious universality through freedom of thinking. 

Let us take an example from our own Science of Morality. 
The angry man soon flies into a passion, and immediately 
begins to scold, kick, &c. Now this scolding, kicking, ice, 
certainly depends upon freedom. Of course; for us others, 
nay even for himself it depends in itself upon his own freedom, 
or, at least, did at one time so depend; but at present he cannot 
well act differently. He would, however, be easily able to act 
ditierently, if he could reflect upon himself and his freedom. 
But this very mediating act of considcrateuess is what he 
lacks ; association of ideas deprives him of that freedom. 
But through however long a series this association may extend, 
and however deeply-rooted the habit may have become, it never- 
theless alwajs starts from a first point, which man has under 
bis free control. Hence, even if we admit to the angry man, 
that now when his anger deprives him of all consideration, he 



ATP END IX TO TflE SCIENCE OE MORALS. 391 

cannot well acb otherwise than ho docs, wo still should say 
to him : you ought to liavo been on your guard against the 
first outbreak of your anger. 

In sliort, tl)rough tlio passions, which have arisen in an 
individual previous to his reform, and rooted themselves 
according to tlie law of association, that man utterly loses 
his freedom and considerateness whenever at any occasion 
thoy ariso in him ; and in such a condition the thougiit of 
his duty cannot take hold of him. But tho very first emotion, 
which involves irresistibly all these passions, is certainly under 
the control of ]m freedom. Ilcnco tlio thought of duty can 
take hold of him previous to this emotion. It will, therefore, 
bo tho problem of Ascotism, to look up these arts of frcchnu iv 
their various ponsible emotions, in order to connect witli them a 
balance-weight, a means to stir up the freo will, and thus to 
arouse a remembrance of duty. 

I have said, in the various possible emotions generally. 
But this justilies no ground of division, and no particular 
and separate rules ; and for that very reason only a very 
slim content remains for Ascetism. Principally in order to 
show this, and to attach some not uninteresting considerations, 
I have brought this matter into discussion, and have expressed 
myself in the way I did. 

Nature produces a tendency in man; was our statement. Now 
the word Nature has quite another significance when we speak 
of human beings, than when we speak of unconscious products 
of Nature. The nature of man, i.e., his essence or his positive 
character (talent, indoles) is twofold, whereas the nature of 
these unconscious products is only onefold. There is in man 
one nature, which is Nature as such, and one nature which 
exists as a tendency of reason (not yet elevated into con- 
sciousness) ; which latter tendency, in so far as it operates as 
a mere blind impulse, is of no more value than the first nature, 
which is merely Nature. 

To speak plainer : Nature, as such, tends in all its products 
to preserve the individual through sexual propagation ; and 
in the same manner Nature operates in man, and operates thus 
alone so long as man is still in the hands of Nature. But as 
soon as man's freedom — which here is formal — develops 



392 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

itsolf — which it docs (since couHiderateiicHS and lience iiatur.il 
freedom do not rule licro as yel) ; through an iniiiulso or 
instinct of reason, the impulse of this formal freedom opor.ibjs 
also precisely as an impulse of Nature ; that is to say : law- 
less and under no rule ; and thus it becomes an impulno 
towards absolute independence, .and hence towards supremacy 
over the whole external world. (A mode of thinking which I 
have described at length in my Science of ^loralily.) 

Now if man surnnderd himself to these two impulses com- 
pletely, there arise from them two kinds of passions: (i) lirnial. 
passions, such as lubricity, gluttony, &c, ; and (2) Un-sockd 
passions, such as injustice, love of oppression, anger, hatred, 
falseness, &c. Both of these impulses — the natural impul-o 
and the impulse of formal freedom — however unite; and may 
thus unite in two ways. The natural impulse may unite with 
habitual love of oppression, and then there arises : (3) Oppres- 
sion from selfishness. Or the impulse of wild independence 
may unite with the natural impulse, and then there arise : 
(4) Voluptuousness and other manifestations of brutishness ; 
which here are all the results of pure vanity. 

All truly vicious inclinations belong to one of these four 
classes; with the exception of a certain corruption, which is 
not so common but all the more dangerous, and which as the 
fifth one completes the synthetical period. This lifth one I 
shall treat in a separate section. 

The treatment of these passions in Ascetism is altogether the 
same. Each is based upon association and habit; each deprives 
the person given up to it of his freedom and considerateness, 
in which condition he is incapable of remembering his duty. 
Each also starts from a first act of freedom, of surrendering 
to that passion, in which act free considerateness is therefore 
still possible. Hence in each case it is our problem to connect 
with this state of considerateness the remembrance of duty in 
equally sure association, lience we only need to answer the 
question in a general manner. 

It seems easily enough answered. A good will is pre- 
supposed, for without it we cannot even speak of Ascotism. 
It is only forgetfulness, or the being dragged into a con- 
dition where consideratoness is no longer possible, which is 



APPENDIX TO THE SCIENCE OE MORA IS. 393 

to he feared. The cliicf rule would thorcforo ho lliis : never 
give yourself up to such a condition ; watch over yourself, and 
hahituato yourself to control all your acts with consideralo- 
ness. 

This uninterrupted attention to ourselves is a self-obeervation, 
an act of continuous reflection, undertaken not with a view 
to learn, but to hold ourselves in our own hands. Hence : 
always observe yourself ! Whatever you do, do resolutely, and 
only with considerate freedom. Such would bo the chief 
maxim. 

But this rule, if strictly applied, would bo both un.safo and 
very dangerous. For an association, as I have shown above, ia 
absolutely necessary in man. It is only the first impulse of 
this association, which our freedom controls, all tho other links 
follow of themsolven. 

Xo^?" either this association remains, and then our evil habits 
continue, and we can never master them ; or that strict con- 
siderateness enters ; but it paralyzes as it were our whole mind, 
prevents us from all acting, and makes all our resolves unsteady 
and wavering. From fear of doing wrong we shall condema 
ourselves to lifelessness. This is the dangerous element of pure, 
abstract considerateness. 

But there is a middle way, very much to be recommended. 
Each individual in his quiet hours of necessary and continuous 
self-observation, which must not be neglected, since the neglect 
thereof will induce a reaction in goodnes?, will easily find what 
his most prominent passions are, how they become excited, and 
where the point lies, which must, therefore, be watched, and 
where he must remember himself. For instance, the man who 
is passionately angry, and who thereby shows a disorderly self- 
love and injustice towards others (empirically ; for he may have 
the best intention), will know what excites his auger more par- 
ticularly. His experience, therefore, should grow more special 
through self-observation, and more fruitful through practice 
of considerateness. He should never proceed to act, without 
having first considered what may happen to him, and without 
having made definite resolutions for such cases. In short, he 
should have resolved upon a definite plan of acting under all 
circumstances. He may then be at least sure that he will not 



394 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

forgot liimsi^lf, and that lio will rcinemljor liis good resolutions ; 
provided, of course, his will is strong and pure onougli, II<; 
phould enter upon no new day of lifo without having calculabid 
what kinds of busincsa he may have to settle on, and what 
opportunities it may bring him forth 'to relapse into his old 
faults through self-forgctfulness ; and he should take pre- 
cautions against such dangers. ]\rany persons do this for the 
sake of more prudence and advantage, and succeed in it: why 
then should it not bo possible to succeed in it for the sake of 
duty? 

The given rule remains in force ; but the great question ia, 
how to keep it effective under all circumstances. For the man, 
who carries on more solitarily a speculative life, it may bo easy 
enough to adopt rules for his rare practical collisions witli the 
world. But how does the matter stand in regard to him, who 
is always in reciprocal causality with other?, and who has, 
therefore, little time to reflect, upon himself; who precisely on 
that account is always carried away in his acting, and forgets 
all the excellent principles which he adopted in his hours of 
meditation ] 

I reply : firstly, everyone ought absolutely to have time 
enough to consider with himself, to reflect upon his mor.il 
condition, and to frame resolutions and work out plans for 
his reform. iSTo amount of business will excuse a neglect to 
do so. No one should have so much to do as not to be able to 
live spiritually; for only thus will he do correctly and well 
what he has to do. If this is called prayer, with holy medita- 
tion, it is a most excellent and holy thought. 

Secondly : let him connect with that impulse of passion an 
opposite impulse, which will prevent the former from entering 
his consciousness unless the remembrance of his duty enters 
at the same time. If this opposite impulse is to be a moral 
impulse, having its origin in duty, and impelling to duty, it 
can be none other than one taken from the contemplation of 
the wickedness of permitting ourselves to be impelled by 
passion. Every other impulse, an impulse of sensuous motives, 
would not suffice to balance that impulse of passion. For that 
would bo merely expelling one sin through another, and the 
person would remain as corrupt and wicked as ever. 



APPENDIX TO THE SCIENCE OE MORALS. 395 

Every loss of freedom — wliich pasriion alwayn jjmduccs — 
ami a man who has oiico olevatod himself to morality 8iii.s 
only from passion — is conlomptibln. Whoever gives himself 
up to solf-rellection and self-punishment will experience thm 
contoniptibility strong enough. Hence, a rej)oated self-exami- 
nation as to how we have acted up to our resolutions is 
absolutely necessary. Whoever has felt this contemptibility, 
and has given himself wholly up to this feeling, will doubtless 
recall the painfulness of such feeling whenever ho nidy bo 
again tempted to similar forgotfuluess ; and henco is not 
wholly, not undignified, but absolutely necessary to court the 
punishment of conscipnce. 

This then is the only moans to effect morality through means 
of the empirical character ; as, indeed, tho impuhn of i~e1f- 
estecm is most surely, according to Kant's very correct dis- 
covery, tho only ono which induces morality from Kcnsuous 
motives. 

Thus the essence of Ascetism is exhausted. Wo liavo only 
to pay attention now to .1 particular «late of mind, which does 
not lit under tho above established chief rule. 



IV. REMEDY AGAINST THE COKUUPTION OK A. MEBELY 
SPECULATIVE STATE OP MIND. 

In our previous investigation we have always presupposed 
that man has an interest in realizing his wishes in the external 
world, whether ho be utterly corrupt and without any sense for 
morality in general, or whether ho has taken hold of the good 
for his whole lifo by a moral resolution, and is merely weak 
and in danger of forgetting it. In short, we have considered 
man altogether as occupying tho practical standpoint, and as if 
his Avill and thinking had no other end in view than to realize 
through them something in the external world. We have 
argued as if man considered tho internal, tho theory and all 
mediation generally as merely means, and as if he had in view 
only the connecting with the external. Such a man will 
manifest all that is within him in his external works, and 
hence if he is reformed internally, the external acta will follow 
of themselves. 



396 THE SCIENCE OF ETHICS. 

But there is another disposition, produced not through 
Nature, but through art and culture, whicli holds the internal 
itself, as the mere disposition of the nnnd to be the end in 
view, and which never allows this internal to manifest itself in 
external acts. Happily this disposition is not common to man- 
kind ; but at any rate it is possible, and is even to be found iu 
actual life by close observers ; nay, in the progress of mankind 
upon the road now taken it is even likely to become more and 
more common. Partly from this reason, and partly because no 
philosophical moralist has as yet taken notice of it, do I now 
propose to consider it. 

It is the standpoint from which a person has interest only 
for internal reflection, for the theoretical, and from which this 
is the ultimate end in view. I shall caU it the speculative state 
of mind. 

' This is no old name; and I frame it because that which it 
designates has never yet been designated before, so far as I 
know, and this word seems to me the best designation. 

With such a disposition a person merely watches the internal 
determinations of his mind and character, without relating them 
to life, and without either acting much at all, or subjecting' 
himself to strict self-examination when he does act, or, indeed, 
asking what may be the external results of these determinations 
in us. The object in cultivating this disposition may be two- 
fold : either to attain knowledge, or to attain perfection in that 
art which results from this continuous and ever manifold play 
of thoughts. The former I shall call the pure speculative, and 
the latter the a^sthetical state of mind. It is, however, to be 
observed, that even in the former case, when knowledge is not 
related to life as the ultimate end of all knowledge, there can 
be no other end in view than the enjoym.ent and satisfaction 
which result from it, and that hence both of these states of 
mind unite there. The latter enjoys himself in the mere 
looking on at the internal play of his thoughts, whereas the 
former enjoys himself in the knowledge and the detailed 
understanding of this play. Hence both have only enjoyment 
in view, and in so far the disposition of both is ^cstheticaL 

It cannot be often enough reiterated, that the first interest 
of the investigator should be only formal. His only object is 



APPENDIX TO THE SCIENCE OP MORALS. 397 

to know tlioroughly, without liaving any rc>ult in view, or 
witliout intending his invcsligalion to conlirni any prcviou.s 
opinion of liis own. It would be a petty and diahonest pro- 
ct'duro to act otherwise. But after ho lias once, in an impartial 
discovery, found tlio truth, this truth must also ho related lo 
life. Hence it must bo e^ually reiterated, that knowledge is 
not its own ultimate end, but that the whole man in his whole 
culture is his own ullimato end. 

Now euch a man, who has acquired an excellent knowledge 
of all the rules of that play of thoughts, may even apply 
them, but ho does so only for the purpose of thereby producing 
another i)lay in his mind. Ho causes good and noble sent-i- 
ments and thoughts to arise in his mind ; but merely in order 
to observe himself in doing so, in order to make these senti- 
ments themselves an object of his enjoyment, and to amuse 
himself at the appearance of harmony, of sublime emotions, 
&c., which they excite. But he is and remains corrupt ; for 
the whole interests him for his own enjoyment's sake; ho has 
no serious interest in it, no interest lying beyond himself. 

Such a man may perhaps know himself thoroughly, may be 
thoroughly aware of his good and bad qualities and inclinations ; 
but he neither loves the former nor hales the latter ; he loves 
und longs for anything only in proportion as it is likely to give 
more satisfaction to that spiritual play within him. He may 
censure himself very honestly, but it is with the same a^stheti- 
cal coldness with which he would censure an absurd piece of 
furniture or the tasteless dress of a stranger. In fact, he does 
not intend at all to better himself, and his self-censure has no 
such end in view ; on the contrary : that which constitutes his 
character, affords to him, as it were, the greatest amusement, 
because it is the nearest and most attractive play-toy, which he 
has always under his control; and because he knows its play 
thoroughly through long observation. 

This disposition is impossible in uncultured men, in whom 
the conception is always immediately related to acting. If 
they were not forced to act they never would think at all. 
But it is quite frequent amongst artists ; and philosophers as 
well as theologians are also in very great danger of giving 
themselves up to it. 



398 TUE SCIENCE OE ET/fICS. 

Now thif! (lisiwsition cannot ho rofomiod liy tho abovn 
suggested remedy, since it calculates in .-ill cases upon a 
2>rarfirnl mode of thinking, whicli here does not exist; nay, 
which such persona, as wo liavo desciil)ed, may ox[)rf',ssIy hold 
aloof from. 1 fence even tlie rule of that remedy and its 
application would become more play to such persons. Tliey 
would never ank what its results in life mij^'ht be, since life is 
for them, indeed; nothing more than a means to promote that 
spiritual play, and perhaps to afford additional zest to it by 
furriisliing a contrasting background. 

Hence Ascctism would iiavo to treat such jicrsons in 
another manner. They must first bo toned down to the 
practical standpoint; must first bo infused with interest iu life, 
and in the results of their mode of thinking. But even iii 
their cases tho good will must bo presupposed ; since no liunian 
art can j)roduce it. For oven if they are made to see liow 
dangerous and corrupt their state of mind is, and made to wis!» 
for a better disposition, such an insight and wish may still 
co-exist with their old state of mind. It is only those, who 
have the good will, who will take advantage of the only 
thorough remedy. 

This remedy is : to enter into active lifo, and to dive deeper 
and deeper into it, so that it may begin to become really 
interesting to them, and to claim all those energies which 
previously slumbered in usele?s play, thereby exciting in them 
the wish, which all ordinary men entertain, that they may 
succeed in what they have undertaken, which will put an end 
of itself to that empty self-observation, Xot till then will 
they be in a position to apply the other rules of Ascetism to 
themselves ; and unless they take that first step and return to 
the standpoint of misdirected humanity, there is no help for 
them. 

Prom what we have said, the general remark may be drawn, 
that the contemplative life, whether it be that of a thinker or 
of an artist, is connected with great danger for the welfare of 
the soul, i.e., for the virtue and honesty of those who aro 
devoted to it. It is true, and it is the result of the quiet 
which it requires and produces, that speculative life is not 
likely to lead to great crime.', great vices and dissipations, but 



APPENDIX TO THE SCIENCE OE MORALS. 



W) 



it may easily lead to a deeper iutomal wickednes3, which ia all 
the more diiDgerous. 

Now nothing is further from my intontion than to terrify 
persons away from a speculativo life generally, in tlio above 
general significance — for even in the present W(jrk I have 
shown that it is a part of the necessarily to bo realized end of 
reason — but merely to call your attention to the care, which i« 
necessary for those, who devote themselves to it. JCither a 
person should devote himself not altogether to it, but carry on 
at the same time a practical business, taking equal interest in 
the latter, or, if his position in lifo excludes him from the 
latter, or if the particular branch of speculation, chosen by 
him, requires all his energies and time, ho should at least pay 
uninterrupted attention to himself, and take care to carry on 
the speculative itself an somctMwj iwariiral ; in other words, 
to be careful that this speculation or artistic cultivation shall 
always be directed upon the morality and improvement of him- 
self and of others, and that he shall always bo well conscious 
of this his intention. He will thus preserve the purity of his 
character, and carry on his science or art with all the more 
success; whereas a character of the first description is also 
easily inclined to turn his speculation or art into a mere empty 
play, because every thing is play to him. 

I could not close these lectures with a remark more im- 
portant to young students and beginning philosophers and 
scholars : I therefore close them with it, and recommend myself 
to your remembrance and good wishes. 






PLYMOUTH 

fr. BBKNDON AND SON, LIMITED 

PRINTERS 



iiiitaa 



RETURN TO the circulation clesi< ot any 
University of California Library 
or to the 
NORTHERN REGIONAL LIBRARY FACILITY 
BIdg. 400, Richmond Field Station 
University of California 
Richmond, CA 94804-4698 

ALL BOOKS MAY BE RECALLED AFTER 7 DAYS 

• 2-month loans may be renewed by calling 
(510)642-6753 

• 1-year loans may be recharged by bringing 
books to NRLF 

• Renewals and recharges may be made 4 
days prior to due date. 

DUE AS STAMPED BELOW 



SEP 3 2002 



FEB I 2 2007 



12,000(11/95) 



GENERAL LIBRARY - U.C. BERKELEY 






BDDD77SE7M 




